Karl Alexander
5
71
8
9
7
4 3
3
2
G
2
0
2
6
5
V
3
Time
after
time
se
H. G. Wells chases Jack the Ripper through time, via his infamous
time machine, to current day San Francisco, Jack just happen to be
a sociopath friend of dear H.G.'s. San Fran is a great back drop to
the novel, and their battles. H.G. even finds love. This book went on
to make a great film by the same title.
OceanofPDF.com
Karl Alexander
Time After Time
ePub r1.0
SoporAeternus 05.09.15
OceanofPDF.com
Título original: Time after time
Karl Alexander, 1979
Diseño de cubierta: SoporAeternus
Editor digital: SoporAeternus
ePub base r1.2
OceanofPDF.com
For all my good boys: Karl II, James, Paul, Nicholas, Slade,
Karl III, Alex, Dalton, Langston and Dashiell
OceanofPDF.com
Acknowledgments
The author wishes to thank David Spector, Michael Scheff, Jacqueline
Tunberg and William Tunberg for their advice, criticism and support.
OceanofPDF.com
Prologue
The gentleman got off the train at the Mile-End station early in the evening
and walked quickly to the street, a tight smile on his face. He had a thin, yet
handsome visage that did not quite match his muscular frame and athletic
stride. He wore a bowler tilted forward at a rakish angle to enhance his
appearance.
He crossed the street, a black leather bag in his gloved hand, and was
careful not to slip on the wet cobblestones. A cold, heavy mist was rolling
up from the Thames, and he could hear the foghorns in the distance. He
breathed deeply and did not shiver, for over his well-cut dark suit he wore a
fine lamb’s-wool cape that kept out the chill. Except for a slight headache,
he felt very well indeed. Yes, it was good to be back in the East End if only
for a short while, and the weather suited his need for discretion.
He signaled for a passing hansom. The two-wheeled carriage stopped,
its wheels skidding in the wet. He sprang lightly into the passenger seat and
leaned forward, his dark, glowing eyes alert for the once-brazen and now
downtrodden. He did not foresee a problem, for the district had not
changed. Odors of stale petrol and dead fish wafted up from the docks. A
mantle of damp suet covered everything, diffusing even the brightest of the
gas-lit streetlights.
The gentleman had the cabby take him to the north end of Commercial
Street where the sloven of gin shops and flophouses began. He paid for his
ride, then moved off into the night, his stride jaunty, his mouth wet with
anticipation. As he neared the dismal corner of Folgate and Commercial
streets, he saw a drab harlot emerge from a low-life pub, huddle into her
dirty, threadbare coat and walk dejectedly toward him. He studied the tart
from the vantage of an alcove. Her face was pinched and sallow, her eyes
dull, her teeth rotten. Her belly was swollen from malnutrition. The
gentleman’s heartbeat quickened, and he nodded imperceptibly.
He was about to call her over when he saw her look back, then hunch
over and hurry away. Something was wrong. He stepped out of the alcove.
The reason for her distress was a bobby crossing the street to follow her.
The gentleman smiled again. He would shadow them both.
He watched her run past the coal-blackened buildings, hurry by
Spitalfield’s Market, then turn onto White’s Row. He pursued, surprised that
she had the strength to move so quickly. When he reached the narrow street
that stunk of foreign vagrants, he saw her dart into an alley. The bobby kept
going straight, and the gentleman allowed himself a dry laugh. So much for
the bobby.
The narrow, filthy passageway twisted behind factories like a dry moat,
and the gentleman found that he had to labor to keep up with her, but that
was fine; it only increased his desire for the sweet slime of the alley slut.
When she reached Houndsditch Road, she doubled back into a maze of side
streets that seemed to lead nowhere. But the gentleman was familiar with
the area; all he needed was an occasional glimpse of her slight figure to
keep on the trail. He moved too rapidly and quietly to be accosted by the
beggars and thieves in the damp freeze. Even the boldest would have been
intimidated by his powerful arms and shoulders.
Finally, he saw her stop and lean against the dank brick of a building,
her chest heaving. While she worked to get her breath, he slipped across the
street to make it appear that he was coming from the other direction. He
looked up and saw that he was near the corner of Fairclough and Berner
streets, and he could hear the rattle of the District Line carrying citizens
more fortunate than the harlot past this, the sinkhole of London. Then he
approached, letting his footsteps ring with a hint of authority. He saw her
listen, then look. She quickly straightened her clothes and forced her best
smile. He stopped close to her and returned the expression. He noticed hope
in her eyes that had not been there a few moments ago. Then she wet her
lips and made a small, uncertain gesture with her head toward a high
wooden gate that served as the workers’ entrance to a garment factory.
The gentleman quickly looked in all directions, turned back to her and
nodded. He allowed her to take his hand and pull him through the gates into
a narrow courtyard bordered by brick walls. He heard singing, and as they
crossed the small space he looked up and saw that the voices came from the
second story of the building next to the factory. A socialist workers’ club
meeting was starting—the members were singing the “Internationale.”
They reached the back end of the factory. She led the gentleman down
several steps into a cloistered area where the walls were lined with
commercial-sized dust bins, some of them filled with the remnants of cheap
material. He hesitated and inspected the place. Once satisfied that the
cloister was ideal, he smiled. He was certain that no one would interrupt
them.
From his waistcoat, he removed an ornate gold pocket watch and
opened it. Also a music box, the small timepiece began playing a French
lullaby, and painted on the inside of the lid was the likeness of a beautiful,
dark-haired young lady. The gentleman gazed at the portrait, then carefully
placed the watch on a concrete ledge above a dust bin.
The harlot faced him, opened her coat and pulled her dress and three
petticoats up to her waist. She wore nothing underneath. He shuddered with
pleasure at the sight of her shaved pubis just below the slightly distended
belly.
“Five bob and you can do what you like, sir,” she whispered above the
second chorus of the “Internationale.”
He said nothing and handed her a gold coin. She gasped with surprise,
stepped back. He chuckled. No doubt, a guinea was the most the harlot had
ever received for her favors. He knew she would have accommodated him
for a few shillings, but he liked it better this way. The unexpected extra
money made the tarts suddenly warm and loving, the way mothers were
when they got flowers on their birthdays.
This one was no different. While he pulled down his trousers, she
gratefully kissed him. She tasted foul, but wasn’t that the way women were?
He welcomed the rancid kiss. His breath quickened. He felt her hands on
his thighs. He could wait no longer.
With a guttural sound, he spun her around hard, lifted her skirts, bent
her over and roughly entered her from behind, eliciting from her an
agonized groan. For a guinea, she must think the pain exquisite, he mused.
He used his hands to guide her hips until she was in rhythm with his
thrusts. Then he noticed that she was moving with him eagerly, her head
arched back, her breath coming in quick gasps. He smiled. She was going to
have an orgasm. That was fine, that was the way it should be, this, the first
time.
He threw his head back and hissed through his gritted teeth. Then he
closed his eyes, relaxed his muscles and let go of his feelings. His mind
raced. From the blackness emerged colors and forms. The harlot writhing
against him became his sister, and her beautiful face was twisted with desire
despite the innocence of the lullaby. God, how he loved her. He wanted to
be with her for the rest of his life. How could they say it was wrong? How
could they punish him? He would run away with her to a foreign country.
They would marry and no one would know. Their life together would
always be like this, it would always feel this good. There would be no
others—not for either of them. There was no need. They were one… .
What was that she was whispering at the height of her passion? There
had been others? He was not the first? She had lied to him all along? She
had not saved her precious maidenhead for her true love?
The pastel forms in his mind took on shades of red and black, and he
grunted as his climax began, his hands fumbling in his coat pockets
underneath his cape.
“Touch me, sir, touch me!”
The harlot reached behind her to take his hands, but they weren’t there.
She groped for them, waved around for them, whimpering frantically, her
body already starting to jerk spasmodically.
He was the first and only. With one hand he grasped her hair and
snapped her head all the way back. He was the first and only. With the other
he cut her throat from ear to ear with a postmortem knife.
The singing ended, and the gentleman released a deep breath in a long,
continuous sigh. His headache was gone. Then he proceeded to cut up the
harlot’s corpse, working with considerable speed and expertise. When he
finished, he carefully placed her parts in an empty dust bin and arranged
them in a mock pose of horror. Then he stepped back to view his work, his
shoes sloshing in the blood that now covered the floor of the cloister. He
turned one hand a little to the left, then admired his composition much like
a sculptor who was carving a bust.
Satisfied, he returned his watch to its pocket and attached the chain to
his waistcoat. He started to leave, but stopped at the head of the steps to
listen for a moment. The socialist workers applauded a speaker, and then all
was quiet except for the murmured voices of the meeting.
The gentleman quickly crossed the courtyard and hurried through the
gate out into the street. He heard horse hoofs on the cobblestones and the
telltale squeaking of the springs of a hansom. The cab stopped at the end of
the block, and he saw someone get out of the carriage and walk briskly into
the building, perhaps late to the meeting. He smiled at his luck, ran to the
cab, hailed it and jumped inside. The cabby flicked his reins, and the horse
trotted away.
Once the hansom turned onto Brick Lane, the gentleman sensed that he
was out of any possible danger and relaxed. His body tingled inside with
the memory of encounter. The harlot had been so willing and excited that he
deemed her worthy of the creative collage he had constructed out of her
bloody parts. Yes, it had been one of the most satisfying experiences for
him, ever. Perhaps the best. The afterglow would keep him happy for
weeks, maybe months. And when it ended, then he would return to Bethnal
Green or Shoreditch.
The only problem was the police. After the news of this one got about,
there would be another public outcry, probably the most massive response
yet. Scotland Yard detectives would swarm around the East End for a long
time. He would have to be very careful and selective in the future, a fact
that he did not relish.
Perhaps it was time to leave England. He could certainly afford it. Yes,
that might be a solution. Although once he killed again, people would know
where he was. His style was definitely not commonplace. Perchance he
would go to southern France where the women were coquettish and the
police inept. He smiled and imagined using his knives on some dark-haired
courtesan under a moonlit night on the beach at St. Tropez.
He heard another train in the distance, and the sound brought him back
to reality. He reached down, opened his bag, took out white rags and a
bottle of cleaning fluid. He meticulously scrubbed the bloodstains off his
hands and shoes, then noted with satisfaction that there weren’t any on his
clothes. He attributed that fact to his talented hands and surgical knowledge.
The hansom stopped in front of the Whitechapel station. The gentleman
got out fully composed, paid the cabby and quickly walked inside. He
bought a ticket for Mornington-Crescent and listened patiently as the clerk
told him he would have to transfer from the District Line to the Northern at
Charing Cross. He already knew.
What the gentleman didn’t know was that the bobby who had originally
followed the harlot had arrived at the intersection of Fairclough and Berner
streets just as he was leaving. The bobby had become suspicious, had
investigated and had found the harlot’s remains in the cloister at the end of
the courtyard. He had summoned his fellow officers, who responded
quickly after hearing his brief report. Seven minutes after the gentleman
boarded his train, the cabby positively identified him to the police. And five
minutes after that the station clerk confirmed his identity and revealed his
destination. Within the hour Scotland Yard had the “H” Division mobilized
and was on a prowl of their own.
OceanofPDF.com
1
Number 7 Mornington Place was a tall and narrow brick house with a wellkept yard bordered by a hedge and an iron-railing fence. With its threegabled roof and dark-brown trim, it looked like all the other residences east
of Regency Park between Euston and Camden Town. The streets appeared
similar, too, for they were well laid out and at night were always crowded
with lively, energetic people who liked to mingle in the gas-lit haze visiting
or going on errands, despite the fog and the extremely cold weather.
Discomfort could always be outweighed by a wool scarf, a heavy coat and
the good fellowship of neighbors strolling to and fro. Besides, the warmth
of a snifter full of brandy was never more than a short distance away inside
a friendly pub.
The tenant at 7 Mornington Place was in love with the neighborhood,
perhaps because for the first time in his twenty-seven years he was living in
a decent borough and was free to do as he pleased. Recently he had
purchased a new Raleigh bicycle equipped with the latest in safety brakes,
and every night he leisurely rode through Mornington-Crescent and
absorbed the sights, sounds and smells. Then he turned those impressions
into controversial, hence popular, articles for which he was paid a decent
living wage.
This evening he had decided to look in Regent’s Park, which in the past
always had been a good environment for source material. He had pedaled
all the way to York Gate on the narrow Outer Circle and the well-kept,
familiar beauty of the green lawns and low overhanging trees softened by
the constant mist had not even registered on him. He seemed to be within a
dense fog of his own creation. When he reached the curved finger of the
park’s placid lake, however, he suddenly recalled delightful summer
afternoons of boating with sophisticated female companions, a bottle of
chilled French wine, bread and cheese; the memory made him realize that
he had not been able to curtail his own inner excitement and allow himself
to become the detached, yet passionate, observer that Londoners were so
used to reading. It was as if he had bicycled five miles from MorningtonCrescent with blinders on. He hadn’t even felt the cobblestones which
normally were a constant source of jolts and a cause for new bicycle tires.
He cursed his own lack of concentration, then laughed. The reason was
obvious. Later that night old friends and former classmates were coming
over, and—great Scott—did he have a surprise for them.
He wouldn’t have been out bicycling on this evening at all except that
Mr. Hastings—the intrepid editor of the Pall Mall Gazette—had asked for
three more articles by the end of next week. Yes, he was definitely behind
in his work, for he had been devoting more time than usual to an obsessive
scientific project in his private laboratory. He had also been spending more
money than the articles—no matter how well received—had been paying.
So it was imperative that he find material and find it quickly.
The mist was turning into a light rain. He wiped his handsome angular
face dry with a large handkerchief. Wetness had caused his thick, darkbrown walrus mustache to droop. He imagined it made him look like an
expatriate Russian bohemian living in Paris, so he rode no-handed for a
short distance and used both hands to twirl the mass of hair back into shape.
He reminded himself that he was fresh out of mustache wax and should
pick up a jar the next time he was near the chemist’s.
He rounded a turn, passed the Hanover Gate to the park and saw a very
tall, thin and stately gentleman walking an equally tall and thin brace of
Borzois. Perhaps an article about the striking physical (and psychological)
resemblances between the owners and their pets would do. He chuckled at
the thought of receiving irate letters from royalty and commoners alike who
happened to own bulldogs or basset hounds. The only problem was that he
would not have time to research the various and sundry breeds and species
of animals that humans liked to surround themselves with. Oh, well.
Perchance that was material for a more leisurely time.
He steered around a cart carrying milk cans, and as he passed he noticed
that the horse pulling the cart suddenly lifted his tail and deposited a pile of
feces in the middle of the road. A common enough occurrence, he thought,
but what about the poor wretches who clean it up day in and day out? How
did they (eastern European immigrants, no doubt) feel about the eccentric
excesses of the Duke of Clarence, for example? Was there humor in that?
No, the subject was much too verisimilar and socially realistic for the
cyclist’s romantic tastes. And he had no desire to imitate the venerable
Charles Dickens. So he would just have to keep looking.
But after another mile of laborious pedaling, the cyclist had seen
nothing more of interest and decided to stop. He left the Outer Circle,
turned north on Prince Albert Road, then coasted down a hill that curled
through great stands of elm and maple. He wheeled to a halt in front of the
Regent’s Inn, a gathering place for couples returning from vigorous walks
through the park. He went inside for a pint and took a table near the great
stone fireplace. Bayberry logs were ablaze and radiated heat from the
hearth. He removed his scarf and blazer, then loosened his tie.
He sipped his beer and looked around the room, listening for the spark
of an idea. A couple in the corner was complaining that too many people
used Regent’s Park despite the November cold.
“What we really ought to do, love, is spend your next holiday at the
seaside,” suggested the wife. “Even the fishermen won’t be about.”
The husband concurred. “Being out of season, the rates would be
cheaper, too.”
The cyclist’s face wrinkled up into a broad grin, and his brown eyes
sparkled. He pulled a note pad and pencil out of his knickers and began
scribbling. Why hadn’t he thought of it before? The seashore was his
favorite of all places within a half day’s train ride from the city. He recalled
—more with relief than pain—a weekend he had spent there a year ago
January. He had gone with his wife-and-cousin, Isabel, to recover from a
mild attack of exhaustion and tuberculosis. He had been teaching biology at
the time, and Isabel insisted that he give up his dreams of becoming a great
writer and inventor and devote all of his time to his job and marriage. She
had become the champion for everything that he detested and demanded
that he choose between her and his radical ideas. He had chosen himself,
then. Now he allowed himself an ironic chuckle and penned a working title:
“How to Go to the Seashore Married on Friday and Return to London a
Bachelor on Monday.”
He put his pencil down, drained his beer, leaned back and sighed. He
might even get all three articles out of that experience. Add Isabel’s
knickknack-collecting aunt and a former student with both suffrage and
seduction on her mind, and he just might have a whole damned book.
He was about to purchase another pint when he thought better of it and
pulled his watch out of its vest pocket to check the time.
“Good Lord!” He exclaimed. It was half-past eight, and his guests were
due to arrive anytime after nine. He grabbed his coat and hurried from the
pub.
He leaped onto his bicycle and furiously began pedaling toward home.
Almost immediately he came to the hill that a half hour ago he had so
casually coasted down. He worked his legs hard and strained to increase
speed, but the twisting grade was unusually steep. His breathing became
labored, and he began perspiring under his clothes despite the chill.
Uncomfortable, he hoped that his exertion would not ultimately result in
pneumonia, a disease he had feared ever since an opposing grammar school
rugger had kicked in his frail chest and collapsed his lung.
Finally he hopped off and pushed the Raleigh the last few yards to the
top of the hill. As he walked, he wondered why bicycles were so primitive.
They could be manufactured with gearing mechanisms designed to alter the
revolutions of the wheels. Other machines were. Better yet, perhaps they
could be outfitted with a lightweight power source such as an adaptation of
the Daimler-Benz internal combustion engine developed by the Prussians.
“Hmm” he uttered. Maybe he’d start working on that soon. The idea
seemed infinitely more simple than his current invention. He grinned,
remounted the bicycle and quickly pedaled off. The devil with articles on
the seashore! Once his project came into his mind, he grew excited all over
again and could think of nothing else. He had finished the device in his
laboratory that morning, and he could hardly wait for the reactions of his
friends. True, the contraption needed testing, but still the occasion made
him feel extremely proud and self-fulfilled. Despite a subsistence-level
childhood and a beloved mother who always held the Bible over his head as
a philosophic truncheon, despite his failure at apprenticeships, his chronic
tuberculosis, his poor record at the university and the suffocating effects of
his first marriage—despite all this he was going to change history. Tonight
his friends would be the first to know, and eventually the faculty at the
Normal School of Science just might want to bestow an honorary degree on
a former student who had been sent down seven years ago.
H. G. Wells got off his Raleigh in front of 7 Mornington Place, wheeled
it through the gate and left it leaning against the side of the house under the
archway.
“Mr. Wells,” exclaimed the punctilious Mrs. Nelson as he hurried into the
kitchen. “Where on earth have you been?” She folded up the Daily Mail,
poured a cup of tea, rose and handed it to him, then said, “You shouldn’t be
gadding about on that machine of yours in weather like this.”
“The weather’s always like this,” he replied to his housekeeper, then
took a large gulp of tea.
“But a man in your condition—”
“I’ve never felt better in my entire life.”
She shook her head and sighed. “That’s what Mr. Nelson said. The day
before he died, God bless him.”
H.G. ignored her remark and drained his cup. “Is anyone here yet, Mrs.
Nelson?”
“No, sir.” She looked up—her eyes sparkling—and added with a touch
of sarcasm, “Of course, if your friends are like you, we can expect them to
be late, can’t we?”
“If it’s fashionable,” he retorted with a smile. Then he placed his cup
and saucer on the counter and turned to leave the room.
“I’ve laid out a sweater for you,” she said affectionately. “There’s a chill
in the drawing room.”
“It’s not a drawing room, Mrs. Nelson, it’s a library.”
“Call it what you like, sir, but the fact is—”
“I’ll put another log on the fire.” He left the kitchen.
Mrs. Nelson returned to her Daily Mail, but couldn’t concentrate. She
violently disagreed with every opinion Mr. Wells had ever voiced to her,
especially his views on religion and marriage. What was it he had said? Oh,
yes. Ninety-nine percent of all marriages either end in revolt or passive
endurance. And: If God exists, how could he allow nature to be so
mindlessly cruel? Wasn’t that condoning torture? When she had
disapproved of his divorce, he had laughed and pointed out that if he were
not single, she would not have a job. To her further consternation, he took
delight in saying that there might be hope for the country after all if more
conservatives like Mrs. Nelson ended up working for radicals like H. G.
Wells. Still, being the man’s housekeeper was the most challenging and
exciting thing that had ever happened to her.
She poured herself more tea and hoped that Mr. Wells would approve of
the canapés. She had spent the entire afternoon toasting bread, cutting it
into small wedges, then spreading it with her own special cheese mix, relish
and sausage. She sighed. Given the hour and the company, he would
probably be more interested in the wine.
Which wasn’t altogether true. For after adding three logs to the small
fire that burned on the hearth, H.G. took one of the artistic little canapés off
the pewter hors d’oeuvres tray, tried it and found it delightful. As he
munched, he saw that aside from the canapés, Mrs. Nelson had laid out a
handsome bowl of fruit, cheeses, bread, silverware, fine crystal glasses and
several bottles of a passable French claret. Candles burned behind the
spread on the sideboard, and he smiled with pride and admiration.
He inspected the rest of the room. His housekeeper had made it look
bright and comfortable despite the lack of rugs, decent curtains and
abundant furniture. The one settee had been freshly covered, the two redvelvet chairs cleaned and the imitation Chippendale desk polished.
H.G. was ecstatic. Mrs. Nelson had given the room both a dignified
sense of order and an air of warmth and comfort. She had transformed it
from a place he used only to read into the perfect haunt for a scientific
romantic such as himself. The room was now the ideal setting for his
revolutionary announcement.
He knew that his friends would be pleased and surprised, for some of
them hadn’t seen him since the university days when he was subsisting in a
West End basement room on the meager stipend of a pound a week. Ah,
Mrs. Nelson! he thought. What a wonderful woman. He hoped that she
would be his housekeeper forever. Besides, what would a household be if
everyone always agreed?
He hurried upstairs and changed into gray tweed trousers and his
comfortable Norfolk jacket. Then he brushed his dark-brown hair and
critically inspected himself in the mirror. He grinned as usual, for he liked
his face; he felt that his sharp yet subtle features complemented his
devotion to writing and inventing. And someday he had no doubt that his
affable countenance would attract a charming, sophisticated and intelligent
woman; an emancipated woman—both on the boardwalk and in the
boudoir.
With a flourish, he ran a comb through his mustache and was ready.
The guests began arriving shortly after ten o’clock, trickling in from various
affairs they had attended earlier in the evening. Mrs. Nelson took their coats
and hats and hung them in the hall cupboard, wondering why Mr. Wells—or
anyone else, for that matter—would want to impress gentlemen she
suspected were bohemians or libertarians. Nevertheless, she remained polite
and courteous and showed the guests into the drawing room qua library
where Wells greeted them warmly. Then she closed the door to the room
and gratefully went to bed, for it was almost eleven, and she was very tired.
In the library there was a brief interlude of awkward small talk about the
post-university years, the guests realizing that whereas their careers had
taken them steadily upward, Wells’s grip on the bottom rung of the ladder
seemed tenuous at best. Optimistic and bubbling with enthusiasm
nonetheless, H.G. passed the canapés around, then poured the wine and
handed each guest a glass along with a personable remark. Then, with a
sweeping gesture, he directed them to make themselves comfortable. They
occupied the settee and chairs and began sipping the claret. Since he had
only enough furniture to seat five, H.G. remained standing, but that was
fine with him. He could dominate the conversation.
And so the evening began.
H.G. paced near the fireplace liberally drinking his wine. H. Ronald
Smythe, now a myopic economist doing research for the Queen, was
making a long-winded comment about the frivolity of fiction. H.G. listened
patiently and waited. His slim and dashing figure moved gracefully, yet was
poised, for he always spoke with his entire body. His dark eyes never left
Smythe’s face.
“Fiction has always been falsehood, and I would even say that it
encouraged crime,” said Smythe. A half glass of wine had dulled his
already pedestrian wit so that he didn’t realize he was speaking too loud and
repeating himself.
“I was never aware that books committed crimes,” said James Preston, a
barrister who intended to run for Parliament. “I always thought that men
were the culprits.”
Everyone chuckled.
“Well, I should like to hear our host’s comment,” said Smythe, now the
color of his maroon bow tie.
H.G. half turned. His voice was thin and reedy, yet confident. “First,
may I compliment Ronald for his tenacious ability to put up with the
Queen’s unegalitarian views on finance?”
The guests laughed, now completely at ease.
“We were discussing fiction and crime,” the portly economist remarked
dryly.
“So we were,” replied H.G. “So we were. I’m not sure about the
connection you’ve made, Ronald, but I would agree that it is a crime some
things get published.” He paused for another laugh. “It is also a crime that
some things don’t.” His eyes sparkled. And then he launched into his
discourse slowly, realizing had to put them in the right frame of mind for
his announcement or they would deride him.
“We all want a world free from social injustice and moral systems
which give man less credit than the gorilla from which he ascended.”
Only mildly interested so far, the surgeon, Leslie John Stephenson,
continually leaned out of his chair to take wedges of cheese and canapés
from the hors d’oeuvres tray. Famished, he didn’t stop until he realized he
had eaten almost half of the food by himself. Always concerned about his
appearance and dress, he dabbed at the corners of his brooding mouth with
a linen napkin, then inspected himself. There were several crumbs of cheese
and toast on his lap. He carefully brushed the offending bits of food off his
trousers and into the napkin, which he folded into a precise tricorn and
placed on the table. Then he sipped wine, sighed, sat back, stroked his cleft
chin and listened.
“You speak of crime, my friends,” H.G. continued. “Crime exists
because the British monarchy and the Church hierarchy oppress most of the
people and let a privileged few do as they please.”
“Are you implying that the Queen and the Bishop of Canterbury are
criminals?” Preston asked.
“Only that they do not know any better,” H.G. replied, “Although in my
view, Queen Victoria has sat upon men’s minds like a great paperweight for
almost one half a century. A rational man of intellect just might consider
that the greatest social crime in recent history.”
When the laughter died down, Stephenson cleared his throat and
interrupted in a soft and musical voice that had a touch of cultured
melancholy. “It doesn’t matter what kind of society we live in. Crime will
always exist.”
“Not if we have a society where all men are well fed and free enough to
adhere to a modern ethical system.”
Stephenson smiled thinly. “The only way that will ever happen is if you
lobotomize entire populations.”
The guests chuckled at Wells’s expense, and H.G. recalled that while
playing for the university’s cricket team, Stephenson used to bowl with
reverse spins so the hardwood ball would bounce into the legs of opposing
batsmen.
“My dear Stephenson,” said H.G., “don’t you look forward to a day
when you could read good news in The Times?”
“What’s the difference? You, yourself, have already cited the Queen’s
inadequate justice system. And the absurdity of a religion telling you what
to eat and how to behave! If justice, itself, is amoral, then why have it? If
some criminals avoid punishment, and there is no God in heaven with a
final retribution, then bully for crime! Let men do as they please. Their
comeuppance will occur when they turn their backs on the wrong person.”
H.G. was momentarily at a loss for words. Stephenson had scored
telling points just as he used to when he and Wells were opponents in the
school’s Debating Society. Stephenson had been a formidable adversary
then and clearly hadn’t lost any of his talent or cynicism. But H.G. wasn’t
exactly faint-hearted when it came to arguments, either. His eyes narrowed.
“Don’t you feel that we should instill morality in people, John?”
“Why?”
“To preserve order.”
Stephenson laughed. “There is no order, Wells!”
“Then what about the sanctity of human life or don’t you believe in that,
either?”
“I work in a surgery, Wells. People come and go. They are born, they
become sick and they die.” He leaned forward and lowered his voice so that
it sounded even more melodious. “The most I ever know of my patients is
what condition their organs are in. I’m like a damned mechanic who makes
repairs on a carriage, only I have blood on my hands instead of grease! The
ultimate question, Wells, is can you fix it or not? How long can you keep
the wheels turning and the heart pumping?” He paused and leaned back
again. “Now what is so bloody sacred about that?”
H.G. blushed. “Nothing. If you phrase it that way.”
The others buzzed with excitement.
“I do believe that the most literate among us has just lost his first
debate,” Smythe said gleefully.
Wells glared at Smythe. “Not entirely, Ronald. I would agree that there
is no consistency in justice or moral systems today, but we do have science
and technology. Ultimately, they will replace belief in God and the Queen.
They are the hope for the future of mankind. They will lead to mass
enlightenment. And they will be the retribution we all seem to think is so
elusive.”
Stephenson frowned and drained his claret while H.G. continued. “In
less than a hundred years, there will not be any more war or social ills or
crime. Our world will be a progressive Utopia where everyone will be free
to pursue the noble experiments of the mind and the delightful pleasures of
the flesh.” He paused to look at his guests and saw that they were all
listening intently, even Stephenson and Smythe. He imagined that he was
addressing the combined faculties of Oxford, Cambridge and the University
of London, imagined they hung on every word.
He was in fact leading up to something momentous, and he saw that in
the guests who thus far had stayed out of the dialogue. Harper, the
psychologist, had his eyes closed and his fingers pressing into the bridge of
his nose in order to concentrate more keenly. And Grinnell, the visionary
science teacher, was continually nodding his head and stroking his
manicured beard.
But then Stephenson interrupted again. “I find nothing noble about the
human condition, H.G. And there certainly isn’t a damn thing delightful
about a human soul imprisoned in human flesh. Furthermore, there is no
indication anywhere in medical science that the future will be any
different.”
Smythe nodded in furious agreement.
H.G. smiled thinly at his adversary. “I sympathize with you, John.
Having to spend your days surrounded by the sick and the dying. Human
beings that you wished you could help, but can’t because medical science is
still in its infancy. You were born before your time. We all were.”
“What the devil are you getting at, Wells?” Stephenson involuntarily ate
three more hors d’oeuvres. “More predictions? They won’t help you win an
argument.”
“I’m not interested in debating with you, John,” H.G. lied. “I’m merely
saying that by the late twentieth century the human condition will be a
happy and fulfilling experience for everyone on earth.”
“Can you be more specific?” Stephenson asked sarcastically.
“Pick any year you like past 1950,” H.G. replied with rancor and a
magnanimous gesture.
Smythe could no longer contain himself. He rose unsteadily. “Excuse
me for sounding utilitarian, Wells, but you could describe Armageddon in—
in, say—1984, and it would still mean nothing to us.”
“That you have limited yourself to the dreary confines of present-day
London is no one’s fault but your own, Ronald.”
“Well, what do you suggest we do?” Smythe asked. “Petition the Pope
for an encyclical on reincarnation?”
Much of the laughter was directed at Wells, and Smythe acknowledged
it by turning and nodding.
“Come now, H.G.,” said Preston, his face now flushed from three
glasses of wine. “Why did you really invite us here this evening? Surely
you had more on your mind than to have us witness a renewal of verbal
broadsides between you, Smythe and Stephenson.” He paused to light a
cigarette. “If not, I must say quite candidly that my undergraduate days
have been finished for quite some time—as have been yours—and that I
must take my leave. I have a full day tomorrow.” He half rose.
“Sit down, James,” said H.G., appearing much calmer than he really
was. Then he began.
“My dear friends, we have all learned that everything has length,
breadth, thickness and duration. Duration—or time—is the fourth
dimension, would you agree?”
There was general assent, although Stephenson and Smythe were
guarded in their agreement.
“Our conscious lives take the form of a fall or a flight along the spatial
dimension, time, but at any one moment we can perceive only three
dimensions. Yet we all know that the totality of our being is from birth to
death. Hence, we are four-dimensional creations. What we see from
moment to moment is only a section of our reality.”
“You still haven’t given anyone a ticket to your so-called Utopia,” said
Stephenson.
Wells merely smiled and let the remark pass. “If time is a kind of space,
then why can’t we move about in the fourth dimension as we do in the other
three?”
“We do,” said Smythe. “At the pace that we call minutes, hours, days,
weeks and so on.”
“What if we could speed up or slow down the pace?”
“Impossible,” said Stephenson. “Time dictates to us the speed of life
and that is the way it is.”
“Did we study science to be satisfied with the way things are or to
investigate the unknown?”
Harper and Grinnell both agreed with Wells. Stephenson, Smythe and
Preston made quips about the state of H.G.’s finances and sanity, although
none of them made any moves to leave.
The argument continued for hours, with short breaks for more food and
wine. Wells savored every minute of the discussion, for he was doing what
he loved—using logic to convince the skeptical. To the cries of
“Impossible,” he smoothly cited the recent fruits of science’s labors:
Edison’s talking machine, the practical electric bulb (he already had several
installed in his laboratory), the Daimler-Benz internal combustion engine,
Marconi’s wireless transmissions and—praise the Queen—London’s new
electric underground railway.
“What isn’t possible, gentlemen?” Wells spread his hands. He noticed
the clock on his desk. In another half hour the sun would be rising. They
had talked all night.
“What isn’t possible?” said Stephenson tiredly. “Traveling into the past
or future isn’t possible.”
H.G. swung around, eyes bright and piercing despite the late hour.
“What were you doing eight years ago, John?”
“Studying medicine. What does that prove?”
“What was your first lecture class?”
“Anatomy.”
“Can you picture the face, stature and mannerisms of your professor?”
“Certainly.”
“Can you close your eyes and see the drawings and charts of the human
body?”
“Definitely.”
“Can you recall the first cadaver your class dissected?”
“What are you getting at, Wells? Of course I can! My memory’s as good
as anyone’s!”
“Then your mind has just traveled through time. Fait accompli.” H.G.
smiled, then administered the coup de grace. “And if your mind can do that,
why not the rest of you?”
The guests murmured to each other.
Stephenson was on his feet exclaiming, “It’s against reason, Wells!”
“Perhaps. But so is defying gravity. You do know that more than one
man has risen over five thousand feet above the earth’s surface in a balloon,
don’t you?”
Stephenson started to speak, then sagged and thought furiously. Ten
years ago, who would have thought of an electric light bulb? Or a talking
machine? One hundred years ago, who would have thought of a camera? Or
a gramophone? Technology did appear to be developing faster and faster.
Maybe Wells was right about a Utopian future with a contented population.
His theories seemed sound.
Smythe had the floor, and as he spoke he gestured triumphantly.
“Doesn’t this all sound suspiciously familiar? Much like a collection of
absurdities Wells published in the Journal five years ago?” He turned and
addressed H.G. “What did you title that piece?”
“‘The Chronic Argonauts.’”
“Oh, yes.” Smythe continued. “Wasn’t it about a young man who
traveled through time encountering great civilizations in the future? What a
lot of simplistic rubbish that is! Give up this thinking about a time machine,
Wells. It’s a waste of time, and it doesn’t suit you.”
H.G. cleared his throat and smiled smugly. “I haven’t just thought about
a time machine, gentlemen, I have constructed one.”
OceanofPDF.com
2
The uproar of voices from downstairs awakened Mrs. Nelson. She listened
for a moment and could hear Wells’s muffled tones and then another uproar.
She looked at her clock on the bedside table: 5:15 A.M. She frowned. The
man has no sense at all, she thought. No sense and no breeding, despite his
educated ways. Him and his cronies will have half the neighborhood up
before long. If Mr. Wells didn’t have the consideration to tell his guests
when to leave, then she would tell them herself. She got out of bed and
donned a robe over her blue nightdress.
As she started downstairs, she shook her head. She just didn’t
understand the man. He could be so nice and thoughtful, so kind and
generous, then turn right around and spout his radical and blasphemous
ideas until all hours of the morning. No doubt the former qualities could be
attributed to the guiding hand of Mr. Wells’s mother, who kept the family
together, Mrs. Nelson thought. The latter were undeniably part and parcel of
his irresponsible father, who was always away playing in semiprofessional
cricket matches. Not to mention the schooling that planted the spurious
seeds of Darwinism, socialism and other irreligious notions in poor Mr.
Wells’s impressionable mind. She sighed. Perhaps some day soon she could
induce the vicar to drop in for some tea; he might be able to talk some sense
into the young man.
When she reached the bottom of the stairs, she heard sharp knocking on
the front door. Who could that be at this hour? If there were more of Wells’s
scruffy friends about, she’d send them packing soon enough. She yanked
open the door. The fog had lifted, and she had to shield her eyes from the
rising sun.
“Mr. Wells is not receiving any more guests this evening, gentlemen,”
she said haughtily to two hard-looking but sheepish men. They removed
their hats and straightened their ill-fitting suits. She was about to slam the
door in their faces when one of them flashed a badge.
“Morning, mum. I’m Inspector Adams. Scotland Yard. I apologize for
the hour, but is the man of the house about?”
After Wells had made his announcement, the guests had leaped up and
begun bombarding him with questions, the most vociferous being
Stephenson. H.G. had never seen the man so excited. His shouting went
beyond the bounds of decorous behavior. Wells imagined that Stephenson
was acting very much like a converted disciple to Catholicism. And why
not? The time machine would nullify death and, he mused, hopefully the
existence of God, too.
When his guests had calmed themselves, H.G. endeavored to explain.
He kept his account as simple as possible, realizing that he had been
studying and testing the concepts of time and fourth-dimensional geometry
for years. His friends hadn’t, and he wanted to convince them irrevocably.
“Gentlemen. Atoms rotate through the solar system just as the solar
system rotates through the universe. The universe also turns while it travels
at the speed of light through space.
“What I have discovered is that both the past and the future exist
permanently in our universe, but our consciousness sees only ‘now’ because
it has been conditioned to do so—perhaps by nature’s dictatorial need to
maintain order.
“Time planes, or spheres, are adjacent to the one we now find ourselves
in, and they function according to the laws of the Gaussian coordinates. In
other words, our particular time dimension is merely an electromagnetic
field. Swirl, if you will.
“What I have done is constructed a machine which juxtaposes fields of
energy, creating friction. The result is an ever-increasing and magnifying
series of chain reactions which lift, or literally rotate, the machine out of
one time sphere and into another. Acceleration will keep the machine and
its occupant above all time spheres in a conscious but vaporized state. You
may go into the past or the future at will.”
“How do you know which is which?” asked Grinnell.
“If you rotate to the west, you gain yesterdays. To the east, you
accumulate tomorrows.” H.G. drained his glass of claret and poured more.
“And if you go north, you’ll find Scotland, and south, you’ll end up in
the Thames,” remarked Smythe sarcastically. “I say balderdash!”
“Quiet!” snapped Stephenson. He turned to face H.G., his eyes wide and
glistening. “Does the device work, Wells?”
“Theoretically. I have not tested it yet because I have been concerned
with the re-entry problem. Although this morning I installed what I term the
Interstices Vaporizing Regulator. Hopefully, it will automatically keep
passengers above the time spheres if it detects danger.”
“What danger?”
“Well, you wouldn’t want to stop off in the middle of a pestilence or a
war.”
“Doesn’t the time machine stay where it is?” queried Grinnell
perceptively.
“Of course it does, but in a thousand years England may have sunk, and
this house may be on the bottom of the Atlantic. In such a case the IVR
would sound a warning, take over the controls and guide the passenger to
the nearest safe landing date.” He paused. “In addition to the IVR, the
machine has another safety feature. The Rotation Reversal Lock. This
device automatically returns the machine to its starting date after the
completion of a voyage unless overridden.” He did not show them the
special key which would shut off the RRL.
“But why would you want the damned thing to return?” asked
Stephenson.
“What if you were injured during flight and incapable of fending for
yourself? Wouldn’t you want the time machine to take you back home?”
“You mentioned that the machine stays where it is during a trip,”
commented Grinnell. “I’m not sure I understand. Could you explain how
that is possible?”
H.G. smiled. “It moves only along the fourth dimension. It always
occupies the same space, but if it is not in today’s space, then you may find
it in yesterday’s space or tomorrow’s.”
“Then it does indeed disappear?”
“Of course. For the duration of a particular jaunt through time.”
The guests murmured.
“In a fortnight I shall want you all present for the maiden voyage.”
Suddenly, Smythe was on his feet again. “The maiden voyage? Come
off it, Wells!” He laughed derisively. “If you persist in these discourses, the
only trip you’ll be taking is to Bedlam!”
“Hear, hear!” Preston concurred, nodding his head and clapping his
hands.
But before H.G. could reply, Mrs. Nelson opened the hall door and
stuck her head into the room.
H.G. turned. “Yes, Mrs. Nelson, what is it?”
“Scotland Yard is at the door, Mr. Wells.”
“What the devil?” H.G. exclaimed with surprise. Then he briefly faced
his guests. “If you will excuse me, gentlemen.”
As soon as he had left the room, his guests were out of their seats,
talking excitedly and moving spasmodically around the room.
Stephenson quickly started for the door that led to the kitchen. Before
he arrived there Smythe intercepted him with the air of a foreign minister
who is bewildered over the sudden defection of a staunch ally.
“John!”
Stephenson turned.
“You haven’t taken Wells seriously, have you?”
The surgeon frowned impatiently at the distraught economist. “If I
have?”
“Well, I’m beginning to think that he’s gone stark, raving mad.”
“Wells is no more insane than you or I.”
“But surely you don’t believe a time machine possible!”
“Of course I do.” He smiled thinly. “Is not necessity the mother of
invention?”
Smythe took off his glasses and rubbed his tired eyes. He put his
spectacles back on, raised one finger and was about to ask a question. But
he never uttered the words.
Stephenson was gone.
At the front door beside Mrs. Nelson, H.G. listened impatiently to the
detectives as they wearily and methodically explained the nature of their
visit. He was reminded of his brief and unpleasant tenure as a drapery
apprentice when the foreman was spelling out why he had to account for
every minute of his time during the day.
When Adams was finished, H.G. replied with unusual venom, for he
detested the presence of a unilateral authority. “That is absolutely
ridiculous, Inspector! I am not in the business of murder, and I do not
entertain those who are!”
“A suspect was seen in the neighborhood, sir.”
“Well, then look for him in the neighborhood!”
“Our instructions are to have a look inside every house in MorningtonCrescent. Even yours, Mr. Wells.”
“My good man, I have guests!”
“And I have a warrant,” Adams replied sternly, then held up a writ
signed by the sleepy clerk of Regent’s Court just a few hours ago. He
gestured to his companion. “Come along, Duggan, let’s get on with it.” He
entered the house and went upstairs, alert for whomever he might suddenly
confront.
Duggan was so large that he had to stoop under the doorframe to get
inside. And when H.G. started back for the library, he found himself
restrained by one huge hand. Then Duggan gently turned the much smaller
man around, expertly searched him, straightened up and smiled.
“Shall I do the others here, too, sir?”
H.G. turned on his heel and strode into the library, where his friends
waited. They were quiet now, having overheard the detectives, and they all
watched H.G. as he tried to find words that would make him appear
dignified instead of humiliated. The only thing that came to his mind was to
speak quietly.
He repeated what Inspector Adams had told him, then politely asked his
friends to leave.
“You must understand that this comes as a great embarrassment to me,
personally,” he said, his hands strangely clasped behind his back.
“Furthermore,” whispered H.G., “I implore all of you to keep this evening’s
remarkable revelations to yourselves. I must test the device before its
existence is made known to the world.”
The guests murmured—some speculative, some serious. But they left
the library agreed that no outside words would be uttered about H. G.
Wells’s claim that he had constructed an operational time machine.
And so they queued up at the front door, where Mrs. Nelson delicately
(the police had humbled her considerably) handed the guests their coats and
hats. Then Duggan spread their legs and searched them one by one. As only
true British gentlemen could, they totally ignored the detective and accepted
the frisk as if it were just another part of the evening. After all, what was a
mere murder and a trifling personal indignity compared to a time machine?
When they all had left, H.G. felt more sad than angry. For months he
had dreamed of announcing his discovery to a small—if not critical and
influential—circle of friends. Who would have thought that the police
would interrupt such a gathering? He shrugged with resignation, which was
far from his usual militant stance. He could only thank God that at least
they had come at the end of the evening as opposed to the beginning or
middle.
In the library, he poured himself the last of the claret, then sat in his
favorite chair close to the fire. He stretched his legs out and stifled a yawn.
It felt good to relax after standing and talking all night. His mind drifted,
but before he could think of something pleasant, Mrs. Nelson came into the
room. She carried a tray that held a pot covered with a cozy, milk, sugar and
a cup. When she saw him still drinking wine she frowned.
“I thought you might want some tea while you waited for the police to
finish.”
He started to reply, but heard noises from upstairs. Adams and Duggan
were now going through his bedroom. He scowled.
“Damn them! Do you think they’d be here if I hadn’t published those
articles on free love?”
“We’re not the only household they’re having a look in, sir.” She set the
tray down on the table with a bang. Free love, indeed!
“I wonder.” He took a sip of wine, then smiled at her. He played with
the ends of his mustache—a sign that he was about to say something at
which Mrs. Nelson would take offense. “The next time you go to church,
pray for a socialist state, will you?”
Before Mrs. Nelson could tell Wells in no uncertain terms that his
salvation was in serious question, Inspector Adams appeared in the
doorway, hat sarcastically in hand. He raised his eyebrows slightly.
“We’re sorry to have disturbed you, sir.”
H.G. slowly rose from the chair, took a deep breath and straightened to
his full five feet seven inches. “You’ve more than disturbed me, Inspector,
you’ve desecrated my fundamental human rights!”
“We’ll be going, then.” Adams executed a slight bow and headed for the
hallway.
“Just what the devil did you expect to find, Inspector?”
Adams turned and replied, “Jack the Ripper.”
Stunned, Wells sank back into his chair. Jack the Ripper? That maniac
hadn’t been in the news for several years, and many experts speculated that
he had either left the country or committed suicide. So what was Scotland
Yard doing looking for him now in Mornington-Crescent? His prowl had
been the unfortunate streets of Whitechapel.
Undoubtedly there had been a murder, but why even suspect Jack the
Ripper? God knows, there had been several hundred cheap imitations of the
man’s style in the past two years alone, if The Times were to be believed.
But how could the police be so certain that the grisliest killer of them all
was at it again? Wells shuddered. He knew that they knew. He possessed
absolutely no knowledge of criminology, but he had an intelligent respect
for Scotland Yard. If their detectives said that Jack the Ripper was in the
neighborhood, chances were, he was. Wells understood that and regretted
the manner in which he had treated Adams and Duggan. He sighed again
and thought that the detectives’ visit was actually a blessing for he knew
that his house was safe. He turned and read the clock on the desk. Ten
minutes to seven. The fire had gone out and there was no more claret. It was
time he retired.
Just then Mrs. Nelson called out to him from the hall by the front door.
“Mr. Wells? Did Dr. Stephenson go with the others?”
“Of course he did.”
“Did you actually see him leave?”
“Mrs. Nelson—”
“Why would he leave his cape and bag in the cupboard? He couldn’t
have left.”
“The police just searched the house, Mrs. Nelson! There’s no one here
but you and I.” Just after he had spoken, he realized that he was probably
wrong. He bolted up out of his chair and hurried into the hall.
Mrs. Nelson was white with fear. She was holding up Stephenson’s cape
and staring at it aghast. She glanced at Wells, then pointed to the hem of the
garment. He frowned, for he did not immediately see the object of her
concern.
“What, Mrs. Nelson?”
“Bloodstains, Mr. Wells.”
He took the cape from her, inspected it more closely and did indeed find
several brown spots on the wool. Only a person as meticulous as Mrs.
Nelson would have noticed them in the first place.
He hung the garment up again in the cupboard, then pulled the leather
physician’s bag down from the shelf and stared at it for a long moment.
When he finally moved to open it, Mrs. Nelson shrank back against the
wall. He looked up at her. “Shouldn’t you be fixing us some breakfast, Mrs.
Nelson?”
She nodded, then hurried out of the hall. He watched her leave. When
he heard the door to the kitchen close, he turned back to the bag, unsnapped
the hasp and slowly pushed the sides apart. His heart pounded. He exhaled
in a long hiss while lifting some bloodstained rags out of the bag. He
dropped them on the floor and leaned farther forward. Under the rags was a
collection of stainless-steel surgical knives that glittered brightly even
though no direct light was hitting them. An odor penetrated his nose. It
reminded him of a childhood Sunday morning when his father was
butchering chickens behind the shop for the evening meal. He pinched his
nostrils shut with his fingers and breathed through his mouth to avoid
gagging.
There was a small tin in one corner of the bag. With his other hand he
reached inside and lifted the top off the tin. He gasped and lurched back.
The police had been right about Jack the Ripper, for the tin contained a
finger, a kidney and two eyes.
Wells quickly jammed the rags back inside the bag, snapped it shut, then
stood and pushed it into the cupboard with his foot. He closed the door and
leaned against it. His jaw muscles worked furiously. So, Dr. Leslie John
Stephenson, former classmate and journeyman surgeon, had been doubling
as Jack the Ripper all these years. H.G. felt cold and shuddered. Who would
have known? The man always had seemed bright, articulate and socially
graceful. Yet, H.G. had noticed a quiet, foreboding, even sinister quality in
Stephenson that occasionally had manifested itself in the form of a brief,
violent outburst. He recalled once when he’d watched Stephenson play for
an unprecedented third straight handball championship at the university.
Hard pressed to win, Stephenson had maneuvered his challenger into a
corner, then slammed the ball so that it ricocheted off the center wall and
into the man’s face. Victorious, Stephenson had stormed off the court
without an apology or even the traditional handshake. At the time H.G. had
attributed the act to the frustrations and pressures of a student preparing
himself for a career as a surgeon, not realizing until now the full and
horrible import of his speculation.
It suddenly occurred to H.G. that the handball incident had happened in
the spring of 1884 when he was finishing his first year at the university and
Stephenson his last. Obviously, then, the 1888 murders had taken place
when Stephenson was a student at the Cambridge medical school. If only
H.G. had known then what he knew now. But why? What had possessed
Stephenson? What kind of hideous demon ruled the inner recesses of his
mind? H.G. did not have a clue.
More urgent thoughts came to mind. Was Stephenson still in the house?
If so, where? How could the police have missed him? Their search had
taken well over an hour and no doubt had been very thorough. True,
Stephenson could have left with the others, but he never would have gotten
past Duggan without his cape and bag. Maybe he had, however. Maybe he
had left the cape and bag because he obviously didn’t want them searched.
No, the logic was all wrong. H.G. had been at the front door with the
detective the entire time. Stephenson had not been there. He had not been
searched and he had not said his good-byes. In the confusion and
excitement, he had apparently not been missed. If he had left the house, he
had done so by another exit.
H.G. slapped his hand to his forehead. Great Scott, what had taken him
so long to figure it out?
He raced down the hall to the small door that led to the back stairs. He
opened it and hurried down into the basement. He saw that the door to his
laboratory had been broken into and was now slightly ajar. The yellow glow
of an incandescent lamp shone through. Had he forgotten to turn the light
off? No. The electric light bulb was too new and precious to be ignored.
He slowly crossed to the door and pushed it the rest of the way open.
There was no one in the laboratory. His eyes narrowed. Stephenson was
definitely gone, and he had left in a most unconventional manner.
The time machine was carrying its first passenger.
OceanofPDF.com
3
The time machine sat in the center of the laboratory, a faint bluish glow
emanating from it that soon died away. To an objective eye, the device
probably would have seemed squat, ugly and askew, but to its creator it was
a thing of beauty.
The cabin was square and stood eight feet high. It was constructed out
of heavy steel plates which were held together by rivets and bolts. The sides
of the machine were tapered to facilitate rotating through the fourth
dimension. Small, paned windows were built in all around so that the
passenger could see what historical event he might be getting into at lowvelocity manual operation. Of course, at a cruising speed of two years per
minute, the outside world would appear as nothing more than a blur of
colored molecules as the device slipped through time in a vaporized state.
Beneath the cabin and extending three feet into the ground was the
engine. Most of the parts were precisely machined stainless steel, but here
and there nickel and ivory glistened alongside buffers of industrial
diamonds.
The heart of the device was the arrangement of twisted crystalline bars
which worked to juxtapose, concentrate and swirl the electromagnetic fields
of energy, enabling the machine to spin out of and into time spheres.
Inside the cabin were the controls, which could easily be operated from
a captain’s chair. The chair swiveled so that the passenger would not be
affected by the incredibly high-speed rotation. That amount of centrifugal
force would certainly kill a man in seconds. The dials indicating years and
dates did rotate with the machine, but the steering and pressure mechanisms
were also gyroscopically installed so that the device could be controlled
when entering a particular time plane. An emergency supply of food,
oxygen and clothing was stored in an enclosed space behind the chair.
H.G. approached the time machine, his face full of wonder. He peered
in a window. The chair was empty, so apparently Stephenson had at least
gone beyond the present. Then he dropped to his knees, opened the engine
hatch and looked inside. He checked several connections (ones where the
crystalline bars had been fused with metal gear faces) that he had been
losing sleep over. They were intact. Then he carefully placed his hand on
the Interstices Vaporizing Regulator. It was still warm, but obviously had
not heated up and melted. That was good news. He closed the hatch,
straightened up and wiped his hands on a rag.
He walked around to the front of the machine and tentatively pushed on
the cabin door. It was locked. That left no doubt in his mind since the door
locked only from the inside. Stephenson had used the machine and left it
somewhere on another time plane. Since the man didn’t have the special
key to override the Rotation Reversal Lock circuitry, the door had
automatically latched. After the prescribed ninety-second delay, the RRL
had gone into operation, and the machine had returned to its home hour.
“My God, it worked,” H.G. said softly. He smiled with pride at the
shiny brass plate that he had riveted over the door just yesterday. Etched
lettering spelled out THE UTOPIA, the name he had bestowed on his
device. He had planned to christen it with a bottle of champagne before the
maiden voyage.
Suddenly he frowned and became indignant. “He comes into my home
masquerading as an old friend and a legitimate physician, drinks my claret,
devours the hors d’oeuvres, picks my brain and uses my time machine! The
bloody bastard! How dare he!”
But how had Stephenson been able to successfully pilot the machine?
Was it that simple-minded? H.G. glanced over at his workbench and saw
that his technical diagrams were out of place and had been hurriedly
studied. That was how.
He removed his key ring from a pocket, unlocked the cabin door,
stepped inside, sat down and studied the control panel. The Rotator Control
was set in the extreme eastward position, and the dials told him that
Stephenson had gone to 1979. Why then? Wells frowned and thought. Early
in the evening he had predicted that the world would be a Utopia by the late
twentieth century, but he hadn’t mentioned a precise date. He smiled grimly.
Apparently, Stephenson hadn’t needed one.
Obviously, the man had used the time machine to escape the police.
When inside the device and at the controls, he had no doubt become
befuddled, realizing that he couldn’t dally over dates with two Scotland
Yard detectives upstairs. So he had dialed today, then added on the first year
that came to mind, which was 1979. H.G. frowned. He could not fathom the
logic of Stephenson’s decision, but whatever his reasoning, H.G. guessed
that Stephenson hadn’t gone that far into the future because he didn’t want
to encounter too radical a change in terms of human behavior, dress, speech
and so on.
“Not so,” he muttered. If he were right about the late twentieth century,
Stephenson would be totally lost and out of place in 1979. The man would
have serious problems trying to adjust to a Utopia in that there would be no
violence or aberrant behavior with which he could identify. Suddenly, H.G.
straightened up. Good Lord, what was he worrying about Stephenson for?
What about the happy and contented people of 1979? If technology had in
fact freed them from the drudge of mindless toil, the oppression of
conservative political systems and the scourge of poverty, then they would
be an artistic and unabashed people. They would patronize and participate
in music, dance, poetry, painting and other forms of culture. They would be
open and honest. They would accept Stephenson as one of their own and
they wouldn’t know! And what if he went on another ghastly rampage as he
had done in ’88 and ’92? If they weren’t used to crime, the people of 1979
would be helpless when faced with London’s most notorious butcher. There
would be panic. A great deal of panic.
H.G. stared at the control panel. He had to do something. Quickly.
Suddenly angry again, he climbed out of the machine and slammed the
heavy door shut. A bloody murderer using my unprecedented device to
escape justice, he thought. My time machine that was built for and should
exist for the betterment of mankind; that was named for a perfect human
society. Then a horrible thought struck him. Had he created a technological
monster? If he hadn’t built the device in the first place, Stephenson would
not have traveled into the future. That meant that Stephenson was his
responsibility, and he didn’t want to be accountable for what that maniac
would do in 1979. It wasn’t merely principles of justice and morality; it
wasn’t just H.G.’s personal sense of worry and outrage. It was as if he were
the owner of the trading ship that had brought the black plague to Europe in
the Middle Ages.
He paced and fumed and quickly made up his mind. Dr. Leslie John
Stephenson might not believe in retribution, but H.G. Wells was of a
different opinion. There was only one thing to do: get Jack the Ripper and
bring him back.
He strode resolutely to a safe built into the wall of the laboratory, spun the
combination and opened the door. He removed the fifty pounds that he kept
there for emergencies, started to put the money into his billfold, then
stopped and thought. What about Mrs. Nelson? It wasn’t as if he were
taking a trip to Africa and could mail her a few pounds from Johannesburg
if she needed it. No, he had best leave her the fifty pounds. It would keep
her solvent for at least six months, and if he weren’t back by then… . He
shuddered.
He moved back to his workbench, put the money into an envelope, then
hastily scribbled a note.
My Dear Mrs. Nelson:
I must leave London for a while. If I have not returned in thirty
days, please use what is left of this currency to help yourself secure
another position.
My Best,
HGW
He folded the note and put it into the envelope, hoping that its implications
weren’t too ominous. Then he placed the packet outside the laboratory,
closed and locked the door. He moved back to the safe, reached farther in
and took out some heirloom jewelry that his mother had given him for his
firstborn daughter, whenever that happened. He grimaced as he looked at
the precious stones. Children? There were too many in the world already.
He pocketed the jewelry, moved to the time machine, took a deep breath
—desperately hoping that it would not be one of his last—and climbed
inside. He locked the door, got into the chair and strapped himself in. There
was no need to reset the Time-Sphere Destination Indicator, for Stephenson
had already determined it: year, 1979; month, November; day, five.
He synchronized his pocket watch with the clock on the control panel,
quickly figuring that 1979 was forty-three minutes away. It was now 7:14
A.M. Stephenson had at least an hour and a half head start.
He engaged the series of switches that activated the engine. A low hum
from below told him that energy fields were already interacting and
building up to speed. He was only moments away. A small light on the
control panel flashed. The machine was ready.
He hesitated. It still wasn’t too late to change his mind. Stephenson had
left out of desperation, but he, H. G. Wells, didn’t have to go hurtling
through time. He could remain in the present and go on tinkering, writing
and dreaming. He could lead a decent, productive life without jumping off
into the unknown. Hadn’t his mother always warned him about being
impulsive? He remembered one of the last times she had chastised him. He
had refused to study for his third-year examinations at the university
because he was in the middle of writing a short story. The piece was
published in the Journal, but he lost his scholarship and was asked not to
return to the Normal School of Science.
He moved to shut down the engine. He was halfway through
deactivating the switches when he suddenly stopped himself. What the devil
was he thinking of? Had he put in all those years of study and research and
construction for nothing? The story had been “The Chronic Argonauts” and
had started him thinking about fourth-dimensional geometry in the first
place! Impulsive, yes; but foolhardy, never! Besides, was not his entire
raison d’être to chart the unknown? To do what no man had ever done
before?
He reactivated the switches.
When the machine was ready again, he released the brake on the
Accelerator-Helm lever with a trembling hand, then gently pushed it.
Nothing happened. He swore under his breath. He had been so timid he
hadn’t even moved it. He gritted his teeth and resolutely shoved the lever all
the way forward until it locked in the flank position.
He was not prepared for The Utopia’s response. It very quickly picked
up speed and soon was turning so fast that the blurred walls of the
laboratory became translucent. At once he felt like he was falling helplessly,
and at the next moment it seemed that a great invisible force was pushing
him upward. He imagined that he was in the eye of a giant tornado’s funnel,
then became dizzy. His head rolled against the back of the chair; his
stomach churned, and he felt that he was going to be sick. Had he done
something wrong? Had he failed to anticipate something? Had he violated
some unknown precept of the universe?
The machine continued to accelerate, and his sense of logic left him.
The feeling of motion changed to that of a careening, headlong rush; the
physical momentum became awesome. He began to scream. He knew he
was going to crash, explode and die somewhere in the extra-temporal fog
that whirled around him. Terrified, he fought to get out of the chair as if that
would do him any good. But time traveling had already weakened him so
much that he did not have the strength to unbuckle the straps that held him
in the seat. It was a good thing, too, for if he had left the chair he would
have been thrown into the vortex and disintegrated instantly.
He whimpered and trembled as the machine swayed and jarred along its
odyssey-twirl. He felt lost and doomed. Suddenly he dropped his chin down
onto his chest, closed his eyes tightly and, for the first time since he was a
child of nine, automatically began praying. Tears of agnostic remorse ran
down his cheeks. He asked for repentance. He asked for release. Then he
abruptly opened his eyes and shook his head to clear it. Now was no time to
revert to religion. He had to regain control of himself. But it was no use.
His eyelids drooped. He imagined that a blackness was coming over his
body and enveloping his mind. He grew sleepy. He felt as if he were
floating. Melting. There was no substance anymore. Nothing. His last
conscious thought was that he was painlessly dissolving somewhere along
the fourth dimension.
He woke with a start. The grayness had lifted and the hum of The Utopia
was less pronounced. He rubbed his eyes and saw that the swirl around him
was now a myriad of bright colors. Then he dug into his vest, pulled out his
pocket watch and held it out in front of him. He blinked, then gasped and
stared. Not only was the watch a myriad of bright colors, but so were his
hand and arm! He looked down. So were his legs and feet! He must be
vaporized. He quickly felt his body. It seemed no different; it was just that it
was difficult to see. The principle of time dilatation at work, he assumed.
He waved his arm in front of his eyes and saw what looked like a
dancing swarm of fireflies. He giggled. True, he had obviously
disintegrated, yet he felt fine. He was at one with the universe!
But where was he and what time was it? Or was it any time? He strained
to read the watch. First he saw a faint black outline around his hand and
arm. Then he brought the watch closer to his eyes and stared at it for a long
time. The colors jumped around like indiscriminate licks of flame, but
eventually he made out the faint outlines of the clock hands and numbers.
He had been traveling for twenty-three minutes. If his calculations were
correct, he would be arriving in 1979 at 7:57 A.M. So he hadn’t died along
the fourth dimension. He had merely been sleeping while his body
metamorphosed into a vaporized state.
He laughed. He was going to succeed! He bounced up and down in the
chair. Exhilaration and euphoria came over him, and with a religious fervor
he shouted out that he, H. G. Wells, had done it. He had conquered the
mysteries of the fourth dimension, and if he could do it, so could others.
There was nothing left beyond the grasp of mankind. Human intelligence
was infinite! Man could progress to eternity! Man was king!
“Do you hear that, God?” he exclaimed triumphantly, then immediately
felt foolish. If he were in fact vaporized, nothing at all could hear him.
At 7:54 the swirl of colors began to fade into gray, and H.G. knew that
the machine was preparing to drop into 1979. He got dizzy, sick and
disoriented again, but it was not as bad as the first time. And when the panic
started to come on, he controlled his mind by concentrating on possible
problems that he could do nothing about, like a malfunction in the IVR. Or
what if he had a chemical reaction to 1979 and exploded? Or imploded?
At 7:56 sharp there was a report like a loud clap of thunder. Everything
went black. Wells slumped in the chair, unconscious.
The sound of distant voices and echoing feet woke him. His initial thought
was that he had been in a comatose state for an eternity and was now
confined in a futuristic hospital where advanced human beings were testing
his nineteenth-century mind and body. A quick glance around the inside of
the time machine told him that this was not so. He then critically inspected
his immediate surroundings and was surprised. The control panel was
cracked and faded, the once-shiny ivory switches now a dirty brown. The
glass over the dials was intact, but so discolored with age that the numbers
and digits were almost impossible to read. The Rotator Control was rusted
and stuck in its eastward position. He would have to fix it if he ever hoped
to get back home.
He turned in his chair, unlocked and opened the cargo hatch. The water
had evaporated, the food was a pile of aging dust and the clothes
disintegrated when touched. Something had gone wrong. He turned further
and noticed that the chair swiveled with ease. The flight harness that held
him in the chair was as good as new, and the Accelerator Helm Lever still
glistened with the light coat of oil he had applied the day before he left.
He frowned and cursed himself. He had made an almost fatal mistake in
design. He should have mounted the entire cabin gyroscopically in order to
keep everything inside free from the devastating effects of high-energy
rotation. Had he gone much farther into the future, the controls themselves
might have disintegrated.
A sudden thought struck him. Why hadn’t the machine appeared aged
after it had delivered Stephenson into 1979?
He didn’t quite understand, but he speculated that there must have been
some matter-rejuvenation principle at work when moving back through
time. That meant that he would have to think twice about ever journeying
into history. When the technology of the machine did not exist, then… He
frowned. That was a problem for another day. He grinned ruefully. What the
devil. This trip was over. He had arrived safely. And what would a test
flight be without technical problems?
He unbuckled the harness and got out of the chair. He immediately felt
dizzy and had to sit down again. He took several deep breaths and, when he
felt stronger, slowly stood. He leaned against the side of the cabin and
peered out one of the windows for his first look at the future. The glass was
opaque and cracked. He couldn’t see a damn thing.
Muttering, he turned and unlocked the door with the special key that
overrode the RRL. He certainly did not want the machine to automatically
return to 1893 and leave him stranded. Then he noticed with surprise that
the door handle had been recently cleaned and oiled. And when he pushed
the door open the hinges did not groan and creak as he would have
suspected. They, too, had been freshly lubricated. Had someone else been
caring for his machine?
He stepped out into 1979.
He inspected the outside of the time machine. All had held up well
except for the brass name plate above the door. The letters spelling THE
UTOPIA had eroded into a crusted green patina. He certainly hoped that
that wasn’t indicative of the particular time plane he’d stepped into.
He slowly turned and found himself standing on a dais spotlighted from
directly overhead. The platform was in the center of a huge circular room
with high ceilings and an ornate, arched entrance way. What had become of
his laboratory? Theoretically, his time machine should not have moved
except along the fourth dimension. What had happened? Something had
gone wrong!
In front of him in three large, glassed-in cases were a host of leatherbound original editions and framed diagrams. The only set he recognized
were the ones he had drawn for the time machine. He looked to his right. In
the far corner of the room in another display case he saw the familiar covers
of the Pall Mall Gazette, now yellowed with age. He stepped off the dais
and moved in that direction, a man in desperate search of the old and the
familiar. He ran into a purple-velvet rope barrier that bordered the entire
area. He turned again and beheld the scene.
A sign on the wall read, “H. G. WELLS—A MAN BEFORE HIS
TIME.”
Oh my God, he thought, have I done all this? Has my laboratory
become a bloody museum? Have I joined the relics of science past? Have
my triumphs and defeats become antiques to be fingered by tours of
schoolchildren?
He moved closer to the center of the room to get a better view of the
exhibit. He was awed and bent. The wonder of it all, the sudden realization
that he had become a famous man was almost too much for him. What was
left for him if he had seen all the fruits of his life’s work at age twentyseven? Why hadn’t he thought of that before so blithely hopping into the
time machine? And worse, almost all the books and inventions were ahead
of him in time! Would he now know everything before he did it? Maybe.
Maybe not. He didn’t have to investigate all these things. Suddenly he burst
out with a victorious chuckle. Maybe if he hadn’t time-traveled, then he
wouldn’t have gone back home and eventually done all this writing and
inventing. And it was comforting to know that he had made it back to 1893
London. If there ever was a case of optimism maintaining sanity, this was it.
Curious, he began to examine his life’s work more closely, despite his
earlier reticence. He felt better and had somewhat regained his usual
scientific detachment.
Until he saw an old photograph.
His eyes widened. He shrank back, and wanted to look away but was
compelled to stare.
There was a man in the picture. A rather stout and portly man with
receding hair, heavy jowls and a multitude of wrinkles. The man wore
rimless glasses and was frowning at someone. He did not look at all happy.
A caption below the picture read, “H. G. Wells at age fifty.”
Astonished, he stared at the photograph. Time machine or not, the print
confronted him with the image of his own mortality. The ultimate question
flashed before him. When did life end for H. G. Wells?
He looked around wildly, certain that the exhibit contained an obituary
somewhere. Thank God it wasn’t in large letters under his name. He didn’t
want to know, he didn’t want ever to know
He sagged and felt sick. He had to get away from this place. He started
for the rope barrier, forcing himself not to look at anything else in the
exhibit. Instead, over the door to the room, he saw a clock that read 4:04.
He stopped, frowned and pulled out his pocket watch. 8:04.
He moaned, now completely disoriented and on the verge of panic. He
knew that his calculations weren’t that far off, unless something drastic had
happened. His laboratory was gone, the house was gone, everything was
gone, and he appeared to be in a museum. The time wasn’t at all right, and
the displays seemed to be extra-temporal mockeries of his mind.
He heard voices and footsteps approaching the room. The presence of
those alien sounds forced him to act He saw that he could not escape
undetected, so he hurried back to the time machine, got inside and huddled
on the floor.
A tour guide led a group of fifteen into the room. “Another giant figure
to emerge from the late nineteenth century was H. G. Wells. Author,
scientist, social critic, historian and inventor,” droned the guide.
Awe-struck, Wells listened.
“Six months ago, archaeologists working ahead of London’s massive
urban-renewal project uncovered Wells’s obscure laboratory that had been
inside a bricked-up basement. And of course you all know what was found
inside.”
H.G. pushed the door open, then poked his head partway out of the
hatch so that he might see these late-twentieth-century folk.
“Ladies and gentlemen,” the guide continued with a flourish, “the
California Academy of Sciences and the Science Museum of San Francisco
are proud to have on public display the famous Wellsian time machine!”
San Francisco! How the devil had he ended up in San Francisco when
his machine was supposed to travel only along the fourth dimension? He
thought furiously and soon it came to him. Of course! If archaeologists had
“discovered” his laboratory and the time machine, then undoubtedly his
device would have gone on a world tour. Or maybe the city of San
Francisco had purchased the device outright, although he couldn’t imagine
the British Government allowing such a transaction unless the spheres of
influence had changed considerably. He remembered that in the early
nineties wealthy British royalty had purchased Egyptian relics and had them
shipped to England. So why not H. G. Wells to America? Egypt had been
weak and powerless. Was England now in a similar position? No, never.
The time machine must be on a world tour.
“Of course, the enigmatic man’s labor was fruitless, for the device is
never known to have worked.”
H.G. sat up indignantly.
A small girl in the audience saw Wells. “Mommy, what’s that funnylooking man doing in there?”
The guide turned and saw Wells slam and lock the time-machine door.
“Hey, you! You’re not supposed to be in there!”
H.G. frantically grabbed the Rotator Control and tried to force it into the
westward position so that he could get out of 1979 and back to his own
time. He couldn’t budge the lever. He had one choice. He could go farther
into the future, but he’d be damned if he’d do that, given his machine’s
present condition.
The tour guide was rapping on the door. “Sir, the exhibit is off-limits!”
With a cry, H.G. unlocked the door and shoved it open. It smashed into
the guide and sent him sprawling. Then H.G. vaulted out of the machine
and hurdled the rope barrier. The people got out of his way, some laughing
with surprise. He raced out of the room and soon was lost in a maze of
hallways and corridors. He heard whistles blowing behind him as security
guards gave chase.
He had never been so terrified in his entire life.
He came to a fire door marked “Emergency Exit” and pushed through it. An
automatic fire alarm went off which further added to the confusion of the
guards, for now they had to evacuate the building.
H.G. hurried down a short flight of stairs and found himself moving
past a series of basement rooms full of old display cases, broken pedestals
and antique junk no longer deemed worthy of the hallowed rooms upstairs.
He saw lights from the bend in the corridor, but heard no voices. He
continued past the junction in the corridor and eventually saw an exit.
He went outside, then up a flight of stairs to a concrete walk. He moved
away from the museum and tried to appear casual even though he heard an
uproar as the guards were evacuating people out the front doors. The path
led him into some trees, and once the museum was out of sight, he was
relieved.
He noticed that the weather was similar to the atmospheric conditions
which plagued London. The sky was overcast and a light fog was blowing
through the trees, although the temperature was slightly higher and the
humidity less than London’s. But the air smelled funny—it lacked the
distinctive flavor of burning coal.
He went down a curve of rustic steps, through a gateway and discovered
that he was in a Japanese garden. He felt more relaxed and paused to admire
the beauty of the flowers and the exquisite colors of the large carp in the
ponds. He touched a bonsai tree, smiled and was somewhat reassured. Up
Park (the estate where his mother lived and worked) had a garden like this
one, only much smaller and not as elaborate. It lacked the arched bridges
and the curious little shrines. Nevertheless, he recalled that he used to read
there and write an amateur newspaper which was distributed among the
domestics under his mother’s charge. He wiped away a wistful, emotional
tear. Those were the gentle, idle days when he was recovering from the
traumas of abortive apprenticeships. And those days were no more.
Suddenly he squared his shoulders and turned his back on the bonsai
tree. The garden was beautiful—no more and no less. He should accept that
as a sign that 1979 was both an old world and a new one; a world that
combined the good things of the past with the better things of the
future/present which he hadn’t seen yet. He did admit to himself, however,
that it was nice to know that the world still abounded with flowers and trees
and grass and other pastoral forms of life. He resumed walking, following a
path which led around the main pond and presumably out of the garden.
A high-pitched distant whine came from behind him. He turned. The
noise grew louder and rolled past him like thunder. He grimaced, put his
hands over his ears and dropped to his knees. Then he looked up and to his
astonishment saw a giant, metallic machine with large, sleek wings, coneshaped engines, porthole windows and blue and white markings. It was
descending through the sky, defying gravity. Good God, what was this?
Hadn’t Icarus fallen into the Aegean Sea?
H.G. stood and half ran through the gardens following the huge airship
until it dropped out of sight and its sound became a dull roar. He bubbled
with laughter; he raised and shook his fist triumphantly. Man had been
trying to fly since the days of the Greek empire. After thousands of years,
man had succeeded. The immense flying machine was proof of what H.G.
had been espousing all along: science and technology definitely meant ease,
comfort and progress.
He felt something nibbling at his feet and looked down. He was
standing in a foot and a half of water, and carp were eating his trousers. He
must have walked into the pond while trying not to lose sight of the aircraft.
Embarrassed, he stepped out of the water and walked out of the garden.
He followed a walkway through expanses of grass and trees and
realized he was in a park every bit as beautiful as anything London had to
offer eighty-six years ago. Across a lawn children were playing with a dog,
middle-aged parents were reading and lovers were sunning themselves on
blankets. The sight was peaceful and idyllic. Surely he had stepped into
Paradise, despite his initial panic in the museum. Tears came to his eyes
once again. He was glad for the human race and longed to be part of this
new world which was a definite improvement on 1893 London.
He frowned. Nostalgia for the present was just as bad as nostalgia for
the past. He could not continue just gawking through dreamy eyes.
Soon he would have to talk to someone, get his bearings, then gather his
wits so he could track down Stephenson. Going up a hill, he heard a steady
clamor that sounded like a river. Whatever, the noise was alien, and he
steeled himself for another marvelous sight.
From the summit, he saw that the park ended and was bordered by a
street. No cobblestones. But what was that noise coming from? He turned
and gasped. A mile away was an immense ribbon of concrete that curved
across the horizon. It was obviously a roadway, a modern highway, for
speeding along concrete were antlike machines that darted in and out,
creating a ballet of technology.
H.G. grinned. How clever, he thought. Those vehicles must be
descendants of the Daimler-Benz internal combustion engine and piloted by
average human beings, too. Remarkable! No horses. And no feces all over
the streets to clean up, either. Good riddance.
Suddenly he saw a bullet-shaped, red, white and blue train come over a
hill and speed alongside the highway. If he had been closer, he would have
seen “Bay Area Rapid Transit” painted on the side of the engine. The train
stopped at a platform, disgorged passengers, then whisked away with an
electric howl.
He gawked. What a beautiful, efficient, masterful piece of machinery!
Obviously it was the grandson of the underground railway, but it did not
emit huge clouds of sulfuric fumes. Marvelous.
So this is San Francisco. Splendid. London must be incredible.
H.G. left the park in a very good mood. He strolled along a sidewalk,
pausing to touch and admire the design and craftsmanship of the vehicles
parked along the street. Soon he came to an intersection where a young lady
sat on a bench under a “Bus Stop” sign. He stopped a few yards away and
gazed. Her hair was long and black and had curls that spilled over her
shoulders. Her face was both handsome and soft, with high cheekbones
vaguely reminiscent of royalty and full lips that suggested pleasure. She
was wearing a loose peasant blouse and trousers that matched! Her skin was
tan and healthy, and her shape, outlined by the casual attire, was perfect
enough to make H.G. imagine that he had landed in the Garden of Eden and
was staring at the abstract of a progressive Eve.
He continued gazing at the young lady, and images of nineteenthcentury sexual encounters passed through his mind. He wondered what
would it be like, coupling with a lass ninety years younger than he. Was it
still done in the same way? Were females still the extremely reticent half of
the human species when it came to the act of physical love? Did they still
hide their flesh under mounds of blankets, insist that the curtains be drawn
and shut their eyes tightly when their sex was penetrated? Did it still take
weeks to get them into a bedroom or to a secluded place?
H.G.’s heart pounded. Before he left he wanted a lady like this. There
had been so many disappointments in the past. Not just with Isabel, but with
the lot of them. No matter how sophisticated a woman had seemed in his
experience, they all reverted to either innocence or religion when
sandwiched in bed with him. Enlightenment? Whoosh! None of them had
ever come close. And, to tell the truth, neither had he.
His thoughts became more specific. How easy it would be to shed this
young lady of her clothing. There were no balloon skirts and layers of
petticoats and God knows how many hand traps above the waist to dispose
of. Just the blouse and the trousers. Here, in 1979.
He swallowed hard and nodded slightly. Aside from catching
Stephenson, he must definitely try some “futurological” sex. He smiled
with pleasure, not realizing that he had appeared foolish for quite a while.
The young lady finally felt his gaze, turned and glanced at him, then
quickly looked away.
Whistling, he jauntily came up alongside her. “Excuse me, madam.” He
bowed slightly. “Can you tell me where I am?”
She rolled her eyes, frowned, got up and briskly walked away.
H.G. was puzzled. He already knew that these people spoke English, so
that couldn’t be the problem—unless it was his dialect or choice of words.
Then he inspected himself and understood. His clothes were out of date.
Not only that, his shoes and trousers were wet and muddy, and he could
only imagine what the rest of him looked like. He must cash in the jewelry
for some modern American currency, buy some clothes and make himself
appear respectable.
The other side of the street seemed populated, so he figured that he
might as well begin there. He started to cross the intersection, not really
understanding or caring about the red light atop the green metal lamppost.
When he was in the middle of the street, several vehicles came around a
curve, speeding toward the intersection at forty-five miles per hour. He was
looking the other way when he heard a horn blast. He spun around,
horrified. The gleaming metallic machine was hurtling toward him. Then
came a horrible screech, and black smoke billowed up from the wheels of
the craft. At the last moment it swerved and stopped. The young man who
was operating the machine leaned out of a window and yelled:
“You stupid son of a bitch!”
And then the other vehicles were upon him, their operators playing a
surprised and grotesque zigzag, trying to avoid him and each other. The
cacophony of horns was deafening.
H.G. sprinted for the sidewalk, but just then a man riding what appeared
to be a very large motorized bicycle rounded the corner at high speed. H.G.
dove to get out of the way, hit the pavement and just barely jerked his legs
out of the machine’s path in time. The edge of the rear fender caught his
trailing coat and left a large rent in the distinguished tweed.
Extremely shaken, H.G. scrambled up and fled back into the park. He
hurried through then crossed long, sloping lawns at a calmer pace, moving
back in the direction from which he had come. He followed a little-used
path down into a glen thick with trees and foliage. He sat on a rock, rested
and tried to quell the anxieties resulting from his first brush with an alien
technology. He told himself that the incident was probably his own damned
fault since he was unfamiliar with the laws governing the mass use of
machines. Then he grew annoyed, for he remembered the words of his
brilliant and fascinating biology instructor, T. E. Huxley: You must respect
the great potential power of science and treat it wisely. Above all, never
place science above the realm of humanity, for there is nothing as sacred as
the individual rights of man.
Perhaps it wasn’t my fault, he thought.
He got up to inspect the glen and noticed that the sun had set.
Undoubtedly all the places of business were closed, so he wouldn’t make
any progress this night selling his jewelry.
He wondered how Stephenson was doing. Badly, he hoped. Then H. G.
shuddered. He suddenly had a feeling that Stephenson was all right. Anyone
who could elude Scotland Yard for five years and carry on as a respectable
surgeon would survive in any time sphere.
Although hungry, thirsty, in sore need of a bath and clean clothes, he
decided to spend the night in the park. He was in no shape to test the mettle
or hospitality of the San Franciscans. Since insects abounded in the glen—
especially mosquitoes—he left the area and climbed the hill where he had
been before. At the top, he curled up between a tree and a bush and used his
shredded coat as a pillow. He listened to the strange sounds of the city as
night came. God, what he wouldn’t give for that pot of tea Mrs. Nelson had
made for him just a few hours ago, not to mention a bottle of passable
French claret. Not even in his unhappy, poverty-mired childhood had he
ever felt so isolated and alone.
And then another feeling settled over him like a dull ache. It was more
than a sense of helplessness in an alien world. It was the fear of
permanently losing his own age. He couldn’t shake it.
He slept fitfully, to say the least.
OceanofPDF.com
4
He woke with a start just after eight o’clock in the morning to the steady
roar of rush hour. He rubbed the film of sleep from his eyes, then felt a
burning sensation in them and assumed that it was due to a poor night’s rest.
Finally, the day came into focus. From his vantage he stared down at the
modern highway, his red eyes blinking.
He frowned. The eight lanes of machines moved slowly and frequently
jammed up, unlike the evening before. It was a clear case of too little road
for too many machines. He glanced up and saw machines in the sky circling
the highway like annoying soloists in a mechanical symphony. They
weren’t as big as the airship he had seen the day before, but hovered much
like hummingbirds. His analytic mind quickly figured out that the sky
machines were monitoring the snarl of road machines below. He grinned,
for he already had a much simpler solution. Put layers of highway, one atop
the other. What could be more logical? Or natural?
He stood, stretched his stiff muscles, then coughed and spat up blood.
That confirmed it. One more night out on the ground and he was sure to
have a recurrence of the tuberculosis. He resolutely left his lair, stomach
growling, hand tightly clutching the jewels in his coat pocket. He walked
down the hill, out of the glen, then across the lawns, now covered with dew.
He found a fountain and drank long and deep, then splashed water on his
face and felt refreshed. His spirits rose a little, and he left the park.
This time when he came to an intersection he wisely waited for other
pedestrians to materialize, then did exactly as they did when it came to
crossing in front of the idling machines. He eyed the vehicles with a touch
of suspicion while reminding himself to keep his reactions subdued so that
no one would take undue notice of him.
One strange spectacle compelled him to stop and stare. Workers
wearing metal hats and thick orange vests were in the bucket of a yellow
crane fifteen feet in the air attaching something to a streetlight. The object
was long and flimsy, red and green and dotted with large silver stars. Wells
turned and saw that every streetlight up ahead of him was adorned with the
same, curious, elongated ornament.
Another truck was loaded with the things, and more workers were
wiring branches of holly to the bases of the streetlights. Not real holly, for
there was no pungent odor. Imitation trees on streetlights? Metallic
streamers overhead? What had the world come to? Or was there to be a
celebration of some kind?
When he saw an upside-down, cardboard St. Nicholas in the back of the
truck, it came to him. He’d always heard that Americans were much more
garish than their English counterparts, but decorations in the street? All this
to celebrate the birthday of an ex-fisherman who had a way with words and
philosophies? Obviously, humanity had not progressed beyond the twelve
days of Christmas. He wondered how religion could still have a foothold in
a society advanced enough to produce giant airships. Maybe it didn’t. He
looked at the bright decorations again. They weren’t religious in nature.
Perhaps all they did was announce that the season for gifts and good
fellowship was at hand. But Christmas was seven weeks away, he thought.
Then he smiled and approved. If the holiday atmosphere had been extended
from twelve days to seven weeks, that was good. People would be more
courteous than usual.
He turned and ran into a cluster of shoppers, knocking brightly wrapped
packages out of a lady’s arms.
“Oh, I’m dreadfully sorry!” He moved to assist the startled lady, but she
shrank away from him. Puzzled, he stepped back, then bent to retrieve her
packages.
“Get away from those!” She pushed him away, scooped up her packages
and hurried off.
H.G. stared after her. He didn’t understand why the lady had been so
irate. Especially since she obviously had just purchased an armload of gifts.
He recalled that buying presents for others always made him feel joyful—
like when he’d given Mrs. Nelson a mother-of-pearl set of combs on her
birthday and she had rushed upstairs so he wouldn’t see her crying with
happiness. Perhaps this lady had felt compelled to make her purchases. If
so, she would naturally feel resentful. That would explain her outburst.
He managed to walk the rest of the way to the heart of the city without
incident, although he found his breathing more labored than usual and
gradually developed a splitting headache. He attributed both ailments to a
lack of food and his consumptive history. He was only puzzled by the hazy,
yellow-brown color of the sky.
A half block east of Union Square, H.G. saw a sign advertising a jewelry
store on the mezzanine floor of a ten-story building.
He pushed through the glass doors of the building and observed people
going up what appeared to be a modern-day flight of stairs. Only these
people weren’t using their arms or legs! While they remained stationary, the
stairs moved.
He studied the device and nodded. Obviously the moving stairs existed
to augment lifts, and if machines could move people upward, why should
men waste their own energy doing it? Once again H.G. approved, then felt
sad that he hadn’t been born into the late twentieth century and its
marvelous potpourri of electronic wizardry. He remembered that he had
been so thrilled when the lighting man who installed the incandescents in
his laboratory had explained the rudiments of filaments, circuitry and basic
electricity even though he had already discovered most of those theories for
himself while designing the time machine.
He moved to the base of the escalator and paused. He worried about
getting caught in the moving stairs, then shook off the feeling as a mere
Victorian apprehension. He stepped on board and smiled. He was free to
move. He raised his foot, took a tentative step and bounced upward. With
three more quick steps, he felt that for an instant he’d left gravity behind,
then stumbled onto the mezzanine. That was the reason for the device. A
man could go up and down twice as fast as normal!
He found the jewelry store, entered and politely asked a salesman if he
might discuss a matter of extreme importance with the proprietor.
Eventually, a tiny man with white hair and ornate, miniature hands
approached Wells and introduced himself as Max Ince, the manager. H.G.
announced the nature of his business and was led to a counter at the back of
the store. Ince took the Wellsian heirlooms and began examining them
under his jeweler’s light.
H.G. watched Ince for a while, then saw a display featuring timepieces.
The tag on one read “Digital Watch.” He began playing with the buttons
and became totally absorbed. Occasionally, he chuckled with enjoyment.
Finally, Ince sighed and looked up over the top of his glasses.
“Absolutely gorgeous, young man. I haven’t seen stones or settings like
these since before the war.”
“War?” said H.G., taken aback. “What war?”
“You know,” replied Ince with a pinched smile. “The war.”
“Oh.” H.G. blushed. “Perhaps, in time, he would get to a library.
Ince frowned. “If you don’t mind me asking, where did you get these?”
“They were a gift from my mother. She has a post at Up Park. An
associate of Mrs. Fetherstonhaugh who bequeathed her these heirlooms in
the first place.”
“London?”
“Greater London.” H.G. sniffed, but not pretentiously. His nose had
started to run. “How much are they worth?”
“Roughly?”
H.G. nodded.
“Around fifteen thousand dollars.” Ince subtly gestured at the dirt on
Wells’s clothes. “But for a non-bonded sale, you would get much less.”
“Whatever is fair,” said H.G., relieved. “Include this remarkable
timepiece and I’m ready to do business.”
Ince beamed. From a counter drawer he took out a sales contract and a
host of other forms which he placed before H.G. “If you’d be so kind as to
fill these out, sir. And I’ll need your passport, visa, driver’s license and a
credit card. Oh, yes, your current address and phone number, too. It’ll take
about a week to process your check.”
“A week? Could you give me something on account?”
“With proper identification and verification, we might work something
out.”
“What do you mean, verification?” He ripped up the forms. “I’m not
running for Parliament, I’m selling you some of my bloody jewelry!”
Ince raised his eyebrows. “Do you have a customs declaration, sir?”
“Wait a minute! You don’t think I stole these, do you? Good God, man,
I’m—I’m an Englishman,” he said weakly.
Ince turned his back on H.G. and walked into his office with the jewels.
H.G. leaned over the counter and saw the little man work the keyboard of a
small electric machine that looked remarkably similar to a “collective
mind” invention he had made rough sketches of about six months ago. (His
device—when he built it—would store the thoughts of great men in copper
armatures and then combine the ideas by electronic impulses, the notion
being that a synthesis of wisdom would enable mankind to progress at
breakneck speed.) He speculated, with sudden indignation, that the machine
Ince was using served a far more mundane function, that being to test the
veracity of his claim.
“I say, Mr. Ince!” H.G. ejaculated. “Just what is it that you are doing
with my heirlooms?”
“Checking them against the computers.” He returned to the counter,
slowly shaking his head. “And I am sorry to say that I can’t find a record of
them.”
H.G. grabbed the little man’s arm in desperation. “What could you give
me for them right now? In cash?”
“Two thousand,” Ince replied confidentially.
“Sold.”
Ince moved back to the safe in his office at a hurried shuffle.
H.G. glared after him. “Bloody brigand!”
He left the jewelry store with the money and a digital watch that he now
proudly wore on his left wrist. As he left the building he pressed the buttons
in various sequences, getting the time, date, year, barometric pressure and
number of days left in 1979.
He rounded a corner and smelled food. His nose locked on the delicious
odors, and he quickened his pace. Moments later he stood in front of a new
restaurant. It had a dark-brown roof, light-brown stucco sides and large,
tinted-glass panels all the way around. The building was surrounded by
pavement with white lines that sectioned off uniform rectangles where
people could leave their vehicles when inside. H.G.’s reaction to the
macadam was to cross it cautiously because the patrons seemed to arrive
and leave in extremely short periods of time. The service must be
incredible, he thought. Either that or the food eaten in 1979 must not take
long to prepare or consume. He looked up at the sign. “McDONALD’s—
Billions and Billions Served.”
He entered the establishment and was surprised that it vaguely
resembled the interior of a London restaurant in 1893, only everything was
new and shiny. The wallpaper was a montage of printed old photographs
and lithographed street scenes. Of course! The motif was San Francisco’s
Barbary Coast of the nineteenth century. H.G. wondered what purpose the
decor served, for there was no mood or atmosphere to the place. People
were coming and going too quickly to remember what they’d eaten, in his
opinion.
He touched a brown tabletop, then a bright-orange swivel chair and
marveled at their composition. It wasn’t wood or metal, yet it looked like
both. What was the curious substance? He restrained himself from
investigating further, for he looked up and saw people staring at him.
He moved across the room and stood in a line, which seemed to be
proper behavior if one wanted to eat. Then he looked at a translucent menu
(curiously lit from behind—the reason escaping him) because that was what
everyone else in the line was doing. He read the list of items sold, and the
only three words that made any sense to him were “coffee,” “tea” and
“milk.” He had no idea of what to purchase, so he listened to how the
customers in front of him ordered their meals. After hearing five such
exchanges, he slowly nodded, then frowned. Yes, the language was
definitely English, but the idiom baffled him. What the devil were “quarterpounders without”?
When he got to the head of the line, he had memorized a previous order
and even correctly carried out the ritual of collecting three napkins and a
straw, which he stuffed into his bedraggled coat pocket.
“Yes, sir, may I help you?” said the smiling counter girl dressed in a
green- and white-striped outfit.
Her clothes looked too bright and shiny to be wool or even cotton. He
assumed that they were a different kind of fiber, perhaps derivative from the
same glossy matter that covered the tables and chairs. Once again, he had to
restrain himself. He wanted to reach out and feel the material.
“I’d like a Big Mac and fries,” he said hesitantly.
“Anything to drink?”
“Tea, please.”
“Here or to go?”
“Here.”
He paid her with a twenty-dollar bill, humbly accepted his change and
food, then escaped to a booth in the far corner of a room called “The
Pirates’ Den.” He picked up a fry and nodded with familiarity. It was
obviously a chip, and “fry” was the American derivation. But when he took
a bite, he found that the fry tasted like undercooked dough. It was obviously
not a chip, and he assumed that he had just eaten a wedge of protein,
possibly manufactured from grass seed. He sipped his tea, weak by British
standards, but warm and stimulating nonetheless. He regarded the tea bag as
a clever little convenience—no more picking oolong leaves out of one’s
teeth at embarrassing moments.
On the seat beside him was the San Francisco Chronicle. He picked it
up, jammed his mouth full of fries, then scanned a Herb Caen column
which touted that the restaurants of San Francisco were superior to those of
Modesto. He shook his head, dropped the paper and muttered with horror,
“My God, what have they done to the English language?”
He took his Big Mac out of its box, after concluding that the styrofoam
was a rubberized paper manufactured to withstand weather extremes.
Perhaps modern writers used sheets of it to ensure posterity. Then he
unwrapped and studied the sandwich. The aroma overwhelmed him, but
this was no time to be critical. He was famished. He chomped and chewed,
then raised his eyebrows.
“Umm.”
He took another bite with gusto. The Big Mac was exquisite. Perhaps
the most delicious food he had ever eaten.
He devoured it and was about to go back and purchase another when he
felt someone staring at him. He turned and saw a small boy trying to make
sense out of his old-fashioned clothes and drooping walrus mustache.
“You in a commercial, or what?”
By the time H.G. found a respectable clothing store he was used to the
traffic and surprised that he seemed to be moving about faster than the
machines. Although his ears had not yet adjusted to the downtown level of
decibels, he felt light-years away from his bizarre night in the park. And
there was still a smattering of old buildings in the city, reminiscent of
nineteenth-century London. Their gray-stone façades reassured him,
whereas the reflective exteriors of the newer buildings made him
apprehensive. Still, he now had 1979 food lining his stomach, and once
contemporary fashion draped his form, he wouldn’t have anything to worry
about—except Leslie John Stephenson.
He entered the clothiers and was patient with the salesman, who
couldn’t get over his heavy, four-button (ripped and dirty) tweeds; high,
matching vest; white shirt and yellow silk tie.
“Is this what they’re wearing in London now?”
“It’s been a while since I left.”
The salesman suggested high-waisted, prefaded jeans, a tailored shirt
with ruffles, topped off with a snap-brim hat for starters. But once H.G.
learned that some men did indeed still wear suits and ties, there was no
dissuading him. He selected a ready-made light-brown two-button suit with
a vest, a beige dress shirt, a maroon tie and dark-brown Oxfords. The
salesman was impressed with his impeccable taste.
In the dressing room, H.G. put on the shirt and pants, felt for the buttons
and was momentarily bewildered until he found the zipper that closed the
fly in half a second. He raised his eyebrows, tucked in the shirt and moved
about a little. Great Scott, what comfort, he thought. The trousers were not
nearly as bulky as his old ones. Also, they were lined and cut to fit his
shape! And the shirt—it didn’t balloon out with yards of unnecessary cloth
that needed blousing; it just sort of naturally draped around him as if he’d
worn it for years. And the feel of the material was almost electric!
He slipped into the vest, quickly knotted the tie, threw on the coat and
hurried out of the dressing room. He felt liberated—as if the clothes he had
worn before had been designed for an elephant. The ones he had on now
made him feel good and smart and sophisticated. He did a little twirl in
front of the mirror and beamed. Then he twisted his mustache into shape,
stepped back and admired himself—still a distinguished English gentleman,
but more important, a late-twentieth-century human being. Who said that
clothes did not make the man?
He strode to the cash register where the salesman waited, hovering over
the bill.
“You look very nice, sir, very nice.”
“Thank you.”
“It comes to $476.18.”
H.G. slowly counted out the money, not yet familiar with American
currency, but astute enough to realize that he was paying a damnable
amount for a haberdashery. “Doesn’t go very far, does it?”
“Not anymore, sir.”
“It isn’t the pound, of course,” he added provincially.
“That’s for sure.” The salesman laughed. “I hear they’re going to
devalue it again.”
“The pound?” H.G. was aghast.
“That’s right. You got any left, I’d exchange them for good, old,
almighty Yankee dollars.”
He hurried out of the store, not bothering to take his old clothes. The
salesman had given him an idea. If Leslie John Stephenson were to survive
in San Francisco, then he—just like H. G. Wells—would have to have some
American money. So if he had any English pounds with him, one of his first
acts in 1979 would be to exchange them. Since H.G. had nothing to lose, he
figured that he might as well begin hunting at the banks.
He stopped. Not just any bank, he thought. Stephenson may be a
sexually perverted killer, but he still is an Englishman. He would choose a
bank that made him feel at home. In San Francisco? He smiled. If Lloyd’s
had offices all over the world a century ago, surely other British enterprises
must have followed suit.
He got directions to the Bank of England from a policeman and was
pleased to learn that it was located only a block away.
He crossed Union Square with a jaunty, unabashed stride. Above the traffic
noise he heard a bell clanging that sounded distinctly alien to the honks and
roars and digital click-clacks of 1979. He turned and beamed. A cable car
loaded with tourists rolled across an intersection and started uphill. H.G.
was reassured. Despite the mighty power of the electron, a nineteenthcentury relic was still functioning. He had seen schematics of the cable cars
in The Times not too long ago. So, San Francisco has a sense of history and
a little heart, he thought. Good for them and bully for me.
He allowed himself a nostalgic wave at the Union Jack hanging over the
Bank of England and pushed through the revolving glass doors. Once
inside, he imagined that the air smelled better. The atmosphere definitely
seemed more stately.
Across the large room from the row of tellers were a half-dozen desks
that he correctly assumed belonged to officers of the bank. He frowned.
Something was missing. He briefly closed his eyes and drew a mental
picture of the Lloyd’s in Mornington Crescent where he usually conducted
his financial transactions. Of course! Here, there was no exchange board on
the wall behind the tellers to keep customers aware of the daily fluctuations
in currency, especially on the European market. Perhaps there was no
longer any need for an exchange board. Perhaps that information was on
one of those small machines that the jeweler, Max Ince, had called a
computer.
He sighed. Progress was one thing, but how the devil could the Bank of
England deem itself British without the exchange board? Regardless, he
was going to have to consult an officer of the bank. He went to the first
desk, humming along with music that emanated from the walls. “Follow the
Yellow Brick Road”?
A young woman who he guessed was twenty-two or -three sashayed out
of a door and over to the desk. She was a little shorter than H.G. and had
dark blond, shoulder-length hair with a few subdued curls. Her facial
features were delicate, with just enough tan to make her resemble a “Gibson
girl.” Her eyes were large and very brown.
H.G. gawked, but not at the eyes. She was wearing a dark-blue pants
suit. True, he had seen women on the street in such interesting attire, but in
the Bank of England? In pants tight enough around the hips and thighs to
suggest the actual shape of the mons veneris? His mons pubis began to
twitch, and he blushed. He tried to keep his eyes above her waist, but that
didn’t help, either. Every time she moved, her well-shaped breasts moved,
too, obviously freed from the constrictions of a corselet. He recalled the
massive physical and psychological barriers presented by the Merry Widow.
It had taken him four years to learn how to unhook the monstrous device
without pinching his partners.
She felt his stare. “May I help you?” she asked in a low, melodious
voice that made him shiver.
“I’m—I’m waiting for an officer of the bank, thank you,” he replied in
reedy tones.
She smiled and gestured at a chair alongside the desk. “I’m a bank
officer. Why don’t you sit down?”
“But you’re—”
“I know, I know. You expected someone with an English accent, not to
mention the decor à la California. I apologize for the plastic palms.” She
made a sweeping gesture that suggested inner poise and grace. “This your
first trip to the States?”
H.G. managed a nod and sat down. He had mentally prepared himself
for technological advances before he left, but a woman working for the
Bank of England in a management capacity? Suffrage was one thing, but
who the devil was taking care of the home? What had become of the timehonored afternoon tryst? He thought for a moment, then logically figured
that if a man could slip away from the office for a few hours, a woman
could too. And his hat was off to the chap lucky enough to be caught in
flagrante delicto with this specimen here. “Just what did you want, sir?”
He looked away, for he had just gotten a whiff of her perfume and it had
done him in. He adjusted his coat and crossed his legs, trying to hide his
erection. His complexion turned crimson.
He realized that if this bank were anything like commercial
establishments in 1893 London, a person could not just walk in and ask for
personal information. Such information could be expected only as a casual
by-product of a normal business transaction. H.G. didn’t know if the same
state of affairs was generic to 1979 San Francisco, but if anything he should
proceed with caution. He decided to start with the Wellsian charm. He
extended his hand. “I’m Herbert George Wells.” His grin was all teeth.
“Amy Robbins.” Instead of shaking his hand, she placed a business card
between his fingers.
Undaunted, H.G. slipped the card into his coat pocket. “Could you tell
me a little about the services your bank offers potential customers?”
Twenty minutes later H.G. had applied for both Visa and Master Charge
cards. Also, Amy had convinced him that if he were carrying a sizable
amount of cash, he should purchase some traveler’s checks. Soon after that
he had almost finished signing approximately fifteen hundred dollars worth.
By then she had warmed to him considerably, despite his frequent stares,
which became more pronounced when she took phone calls.
He pushed the stack of checks to the center of the desk for her
inspection, then leaned back. She buzzed through the checks, looked up and
smiled.
“Okay. Now all I have to do is see some identification.”
“I’m afraid that I don’t have any.”
She frowned.
“You see, this morning I lost my traveling companion at the museum.
We were separated in the midst of, ah… a fire drill. He has my valise and
all my papers are in it.”
“That’s a problem,” she commented. “Very definitely a problem.” She
looked down at her desk and thought hard. She had been with the bank for
almost two years now and was generally regarded as the most trustworthy
middle-management employee. Despite her casual nature, she performed
every function by the book, much to the delight of the English-born-andbred-and-educated vice presidents. She did so because this job was her first,
and she wanted to prove to everyone that she was a capable, competent
human being, in spite of dropping out of college to get married and then
failing in that, too.
Against all expectations, she had come to San Francisco on her own and
so far had forged her own way. And she loved her freedom and
independence. The basis for it all was the job; she did not want to make any
mistakes. And the book said, “Always ask for identification.”
But here was a man the likes of whom she had never encountered
before. Genteel. Warm. Pleasant, yet unusual. Archaic. Normally, she
trusted no one, but when this man looked at her, she felt all her professional
common sense go awry.
“Well, I certainly hope you find your friend.” She smiled. “It’s been a
pleasure serving you, Mr. Wells.” She extended her hand.
“Herbert.” He sighed with relief, then took her hand and held it for
much longer than a handshake. “Perhaps you would care to show me
around the city. When we both have the time, of course.”
“Sure. My number’s on the card I gave you. Give me a call.”
“A call?”
She patted the arm of Ma Bell. “Telephone me.”
“Oh, yes, of course.” He stood and hesitated. He had already alluded to
Stephenson, and she hadn’t picked up on it. He had a horrible feeling he
was going to walk away empty-handed.
“Was there something else I could help you with, Herbert?”
“As a matter of fact, yes.” He brightened and sat down again. “I’m
supposed to have dinner with my traveling companion. I think I mentioned
that I was separated from him earlier?”
“Yes. He has your valise.”
“Well, I have no idea where he is, and I thought there might be a slight
chance that he was in here earlier in the day to exchange some British
currency.”
“What’s his name?”
“Leslie John Stephenson. Step-hen-son. He’s a surgeon. A rather tall
and dark chap.”
“Oh, yes, Dr. Stephenson was here. I guess it’s pretty obvious you both
just arrived.” She blushed. “Anyway, if it’s any help, I recommended the
Jack Tar Hotel on Geary Street. You might find him there.”
H.G. smiled with immense satisfaction. “Is it very far from here?”
“Nothing’s far from anywhere in San Francisco.”
“You’ve been so very kind and helpful, Miss Robbins. Thank you ever
so much.” He took her hand again, only this time he kissed it. She bubbled
with laughter. He stood, but he knew he couldn’t just dash off. That would
be rude. Besides, this girl was extremely vivacious. After the business with
Stephenson was properly resolved, who knew what might happen?
“Perhaps we should have lunch together in a day or so.”
“I’d love to.”
He leaned over to her—one hand on the desk frightfully close to her
right breast—and smiled. “I found the most marvelous restaurant not far
from here. Scottish, I believe.”
“What’s the name of the place?”
“McDonald’s.”
And then he was gone. She stared after him, mouth open. Neither of
them immediately noticed that he had forgotten his traveler’s checks.
OceanofPDF.com
5
H.G. pushed through the bank’s glass doors and once again found himself
out on the street. The aura of Amy’s presence still surrounded him, the
result being that he glowed like the cherubic altar boy he wasn’t. He strolled
along, beaming foolishly and thinking about how wonderful it was to be
alive. Then he walked into a parking meter, and the sudden pain in his chest
brought him to his senses. After all, he wasn’t on a bloody holiday, he was
in pursuit of a depraved killer. Women and wanderlust would have to wait.
He quickened his pace, moving toward the intersection of Post Street
and Grant Avenue. He dodged and vaulted ahead of the other pedestrians,
his jaws resolutely clamped shut. Stephenson would soon be within his
grasp; justice would be served.
When he reached the corner, the signal light abruptly changed, and the
machines accelerated across the intersection as one roaring metal phalanx.
Their fumes briefly enveloped him, and he recalled the unpleasantness of
London’s underground. He wondered, where is San Francisco’s?
A well-dressed, gray-haired lady carrying a stack of Christmas packages
leaned into the street, raised an arm and extended a finger as if she were
pointing at something strange in the sky. H.G. looked up and saw nothing
but gray overcast. He frowned. Could the lady be testing the wind?
A drab yellow vehicle with prices emblazoned on its doors stopped by
the lady.
The lady got inside and said something to the driver. He nodded and
took off.
H.G. smiled. What could have been more logical? The ugly yellow
machine was obviously the descendant of the English hansom.
Then he pursed his lips and frowned. So far in 1979 his view of the
internal-combustion-engine-driven vehicles had alternated between
admiration and suspicion. But that didn’t matter, for he was going to have to
make use of one of the modern cabs if he ever hoped to catch up with Leslie
John Stephenson. He hesitated. He cursed himself. Now was no time for
second thought. After all, if he had the courage to strap himself into a time
machine, why the sudden apprehension about getting into another kind of
machine?
He shook his head and stepped to the curb. Half hidden by a lamppost
and a sign, he timidly raised his arm and pointed one finger skyward.
The light turned yellow, and Wells saw a cab a half block away hurtling
toward the intersection. Then, at the last moment, the vehicle swerved
across Grant Avenue’s three one-way lanes—horn blasting—and smoked to
a stop inches from H.G.’s left foot. He gasped and jumped back, arm still
raised, finger still pointing. He glared indignantly at the driver. What cheek!
“You want a cab?” The driver pointed at Wells’s upstretched arm. “Or
are you bidding on a street sign?”
H.G. opened the rear door and gingerly got into the cab. He was
immediately disappointed by the cheap interior, the collapsed seat springs
and the odor of carbon monoxide. The inside of the machine was utterly
primitive, with no handmade British touches to offset its unattractive nature.
“Where to?”
“The Jack Tar Hotel.”
H.G. saw the driver press a pedal with his foot. The cab jerked up to the
intersection.
The brief acceleration lurched H.G. forward, then tossed him back
against the seat. He smiled and suppressed a giggle. The cab was obviously
in disrepair. He had always assumed that the technology of the future would
be clean and in perfect operating condition. Not so. If a hansom can rust
and rot, why not a Yellow Cab? He conjured up an image of all the new and
marvelous things he had seen, and they were heaped into a gigantic
mountain of waste. Bent, broken and twisted, the mechanical creations of
man cooked under a hot sun that would eventually dissolve them. Nearby, a
man of the future, wearing a dirty loincloth and holding an ancient section
of pipe as a club, scratched himself and wondered what god the huge pile of
junk was a monument to.
H.G. could no longer contain himself. He burst out laughing.
The driver swiveled his head around like a bald eagle. “What’s so
funny?”
“Nothing.” He became curious. “My good man, how often do you take
your vehicle into the shop?”
“The garage? It was there last week.”
The light changed. The driver pressed down hard, and the cab leaped
forward, taking H.G.’s breath away.
“See? Really gets out and moves, don’t it? You want a better pickup
than this, you got to get into a race car. Like the ’72 Plymouth I used to run
at the track back in Decatur.”
H.G. grew accustomed to the motion and speed of the vehicle very
quickly. Unlike his reaction to the time machine, he did not become sick
and disoriented. He guessed that was true because the Yellow Cab was
motoring linearly, whereas his time machine moved centrifugally and at a
much higher speed. He found this ground travel pleasant, even exhilarating,
and wondered if there were some law of physics which he could adapt in
order to make travel along the fourth dimension more agreeable. Nothing
immediately came to his mind, so he decided that that was a problem for
future afternoons in the laboratory. Right now, the cab was idling at another
red light, and suddenly he longed for more speed and maneuvers.
“How fast will this vehicle go?”
“Around ninety. Ninety-five.”
“Oh, really?” H.G.’s eyes widened.
The driver assumed that Wells was challenging him. “Yeah. Really.” He
grabbed a small metal device with an attached cord from the center of the
dashboard, pressed it into his face, pushed a button on it and began barking.
“Breaker, breaker, this is Kojak-the-Hack going west on Grant. Any CHiPs
between my wheels and the deep blue? Over?”
H.G. gawked at the driver. It wasn’t the device that impressed him, for
he’d already seen the telephone in operation; rather it was the language. It
sounded like a combination of Scottish and Gaelic with an added touch of
Prussian, all delivered with an American twang.
“Negative, Hack, negative. All the CHiPs I seen is on their way to a 10–
49 in Daly City. Happy RPMs. You gotta clean slate to the Golden Gate.”
The driver ended his conversation, then hunched over the steering wheel
and glowered at the street ahead.
The light turned green.
The driver pushed his foot to the floor, and the vehicle roared across the
intersection. In eight seconds Kojak-the-Hack had slammed through the
gears, and his yellow juggernaut was flying down Grant Avenue at sixty,
lurching through traffic like a supercharged tank. He bounced in the seat
and rode the wheel with his entire bulk, applying body English when
needed. He also used his horn frequently—in most cases where a more
prudent and sane motorist would apply the brakes.
At first H.G. just stared at the driver with awe and didn’t know what to
make of the man’s antics. Then he discerned that the driver was engaged in
a very personal activity, one that seemed vaguely familiar, yet out of place.
The grunts and groans of the driver were quasi-erotic, and H.G. realized
that the man was in the middle of a private, sexual form of ritual, and he
was so carried away that he seemed to have forgotten that H.G. was in the
backseat. He talked to his cab as if it were an enthusiastic woman bucking
under his squat, sweaty frame. H.G. had read with both scientific and
prurient interest about certain activities common to lonely shepherds, but
never before had he heard of lascivious behavior between a man and a
machine. What would one term such an impropriety? It wasn’t onanism
because a machine was involved. H.G. thought hard, then coined it
“technophilia.” H.G. blushed and looked away. True, the sensations of
speed, power and acceleration were exhilarating, but in his view, sexual
relations brought on an entirely different set of emotions. Or was it that
along with advanced technology came depersonalization? Had sex, too,
become mechanical? The driver ran a red light, then swung onto Columbus
Avenue doing a good seventy-five. The tires squealed and smoked, and the
cab almost turned over, but he deftly jerked the wheel back to the right,
straightened out and increased speed.
“Come on, show me, baby! Come on! Faster, Faster!”
H.G. was left gasping and giddy by the turn; he laughed with
excitement. The continued high-speed swerves were thrilling to him, and he
found that he, too, was becoming emotionally involved with the cab. He
gripped the front seat with both hands and silently urged the vehicle to even
greater mechanical feats.
The driver suddenly braked and turned onto Union Street. Then he
accelerated again, and the cab sped up a very steep hill, every bolt and joint
shuddering. At the top of the rise, the vehicle shot into the air and floated
for thirty feet before nosing down and slamming to the pavement.
Surprised, H.G. let out a whoosh of air, then clapped his hands in delight.
“Again!” he cried. “Again!”
The driver obliged. He did six more hill jumps and was about to attempt
a seventh when the cab overheated and popped its loosely locked radiator
cap. He cursed as the temperature-gauge needle bounced into the red, then
stopped his beloved machine. He got out, lifted the hood and backed away
as the clouds of steam billowed up and dissipated. The engine groaned and
ticked.
While the cab rested, and cooled, H.G. sighed and leaned back in the
seat. The wild ride had left him drained and devoid of tension. He uttered a
giggle. Had he, too, just experienced “technophilia”?
The driver closed up the hood, got back inside the cab and started the
engine. He slowly pulled away from the curb, a serene smile on his
otherwise blank face.
The rest of the trip was staid and uneventful, but H.G. didn’t notice, for
he had his head back on the seat, his eyes closed, and was smiling. His
imagination was back there rocketing off concrete summits in quiet
residential areas. When he reluctantly climbed out of the cab, he was no
longer the same.
H.G. Wells had fallen inexorably in love with the automobile.
Leslie John Stephenson sat at the dining table in his hotel suite and picked
at the escargots he had ordered from room service. Although tired, he was
satisfied with the progress he had made in the short time since he’d arrived
in 1979. After he had left the museum, it had taken him less than an hour to
locate a free hot supper and a warm bed at the St. Vincent De Paul Rescue
Mission east of the park. And just this morning he had gotten a free ride
into the city and had exchanged some of the gold sovereigns he always
carried in his money belt for several hundred dollars American. Then he
had purchased several outfits of clothes and was now lounging in a onehundred-and-fifty-dollar-per-day suite high above the annoying metallic
sounds of the street. He smiled. Not bad for a fugitive from Scotland Yard.
He pushed his lunch away and went back to a poem he was working on;
he was impressed with the effortless way in which the modern pen with the
internal source of ink moved across the Jack Tar stationery.
“An Ode to Joan of Arc”
You whom the flames twist around;
Smiling, you utter no sound.
Your mouth is hot with desire
To caress the inevitable fire …
He put the pen down and poured another glass of Beefeater’s, then got up
from the table and went out onto the balcony. He gazed at the overcast sky
and the sweep of square buildings that sloped away from the hotel. The
sight reminded him of the view of Bath from the library of his family’s
country estate that now belonged to one of his simpering older brothers. He
took a slug of gin.
Aesculapius. That had been home once. That was the name his
dictatorial father had given to the estate because he was a doctor, and he had
three sons who he insisted become doctors, and he had a daughter who
would no doubt marry a doctor. Stephenson, Sr., had envisioned himself as
a latter-day Squire Allworthy, and once a month he would stage fox hunts,
driving his intrepid hounds to the limit of their endurance, then hold forth
for his friends in front of the great stone fireplace. On such occasions young
Leslie and his siblings were banned from the front portion of the house, and
their mother was reduced to the role of sniveling alewife.
Aesculapius. Stephenson took another gulp of gin. That was where he
had gone home to after his first year at the university. That was where his
love for his dark-haired, ivory-skinned sister had matured and flowered.
That was where he had seduced her—upon the meadow behind the
caretaker’s house on a warm summer afternoon, the air heavy with pollen
and sweet odors. He had interpreted her eagerness as a sign of true love and
at the height of his passion asked her to run away with him and marry him.
There had never been another woman. Just her. She replied without remorse
that she was content where she was and that while she might like him at this
particular moment, his passion had been preceded by others. “Who?” he
cried with anguish. He learned that the caretaker had been first and that she
had lain with their father—not once, but many times since.
She had unleashed a demon.
Aesculapius. Home. He took another quick swallow of liquor. The place
where early in the evening that same day he had tried to kill his sister with a
carving knife when he could no longer contain his rage and humiliation. He
would have succeeded, too, if his father hadn’t heard her screams, come
into the room and beat him senseless with a fire poker.
Aesculapius. A former residence. He had been back once, interrupting
his studies at the Cambridge medical school to take the train down for the
reading of his father’s will. A pastoral setting for a funeral. A place where
he had told the vicar and his brothers that he thought it fitting that the
cancer which had consumed the old man had made his death slow and
painful. He had inherited nothing. His sister had not returned and no one
knew where she was. The day he left, his brothers committed his mother,
for she was found in the kennels groveling with the hounds.
He had nothing left but himself, his dog-eared volumes of the Sturm
und Drang, his scholarship and his rare talent for surgical inquiry.
He would succeed and prosper.
Suddenly he hurled the glass into the sky. It sailed a good hundred and
fifty feet before shattering on a building across the street. He left the
balcony, went into the bedroom and turned on the color television, the first
device that had truly captured his imagination and fascination in 1979. He
eased into an overstuffed chair, put his feet up on the ottoman and watched
the midafternoon news break.
The broadcaster matter-of-factly reported on guerrilla warfare in Africa,
a famine in Asia, striking workers in the Northeast and increased crime
rates in major urban centers. The weather continued cool and overcast.
The newscaster disappeared and was replaced by a blonde selling
cosmetics. She was followed by a pitch for Preparation H, a plea for the
Heart Association and, finally, someone offering “great deals and slashed
prices on new and used cars.”
Stephenson was amazed by the quick succession of visual images.
There was no continuity, and unlike the printed page, this form of
communication did not allow for reflection. Then again, perhaps one wasn’t
supposed to ponder over what he saw; maybe that was done for the viewer
at the source of the images. If so, that was good, and he decided to let
himself be saturated.
The Pride of the Marines returned to the Friday afternoon matinee, and
Stephenson was transported to the war for the Pacific. Two U.S. Marines
smoked cigarettes and whispered as they sat behind what looked like a
refinement of the Gatling gun. Suddenly a grenade exploded in their faces.
One was killed, and the other rendered blind. Then hordes of Japanese
soldiers emerged from the jungle and attacked. Whimpering with fright and
panic, the sightless Marine began firing his machine gun, swinging it back
and forth in a wide arc before him, guided only by his ears.
Stephenson bounced in the chair with joy, eyes wide with excitement as
the hordes of Japanese were cut down by the bursts of machine-gun fire. He
imagined the weapon in his own hands on the meadow at Aesculapius. His
father and friends were coming for him, their horses at full gallop, their red
coats and white riding breeches glistening in the sun. He fired. Men and
horses were cut down instantly. But his father was up again, running for
him, waving a fire poker high over his head. Another long burst of fire, and
his father went down permanently, his form held together only by his
clothes.
When he returned to reality, Stephenson felt relaxed and elated. He
watched the maudlin ending to the war story, then turned off the television.
He was extremely satisfied, for he had just seen images and affirmations to
the only part of the human psyche that he truly admired and respected. Then
he thought furiously. Queen Victoria (that pompous, horse-faced bitch)
would never have allowed any of what he had just seen to be staged in
England. So, societies must have changed drastically, allowing a man to
express himself more freely, hence more violently. He chuckled. If this
thing called television reflected the current state of the human beast, then he
was more at home here than in his own age! The irony of it—he really had
been born a century before his time! He could hardly wait for night to fall
so he could go out on the streets. Maybe he would meet a girl. A coquettish
one who knew how to please before dying with grace.
He stood, stretched, then picked up his beloved pocket watch off the
dresser. He opened it not to check the time, but for a reflective gaze at her
likeness on the inside of the lid. He closed the watch and slipped it into the
small pocket on the waist of his new trousers. He attached the chain to his
wide leather belt. Then he tried on the Panama hat that he had purchased
along with the stacked-heel Oxford shoes. He turned in front of the fulllength mirror by the closet. The hat fit perfectly. He shifted his weight to his
right foot, dropped his right shoulder, put his hands on his hips, raised his
eyebrows slightly, then thrust out his pelvis. He sighed with satisfaction. He
even looked like a 1979er. He had that same foreboding and furtive air, that
same glint of sordid luxury that he had noticed in the mannerisms of idle
men on the street.
He grinned and admired his transmutation. Although landing in San
Francisco instead of London had been a rude shock at first, he no longer
cared. A city was a city, and so far he hadn’t encountered any problems
with the American language. Soon he would get a map of San Francisco
and would know the streets and his way around. Perhaps he would learn
how to operate one of those modern, machine-driven runabouts (preferably,
one of the long, sleek, black models with tinted glass); then he could travel
about at will, a contemporary man of leisure—free to indulge whatever
whim might strike his fancy.
Suddenly, someone knocked sharply on the door to his suite.
He was startled. Who was that? Had he ordered something else from
room service and then forgotten about it? More gin, perhaps? No. Whoever
was out there was totally unexpected and had obviously ignored the “Do
Not Disturb” sign on the door handle.
He left the bedroom and silently walked to the door. He waited and
listened, his large hand closed into a murderous fist. Maybe someone had
the wrong room. Maybe they would go away.
There were five more knocks, louder than before. Insistent and
pounding.
Annoyed now, Stephenson scowled at the door, his jaw muscles
working furiously. “All right!” he shouted. “Who’s there?”
“Desk, sir,” replied a muffled voice.
“What the devil do you want?”
“It’s your luggage, sir.”
“Luggage?” Surprised, he stepped back and stared at the door, totally
confused. “What luggage?”
“Your bags just arrived, sir.”
“My bags? That’s absurd! You must have the wrong party.”
“You are Dr. Stephenson, aren’t you?”
With a puzzled growl, Stephenson stepped to the door, unlocked it, then
jerked it open. “Now what in the bloody name of hell…?” He backpedaled
into the room.
“My God,” he uttered with dismay. “Wells?”
H.G. closed the door behind him deliberately dropped the “Do Not Disturb”
sign into a dust bin, then calmly turned to face a trembling Leslie John
Stephenson. He didn’t feel angry or tense, as he might have suspected, but
rather somewhat saddened to be the first one to confront Jack the Ripper.
He noticed the man’s conspicuous attire, and couldn’t help but comment
dryly, “Isn’t that haberdashery a little ostentatious, John?”
“How did you get here?”
H.G. merely smiled.
“How did you find me?”
“The details aren’t really important, are they?”
Stephenson sighed, ran his hands through his hair, then turned away
from H.G. “Obviously, then, you know.”
“You left your cape and bag in the hall cupboard,” H.G. replied flatly.
“Forgive me for the inconvenience.”
“I guess neither I nor any of our mutual acquaintances realized the
extent to which one of us could have descended,” H.G. said forcefully.
“What could have possessed you, John?”
Stephenson stiffened, then faced Wells. “There is no explanation. And
even if there were, it’s no one’s affair but my own.”
His hand found the bottle of Beefeater’s. “Would you care for a spot of
gin, old boy? The taste isn’t as sharp as it used to be, and it’s frightfully
expensive, but then again, it’s imported. Given our location”—He allowed
himself an ironic smile—“It’s quite good, actually. May I pour you a
glass?”
H.G. was taken aback at the thought of imbibing with such a creature.
But the longer he stared at Stephenson—the more he considered the
circumstances—he understood that accepting the man’s hospitality might be
a wise thing to do. Perhaps he might be able to logically convince
Stephenson that he should return to 1893 London. After all, the man
seemed rational. He grudgingly returned the smile. “I don’t see why not. As
long as we can be civil about this entire matter.”
Stephenson went to the bar, drinks, poured them, set the bottle between
them, then sat on a stool. He turned to Wells and gestured for him to sit
down. “Now that you’ve come all this way, just what is it that you intend to
do?”
“Take you back,” blurted H.G.
Stephenson sighed, then leaned back against the bar. “I’ve never really
liked you, Wells, but I’ve always respected your talents and abilities, I’ve
always enjoyed your company. You know how to challenge men’s minds.
But this is not a literary circle arguing about who wrote Shakespeare’s
plays. Nor is it a polemical group of students discussing the merits of
Bismarck versus the ineptitudes of Napolean III.” He paused. “It is you and
I out of our own time—for all intents and purposes, larger than life. We
have transcended mortality, hence, humanity. There are no rules for you and
me. Save one—I am never going back to 1893. So why don’t we just forget
about that and discuss our unique situation like gentlemen?” He took a
drink. “Can we do that, Wells?”
“We may be out of our own time, John, but we have not transcended
humanity. Must I remind you that there are basic universal laws to which
we will always be beholden? Such as, respect for another human being?”
“Ah, yes,” replied Stephenson. “To be more specific, I took your time
machine without asking your permission.”
“To put it mildly.”
“Well, would you be so kind as to accept my apologies? In the haste of
the moment, I obviously forgot my manners.” He laughed. “Perhaps I could
compensate you for the trip. What does it cost to travel eighty-six years
nowadays?”
“You’re deliberately missing the point, aren’t you?”
“What point?”
“The basic difference between good and evil!” He exploded. “We all
know what it is! We all understand it!”
“Of course we do, Wells. Good is when we feel pleasure and evil is
when we experience pain.”
“There isn’t a remorseful bone in your entire body, is there?”
“Remorse?” Stephenson laughed again. “To a world without remorse,”
he said, his eyes twinkling. He toasted himself.
H.G. sighed with frustration. “But those murders, John! How could
you?”
“Once I had acquired an elementary knowledge of surgery, it was really
quite simple.”
“But why?”
“I enjoyed it.”
“Have you no feelings for your fellow human beings?”
He frowned impatiently. “My good man, I believe I made my position
on that matter quite clear on an earlier occasion. Must I repeat myself?”
“Murder is wrong.”
“Says who? On the contrary, it has been a natural expression of human
emotions since Cain did in Abel. I’ve never considered murder a crime.”
“It is evil!”
“Perhaps in your view, but not in mine. It is a very functional act, as
basic to human needs and desires as sexual intercourse.” Stephenson smiled
and continued. “One can murder for pleasure or profit, one can murder for
wealth or fame. For political, religious, social, economic or humanitarian
purposes. A dictator can be assassinated just as a hated parent can be killed.
The weak and the dangerous can be eliminated. And so on. Can you
imagine the terrible shape the world would be in if murder did not exist,
Wells?” He paused, then spoke softly. “To murder is to love, for both acts
ensure that the human race will survive.”
H.G. thought furiously. The man had made a persuasive case for
indiscriminate murder. He had even made that vile act sound attractive, and
H.G. realized that he could probe into Stephenson’s psyche at will, but
would never find a pang of regret. The man’s soul was not tortured at all;
rather it was twisted, the basis of his raison d’être being that society was a
vegetable garden of people to be harvested and consumed at will.
“I’m sure that the human race would survive and flourish without the
institution of murder, John,” H.G. replied dryly. “And I’m also sure that the
great majority of rational human beings do not share your deviant opinions,
myself included. What you fail to see is that there would be no great
civilizations without law and order, the foundation of which is a basic
respect for the rights of others.”
“I would agree with you, Wells, except for one thing—it is fallacious to
assume that the vast majority of human beings are rational. And when
irrationality rules the kingdom of man—as it has ever since the first
Neanderthal picked up a club—then laws are made solely for the
convenience of those who hold power; they are broken by those who are
destined to become powerful who in turn will institute an entirely different
set of regulations for their convenience and pleasure. The dialectic that
Hegel was talking about is actually an endless historical cycle of chaos. Am
I right?”
When H.G. did not immediately reply, Stephenson burst out laughing
and patted him on the back. “Go back to the nineteenth century and reread
Friedrich Nietzsche, my friend. John Locke, Matthew Arnold and John
Stuart Mill have softened your brain.”
H.G. recoiled. “I’ve had enough of this cynical nonsense! You have
used my scientific achievement to escape justice! Therefore, you have
damaged my reputation and besmirched my honor!”
“Well, bully for me.” Stephenson laughed.
“It’s a matter of principle!”
“Principle?” Stephenson sneered. “Would I be correct in saying that
times have changed, Wells?”
“My good man, morality never changes, no matter what you say! You’re
returning to London to pay your debt to society!”
Stephenson stood and glowered over H.G. “You little fool! Haven’t you
been observing the world around you? 1979 is overrun with people like me.
Rapists, murderers, arsonists, robbers, terrorists, ad infinitum!”
H.G. laughed derisively. “What rubbish!”
“You don’t believe me?”
“How could I believe any of your nihilistic diatribes?”
Stephenson made a curt gesture with his hand. “Let me show you
something.”
H.G. followed him into the bedroom and saw him go to a large
electronic box with a dark-gray screen and turn a switch.
“They call it television.”
H.G. stepped back and gasped, for he was staring at an instant color
picture of two people talking. So that was the end result of Marconi’s
wireless. What a wonderful, graphic, clear way to communicate.
“Marvelous! Simply marvelous!”
“I couldn’t agree with you more.” Stephenson turned a dial once and
produced an image of two men in nineteenth-century western attire facing
each other, a street between them. One drew a pistol and shot the other three
times. Stephenson gestured from the screen to Wells and smiled smugly.
“I believe that is an illustration of history,” H.G. commented
indignantly. Rage began building inside him as he realized what his
adversary was up to.
Stephenson turned the dial again. The screen showed a wrestling match
where two giant men appeared to be killing each other while an unruly,
obsessed crowd urged them to commit even more horrible atrocities. One
wrestler threw the other out of the ring into the seats and was declared the
winner. Then the scene shifted to an advertisement for a children’s doll.
This one was a replica of a modern soldier in full battle dress, and he was
“on sale for Christmas at Zody’s, only $13.95.”
“They sell firearms there, too. In the sporting-goods section. What was
the phrase you used the other day? Fait accompli?”
“You haven’t proved a thing!” H.G. shouted.
“Haven’t I?” he turned off the television and strode back into the living
room. “This is my world, Wells!” He turned. “I belong here and you don’t!
You’re a misfit and a relic of the past!”
“You’re going back!” H.G. said lividly.
“I’m not going anywhere!”
“The hell you say!” He grabbed Stephenson by the arm and began
leading him toward the door. The larger man obliged for several steps, then
jerked his arm free and emitted an ironic chuckle.
“My good man, I do believe that you have become irrational.” He
brushed off his shirt sleeve. “Perhaps even violent. Have I proven my point
now?”
H.G. growled and ran at Stephenson, his arms flailing. Stephenson
backed away, then suddenly strode in and backhanded Wells into the wall.
H.G.’s breath whooshed out. He had never realized how strong and
physically adept Stephenson was; but then again, he had always been
conscious of the rational Stephenson, the sane Stephenson. He was not
prepared to deal with the hulking menace that now stood before him.
Stephenson took a vicious swing. H.G. ducked and scrambled away.
Stephenson’s fist punched right through an oil painting and cracked the wall
behind it.
H.G. dove for the man’s legs, but Stephenson sidestepped and brought a
knee up hard into the side of his face. H.G. crumpled, then groggily rose to
his knees and desperately tried to steady himself. He heard derisive,
scornful laughter that sounded vaguely flat and far away.
His opponent raised a muscular arm and brought one large fist down
hard on top of H.G.’s head. Wells emitted a short cry, fell back on the rug,
twitched, and then lay still.
Stephenson gazed at H.G.’s limp form and noticed that he was still
breathing. He would have to remedy that. He stepped lightly around Wells
and went behind the bar, rummaged in a drawer full of barroom accessories
and found an ice pick. He inspected it. The point was fine—almost needlesharp—but the absence of a blade disappointed him, for he would be able to
inflict only puncture wounds on his former schoolmate. The weapon would
do, however; it was certainly more acceptable than crushing Wells’s head
with a piece of heavy furniture.
He went back to H.G. and turned him over so that he could stab into the
man’s eyes. He raised the ice pick and was about to plunge the weapon
home when he had second thoughts. He sighed. Actually, it would be a
shame to kill Wells. The little man was so brilliant. After all, hadn’t he
made time-traveling possible? Was he not the Columbus of a new age and
dimension? Hadn’t Wells created the very device which had allowed him to
elude Scotland Yard?
Suddenly, Stephenson remembered. He slowly grinned, looked down at
the prostrate Wells and nodded. Of course! When he had hurriedly scanned
the diagrams for the time machine, he had read about the Rotation Reversal
Lock and the special key that overrode it. He hadn’t really understood the
principles then, but now it was all coming clear. That was how Wells had
followed him! The time machine had returned to its home hour because he,
Stephenson, did not have the key. Therefore, if one did have the key, one
could travel anywhere along the fourth dimension and never have to fear
pursuit. He grinned. He would take the key. He didn’t have to stab Wells to
death. He could leave the inimitable little scientist hopelessly mired in the
late twentieth century.
His hands trembled with excitement, and he began searching through
Wells’s pockets. But then H.G. emitted a loud groan. Stephenson frowned
and sat back on his haunches. There was no time. He would have to kill the
little man and then find the key. What the devil, he told himself and
shrugged. The end had always justified the means.
Once again he raised the ice pick.
Suddenly, someone knocked on the door.
“Maid.”
Stephenson dropped the ice pick and scrambled to his feet.
The door opened, and a young girl pushed a cart loaded with cleaning
utensils into the room. She saw the two of them—one prone, one upright—
abruptly stopped moving and put her hand to her mouth, more in surprise
than in fear. She did not immediately scream.
Stephenson had the presence of mind to shield his face with his hand so
that she would be unable to recognize him. Then he rushed by her out into
the hallway. He glanced back and saw that Wells was moaning and stirring.
With a low curse, he turned on his stacked heel and hurried for the lifts.
OceanofPDF.com
6
H.G. opened his eyes and did not immediately know where he was. The
room was a haze—the blue carpet merging with the off-white walls in
circles of painful, distant colors. Someone was screaming. He recognized a
young girl in a uniform was in front of him on her knees, her eyes wide
with concern. She was gently touching his forehead.
“Sir! Are you all right, sir?”
“I’ve been better, thank you.” He got to his feet, then saw the ice pick
on the floor. “Good bloody Christ!” he exclaimed. A chill swept over his
body. He realized that he was extremely fortunate to be alive.
“Would you like me to call a doctor?”
“No thank you.”
He became more and more angry by the second. What a monstrous
creature, he thought, what a base, unnatural human being. Well, there would
be no more appeals to reason and rationality on his part. Not after this.
“Are you sure you don’t want to see a doctor?”
“The only physician I’m interested in has already vacated the premises.”
A vengeful H.G. Wells scooped up and pocketed the ice pick, then left
the room.
The lift came to a smooth stop at ground level. H.G. hurried out and half
ran across the lobby, nimbly cutting through groups of Japanese tourists and
dodging clusters of furniture as if he were an elusive halfback on a Rugby
field. He went outside and darted across the hotel’s circular driveway to the
sidewalk that paralleled Van Ness Avenue. He looked both ways and
quickly appraised the topography of the city. To the west, the street went
upward in a long grade that would be difficult and unpleasant to walk.
Moreover, his natural inclination was to proceed downhill, so he began
moving to the east where the street sloped down to the handsome buildings
of the civic center. Almost immediately, he came to the intersection of Van
Ness and Geary. The light was against him, and heavy traffic rolled up
Geary Street heading south. Had Stephenson gone north on Geary or
continued east on Van Ness? Once again, H.G. looked in both directions.
Geary Street was wide and brighter in that it was lit directly by the lateafternoon sun. Van Ness, on the other hand, was bathed in shadows; the
buildings were taller and closer together, too, which would make a fugitive
in a hurry seem less noticeable. H.G. nodded imperceptibly and crossed the
intersection, continuing east on Van Ness.
Two blocks later, H.G. caught sight of Stephenson’s Panama hat
bobbing above the stream of pedestrians.
He smiled grimly and began running. He crossed O’Farrell Street
against the traffic and ignored the horns and curses of the drivers. Then he
dodged out into Van Ness Avenue proper—outflanking a meandering mass
of pedestrians—and vaulted back onto the sidewalk just ahead of another
speeding phalanx of vehicles. Breathing heavily now, he raced along and
finally caught up with Stephenson at the corner of Van Ness and Ellis Street
waiting for the light to change. He came up behind Stephenson, grabbed
him, spun him around and had the ice pick poised an inch from the man’s
throat. Shocked, Stephenson breathed in sharply and his eyes widened. H.G.
saw the fear in his opponent’s face, and he knew that he had won.
He was about to issue a command when a lady standing beside them
saw what was happening and screamed. H.G. automatically turned to
explain, and that was all Stephenson needed. He slapped the ice pick from
H.G.’s hand, then turned and sprinted into Ellis Street against the light. He
dodged three speeding cars and had just about reached the opposite corner
when a Volkswagen bus made a fast left turn onto Ellis, and smacked into
Stephenson head-on at. He was knocked a good twenty feet through the air
before crashing down onto the pavement headfirst.
A crowd instantly gathered around the prostrate Stephenson, everyone
shouting and yelling, some wondering what they should do, others
(curiously detached) only there for the violence of the moment.
From the curb, H.G. watched in a daze. A policeman wearing white
gloves hurried over to the scene from his station in the center of the
intersection. He quickly dispersed the crowd, then kneeled over Stephenson
and loosened his clothing.
H.G. felt leaden, and all he could do was stare. A sadness came over
him that he did not immediately understand, for if anyone in the universe
deserved to be metallically smacked down, surely it was Leslie John
Stephenson. Perhaps it was the manner in which it had happened.
Stephenson had not been felled and maimed by another human being. He
had been squashed by technology, and the vehicle that had done it just sat
there waiting to be driven again. Maybe it was the impersonal nature of the
accident that made Stephenson’s fate seem so cruel and alien, for H.G. had
always regarded the miracle of life as precious and the absurdity of death as
personal. Yet here was a badly hurt man on the pavement eighty-six years
from home in a futurological city. No one here would care; no one back
home would know.
The hapless, long-haired driver of the offending vehicle walked in tight,
aimless circles, spasmodically wringing his hands and wondering if he’d
just killed someone. After a while, he slumped against the side door of his
weather-beaten omnibus while the policeman calmly asked him questions
and wrote down information on a note pad. The air was routine, for the
policeman was proceeding as if this sort of thing happened all the time.
Moreover, the traffic flow had returned to normal, and passers-by were
continuing as if nothing had happened.
Yes, H.G. was observing just another performance of a modern (and
mundane) ballet featuring a good policeman who was ironically attempting
to orchestrate chaos into a logical sequence. The coda to the first half of the
drama had just ended.
Act two began when a siren grew louder and louder and became earsplitting. A shiny, red and white van turned left off Van Ness and stopped in
the middle of Ellis Street. A sign on the door read “Paramedic Unit 37,
SFFD.” Two lithe young men in dark-blue uniforms leaped out of the
vehicle and began attending to Stephenson. They rolled him onto a chrometipped stretcher, then lifted him up and inside the van. Their movements
were graceful and choreographed. No wasted time or energy. No
befuddlement or unnecessary dialogue. In seconds they were back inside
their van, and while one spoke into a small metal device and simultaneously
swung the vehicle around in a tight circle, the other affixed a mask over
Stephenson’s face, adjusted dials on metal cylinders, then began checking
the victim’s vital signs. The van sped down Ellis Street, and the traffic
responded to the siren, opening up before the vehicle like the Red Sea
parting before Moses.
H.G. was overwhelmed. He recalled reading about the Crimean War
where it was common for hundreds of wounded men to lie unattended for
hours, even days. Those fortunate enough to find themselves in surgeries
were either ignored or had their limbs removed by overworked and
undertrained doctors. Yet here, he had witnessed the functioning of a
precise team, obviously very knowledgeable in the business of saving lives.
My God, he thought, how wonderful and reassuring it must be for the
people of 1979 to know that injury and/or loss of life was not viewed
callously.
Then he frowned and was momentarily confused. There was an irony
here: Stephenson had been flattened by a product of advanced technology,
then picked up and taken away (his life no doubt saved in the process) by a
similar machine. One dealt death, whereas the other restored life. The scales
were balanced.
H.G. turned and timidly approached the policeman who was at the
corner of the intersection talking into a metal box. When the man finished,
H.G. accosted him.
“Excuse me, sir, just where did they take that poor wretch who was
struck by the motorcar?”
The policeman looked H.G. up and down, then frowned critically. “You
know him or something?”
“Oh, no, sir. You see, I’m a newcomer here, and I was curious about the
procedure used for such tragedies.”
“The paramedics got him, and he’ll end up at San Francisco General.
Ain’t it the same way in England?”
H.G. paid his taxi fare and got out in front of the main entrance to San
Francisco General Hospital. The sun was setting and a cold fog was rolling
in from the bay, but he just stood at the edge of the long walkway and
stared. What he saw was completely unexpected.
The complex was vast, the buildings old and forbidding. They were
painted a dingy red-orange which over the years had become stained with
dirt and smoke. The shrubs and lawns were brown with neglect. And
around the entire area was a massive, black-iron fence, its bottom lined with
old papers and other debris blown there by the winds. Behind the buildings,
a twelve-story, brick smokestack emitted wisps of white steam.
H.G. shuddered. The place reminded him of a Victorian prison. It was,
however, a hospital, for off to his left he saw a brand-new, oblong-shaped
sign; against a white, internally lit background, cherry-red letters spelled
out “Emergency.” An arrow pointed around to the back side of the main
building.
Another red and white van sped up the circular drive and went around
the building following the arrow, so H.G. surmised that that was where he
would find Stephenson. He quickly moved down the walkway and huddled
inside his coat, for the wind was picking up, and the chill was much more
noticeable.
In contrast to the hospital’s main ingress, the emergency entrance was
bustling with activity and thoroughly modern. H.G. was reassured.
The inside was a nineteenth-century scientific-romantic’s dream. To
H.G.’s immediate front was an island of brushed-silver lifts which signs
identified as elevators. With the flash of a light and the ding of a bell, one
arrived, its cavernous doors automatically spreading. H.G. saw an attendant
push an old man on a stretcher inside. The patient’s complexion was as
alabaster white as the linen that draped his cadaverous form. From the other
side, an expressionless cleaning lady got on board with a cart of mops and
buckets. The sweet odor of ammonia was unmistakable. The doors hissed
shut. H.G. watched the flashing lights above; the lift descended four levels
beneath the ground’s surface. He briefly wondered.
Across from the lifts was a “Reception and Information” center. The
women behind the low glass partitions were all wearing starched white
uniforms and hats. Regardless of age, their faces were serene, and their hair
was coiffured. Some of them worked at small machines; the subdued hum
and click of electrical energy was pervasive.
From the reception center, two wide, glistening corridors led off into the
pristine bowels of the hospital. Stretchers came and went, but the condition
of the patients was always ambiguous; there were no telltale signs; all was
draped in white. Motorized wheelchairs buzzed along, too, causing H.G. to
bubble with delight—whoever would have imagined that the incapacitated
would be able to move about on an artificial source of energy? And then
there were clusters of people, most of them dressed in the same style
smocks, some white, some pink, some green, a few gray and even blue.
H.G. quickly figured out that the colors indicated functions. That way in the
haste of a serious medical moment, no one had to ask the others what their
jobs were. How clever.
He bent over and touched the floor, then ran his hand along a pastel
wall. Yes, everything in the hospital was molded out of that same curious
substance he had first encountered at the McDonald’s. So smooth, so shiny,
so soft. It must be the artificial lighting. He wanted to say incandescent, but
he wasn’t sure that the term would be correct, for the entire area was lit
evenly and softly from overhead through large, rectangular sources. There
were no shadows or black hallways from which one could hear the pitiful
cries of patients racked with pain. Here, one could see everything! And
there was music amplifying from boxes affixed to the ceilings. No agonized
screams here!
H.G. smiled with pride. This, then, was the future he had predicted. This
was what technology could do for mankind. These were the beautiful,
sophisticated conditions under which one enlightened human being could
help another.
But the most remarkable fact of all was the absolute cleanliness of the
hospital. For a moment H.G. was afraid to touch anything for fear of
leaving behind some nineteenth-century bacilli.
He recalled his stay at St. George’s after his last tuberculosis attack,
brought on by overwork and the collapse of his marriage to Isabel. They
had placed him in a long, dismal ward that housed fifty other patients. The
room was lit by four gas lamps, and since the high windows were never
opened, the air hung heavy and stale. The dominant odor was a suffocating
blend of excrement, bile, mildew and smoke. They had him on a lumpy bed
with loose springs, wrapped in a plaster that had gone cold and soggy.
Blankets were piled over him to break the fever that had consumed him for
days. And when he coughed, excruciating pain would shoot through every
nerve and muscle in his body. Then the doctor had come through and
briskly examined the patients, ignoring the moans of the delirious, for there
was nothing he could do that had not already been done. In 1892.
From that to this. Bright lights and starched linens. Music and hygiene.
And not a sign, not a whimper of suffering anywhere. H.G. was
overwhelmed.
“May I help you, sir?” asked a volunteer nurse’s aide.
H.G. was momentarily startled but quickly recovered. “I believe an
acquaintance of mine was brought here by two young men dressed in dark
blue.” He hesitated. “He had been struck by a motorcar.”
“They’ll help you at the desk, sir.”
H.G. went to the reception center and patiently waited. Beyond the glass
partition was a bank of television screens that showed corridors and various
hospital rooms. A nurse sat before them pushing buttons on a console that
changed the pictures. Occasionally, she made notes. H.G. was awe-struck.
Why, a person could know instantly what was going on anywhere in the
hospital. Think of the time and the lives that could be saved by such a
miraculous device! He grinned triumphantly. Stephenson had been shortsighted and wrong, for here television was employed for the public good.
H.G. wondered if this form of communication were used all over the world.
If so, great multitudes of people could instantly see what the others were
doing and how the others lived. What a boon for rationality!
A statuesque blond nurse approached him and smiled. “What can I help
you with, sir?”
“This afternoon an acquaintance of mine was struck by a motorcar and
brought to this hospital. I’d like to find out the extent of his injuries and
when he can be expected to be released.”
“Certainly, sir. Can I have the patient’s name and social security
number?”
“His name is Leslie John Stephenson…”
She turned and worked the keys of a small electronic machine.
“But I’m afraid you’ve got me on the social security number.”
“Date of birth, then?”
“I’m not precisely sure about that, either.”
The nurse looked from the machine to H.G. “I’m sorry, sir, there is no
Leslie John Stephenson registered here.”
H.G. smiled patiently. “I don’t think that he had any identification with
him when he was struck by the machine.”
“Then he’d be listed as a John Doe.” She frowned, thought, then
brightened. “Can you tell me where the accident occurred?”
“At the corner of Van Ness Avenue and Ellis Street.”
She returned to the computer and typed in another message. Moments
later there was a reply which she read to Wells. “Male, Caucasian, six feet
tall, one hundred eighty pounds, brown eyes, dark-brown hair, dark
complexion. Was admitted in a comatose state at 1613 hours wearing a pink
shirt and light-blue pants.”
“That’s him! That’s Leslie John Stephenson!”
“The official records list him as John Doe number sixteen.” She smiled
professionally.
“Can you tell me how he is?”
“I’m sorry. You’ll have to speak with the patient’s doctor… Mr… .”
“Wells.”
She wrote down his name, then pointed toward a corridor. “Why don’t
you wait in the visitors’ lounge. The patient is being treated by Dr. Rodden.
As soon as the doctor is off duty, I’ll send him in to speak with you.”
“Thank you.” He turned and moved away.
Once past the elevators (he would never get used to that name), he
found himself in the visitors’ lounge. The floor was carpeted, and an
abundance of plush furniture and reading material on tables awaited
visitors.
He was impressed. At St. George’s the only provision for visitors was a
damp stone room with one severe wooden bench against each wall.
He for an empty chair when he heard a curious sound. He turned and
stared. Opposite the lounge on the other side of the corridor a man removed
a can of something from one machine and then an apple from another!
Machines that dispensed food! Good Lord!
H.G. hurried over for a closer look. Sandwiches reposed in the windows
of one, fruit in another, soft drinks (whatever that meant) in a third, coffee,
tea and hot chocolate in a fourth, and then a whole host of appetizing little
snacks (the names of which were foreign to him) were in a fifth machine.
Suddenly, he was very hungry, and so he returned to the sandwich machine,
read the offerings, decided that “Ham and Cheese” was the most familiar
and punched the button. Nothing happened. A light flashed, and he read,
“Insert Money.” He blushed, fished in his pocket and pulled out a handful
of coins. He deposited the required fifty-five cents and pushed the button.
The machine groaned, whirred, returned his money and flashed another
message: “Try Another Selection.”
H.G. obeyed, but got his money back again. Three more times he
inserted his money into the machine, and three more times no food was
delivered.
He looked at the next machine in the line and frowned. He did not like
fruit. Slightly annoyed, he moved to the snack dispenser and studied the
offerings there. He rejected jawbreakers (the connotation made him feel
weak), Life Savers (he was in good health), jujubes (they resembled
medication of spurious origin) and toasted corn kernels (he had no desire to
eat something that looked like the droppings of a small animal). All that
remained were “Fritos” and “Hostess Twinkies.” The latter appeared more
nourishing, so he fed coins into the machine, pulled a lever and—lo and
behold—out popped a Twinkie. He carefully unwrapped the little morsel
and sniffed it. Visions of Mrs. Nelson’s superb cooking came to mind which
were incompatible with the sweet and stale odor of the Twinkie. He
shrugged and jammed the thing into his mouth. He chewed, swallowed and
did not feel satisfied. If anything, his teeth hurt from the massive intake of
processed sugar inside the Twinkie’s white center of goo.
Ultimately, he settled for a cup of weak tea. He returned to the lounge
thinking that the problem with the mechanization of food preparation was
there was no one to whom one could complain.
He settled into an overstuffed chair, then took a dog-eared Reader’s
Digest off the table. He was about to peruse this interesting little rag, when
a white-coated doctor mouthing sympathy ushered three people of color
into the lounge. H.G. studied them with interest, for aside from
photographs, he had never seen black people before.
They appeared to be a family—in the Western, Judeo-Christian sense of
the word. As opposed to the African. Although, upon reflection, H.G.
realized that he had no idea what an African family was all about. His
knowledge of the sociology of the dark continent was limited to the tribal
system, which he distastefully compared to London’s circle of private men’s
clubs.
He leaned forward, inspected the three more closely and saw no vestige
of the jungle or the savannah in their behavior. They could have been any
American or English family. The mother was graying, overweight, and was
dressed in a shabby, dark-blue dress. The two young lads who assisted her
were obviously her sons. The older one was tall and wore an outfit similar
to Stephenson’s new attire; he paced angrily while the doctor went on. The
younger boy, in faded sweat shirt and brown pants, faithfully listened to the
white-coated messenger of bad news. The mother began to cry. The doctor
apologized, turned and left the room. The younger boy consoled his mother,
“Daddy’s going to be all right. Don’t listen to no doctor, Momma!”
H.G. recalled etchings he had seen in American history books during his
grammar school days depicting slavery. Yet, the African slaves had been
emancipated the year before he was born. Why, then, did the image before
him—set in this futurological hospital—seem so acutely historical? Did a
different kind of subjugation exist in 1979? There was only one way to find
out. He would go over to the family and discreetly ask them if there was
anything that he, H.G. Wells, could do to help.
He impulsively rose and started to approach when the older brother
turned and fixed him with a stare. H.G. stopped short. He got the chilling
sense that a barrier had just slammed down between himself and the black
family. He searched the young man’s face for an explanation, but the
expression was cold and murderous. H.G. wisely returned to his chair and
pretended to read. An upbeat tune played from the speakers in blind
counterpoint to the woman’s moans of despair.
Thus, H. G. Wells unwittingly became a nervous sociological stereotype
of the late 1970s. Why had the young black looked at him with such a deeprooted malice? He hadn’t done anything to them or their father.
For the next two hours, H.G. waited in the visitors’ lounge for Dr. Rodden
to appear with news on the condition of Leslie John Stephenson. It was not
a relaxing time, for every few minutes ambulances would arrive at the
hospital. Moments later, relatives or friends would congregate in the lounge.
Most of them (hence, the emergency patients) were black, brown or Asian,
and H.G. saw hopelessness in their eyes. With the exception of the hospital
itself, he could have been in London’s East End. Technology hadn’t helped
these people. It mocked them.
The Chinaman with one eye who honed a knife on his boot. The grayhaired brown man who drank from a bottle in a paper sack. The young
black girl—dismally swollen with child—who was badly beaten and
waiting for assistance. The infant suffering from an unknown ailment left to
scream, no one knowing why. The old woman, nearly blind, who did not
know what they had done with her husband. The black man in the yellow
suit and the orange derby who just waited.
Every one of them.
H.G. left the lounge, acutely aware that in this small corner of 1979 a
class system existed. He had always believed that progress would free men
to practice good works. Now, he wondered, and it made him angry to be
questioning his own convictions, especially since Stephenson had already
done that earlier in the day.
He stormed past the elevators to the reception center.
“Is there something wrong, sir?” asked the nurse behind the window.
“Yes, there is something wrong. The nurse that was here before told me
that Dr. Rodden would meet me in the lounge to discuss the condition of an
acquaintance of mine.”
“Dr. Rodden left the hospital ten minutes ago,” she said apologetically.
“But he was supposed to speak with me!”
“I’m sorry. He won’t be back on duty until the morning.”
“Wait a minute!” H.G. exploded, turning purple. “You don’t expect me
to spend the night in that lounge, do you?”
“I’m sorry, sir, that’s not my concern.” She gestured to someone behind
him. “Next, please.”
Frustrated and helpless, H.G. turned and strode out of the hospital.
The cool night air was refreshing, and the fog softened the hard edges of
the lights and muted the metallic traffic sounds. H.G. calmed himself, then
started walking away from the hospital. When he got to the street, he
wondered what he should do next, somewhat transfixed by the alien
blinking of colored neon lights. Exhaustion came over him, so he sat down
on the curb and tried to think out a logical course of action to follow. The
first idea that crossed his mind was not a brilliant one, but practical.
Get some rest.
Across the street were hotels, and their façades reminded him of
nineteenth-century London. He hurried toward them, a homesick twinge in
his empty stomach and several nostalgic tears running down his face. Then
he angrily shook off those symptoms of self-pity. He didn’t need a lot of
internalized rubbish about the the good old days. What he needed was a
decent night’s sleep.
He entered the “Portrero Hotel & Rooming House (since 1929)” and
started across a small lobby decorated with mildewing furniture and one
sleeping black janitor. There was no one at the desk. He rang the night bell.
Five minutes later an ashen-gray black man shuffled from out of a dark
hallway to the desk.
“What you want, boy? Ain’t no poontang here no more, no sir. They all
went uptown and took out business licenses when the new mayor got hisself
elected.”
“I’d like a room, please.”
He put on a pair of rimless spectacles. “For the night?”
“My good man, what else would I want it for?”
The black man responded with a worn, yet timeless shrug, then placed a
yellowing card and a pencil in front of Wells. “That’ll be fourteen-fifty,
please, sir.”
H.G. dug into his pockets for the money, but all he found was a dollarthirteen in small change.
The black man blinked and waited. He was used to it.
Suddenly, H.G. grinned, for he remembered the traveler’s checks he’d
purchased from Amy Robbins earlier in the day. God, it seemed so bloody
long ago! “Do you accept traveler’s checks, sir?”
“As long as they ain’t foreign.”
H.G. chuckled at the unintended irony of the man’s statement; he dug
into his back pocket. Foreign, indeed!
The traveler’s checks weren’t in his pants pockets, so he reached into
his coat. Ah, yes, a bed. No, a bath first. A hot, luxuriating bath.
Suddenly, he frowned. His traveler’s checks! He didn’t have them! Were
they lost or had he been robbed? He frantically went through his pockets
again, but to no avail.
“Something wrong, sir?”
H.G. didn’t answer. He turned and hurried out. He went back to the
hospital and once more entered the visitors’ lounge.
Three small black children slept in the chair he once occupied while
their fathers sat on the nearby couch playing cards. The other furniture was
occupied, too. Beyond caring, H.G. lay down on the floor between the chair
and the couch, and used a pile of the day’s newspapers as a pillow. No one
noticed; he could have been dying.
An ambulance shrieked home to the emergency ward, but H.G. did not
lift his head. He—like the children—was learning; he could sleep
anywhere.
Amy Robbins stood under the shower and let the hot spray relax her,
pleased that her life was her own.
She had been free for a year now, in San Francisco—the city of lights,
restaurants and individuals—free to make her own way without
compromise, free to say no, free to say yes, beholden to no one except
herself. And she loved it. Against all odds, she had her own place, she was
paying her bills and she didn’t have to share a bathroom or a shower with
anyone.
She lifted her chin and allowed the water to fall upon her delicate face.
She closed her eyes and smiled, then slowly raised her arms and leaned
back so that the spray massaged her breasts and flat stomach. The routine
irritants of the job were forgotten; the tensions of the day melted. Life was
good. Finally.
Refreshed, she turned off the water, stepped out and dried herself then
turned and reached for her robe on the door. Before she put it on, she looked
into the fogged mirror and saw her own nude image softened and muted by
the steam. She envisioned that she had just stepped out of an Impressionist
painting. She was all pastels, and there were no shadows.
She went down the creaky hallway into the living room of her onebedroom, second-story apartment on Russian Hill. She crossed to her only
expensive indulgence, the quadraphonic sound system, and put on a
Viennese anthology of Mozart. Then she went into the kitchen, filled a
crystal pitcher (a relic from her first marriage) and watered the potted plants
in the apartment.
She returned to the kitchen, put away the leftover tuna salad, rinsed and
stacked her dinner dishes. Chores finished, she poured herself a glass of
chilled Chablis, padded back into the living room and curled up on the
great, old sofa with that morning’s Chronicle. The music swelled lightly and
made her think of the one thing she truly coveted: a stone fireplace and the
smell of burning oak. That would come. All in good time, and on her own
terms. Right now she was enjoying the most precious gift of all—sweet
solitude.
The phone rang.
It was Harry, the junior executive with the leasing corporation. He
wanted her to come down to this incredible Basque restaurant for drinks
and frivolity.
“No, Harry, all I want to do is stay home.”
He thought she was sick, offered his condolences and hung up.
She laughed, stretched. None of them really understood. It was as if
empty rooms, assaulted their manhood. They couldn’t stand for a woman to
go about unescorted or to be alone.
She went to her dining-room window and stared out at the trees, dimly
lit from the street. She loved those trees; they were thin and delicate; they
changed very slowly.
She returned to the couch for the last half of Mozart. Suddenly, her
thoughts turned to that strange, naïve, almost helpless man, Mr. Wells from
London. What was it about him? One moment he had seemed to be the
archaic (yet debonair) lover, the next, he came across as an orphaned doll
that needed dry cleaning.
She wondered if he would call her as he had said, or if she would ever
see him again. She shrugged, then burst out laughing, for she just
remembered that poor Mr. Wells had left all of his traveler’s checks at the
bank.
Of course he would call again, and if she was still this curious she just
might ask him what he was doing for lunch.
She drained her glass, then got up and headed for bed. She stretched all
the way down the hall, feeling drained and damned good. Ms. Amy
Robbins was proud to be herself.
H.G. abruptly awoke to the smell and taste of stale newsprint. He lifted his
head and saw that he had been sleeping with his face buried in the pile of
newspapers. He slowly stood. The lounge was empty, and bright sunlight
shone in through the windows. He turned. The hospital seemed quiet and
subdued. There were no crushes of people, no concerned doctors, frantic
nurses or busy employees; not even the usual rush of sirens and
ambulances. It was as if death and injury had to rest, too, and were waiting
until the afternoon and evening (human frailty being more vulnerable then)
to resume their normal pace.
He left the lounge and went to the men’s room. He washed his face and
discovered that his two-day beard growth was somewhat noticeable. Who
would have thought to pack a razor on a trip through time? Then he sniffed
himself.
“Whew.”
Carrying a bottle of cologne along for the journey would not have been
a bad idea, either. He took off his jacket, shirt and tie, wet paper towels in
the sink and proceeded to bathe himself. Then he redressed and smiled. A
clean body made him feel civilized again.
As a final touch, he combed his hair with his fingers, then pushed and
twisted his mustache into shape. He stepped back and regarded his
countenance with admiration. He looked remarkably well, given the lack of
an adequate personal toilet.
He left the men’s room and strode down the corridor, prepared to do
battle at the reception center. He paused at the food machines long enough
to purchase his morning cup of tea, swigged the lukewarm liquid down,
then marched to the information desk. He forcefully asked to see Dr.
Rodden. Much to his surprise, the nurse on duty was cooperative, and
within minutes a harried, tired-looking man pushed through the corridor’s
double doors and approached him. A small plate on the man’s long white
coat above his left breast identified him as “Dr. A. Rodden. Staff.”
“You wanted to see me?”
“My good man, I’ve been trying to see you for the past sixteen hours.”
“Well, don’t feel like the Lone Ranger. My wife’s lawyer’s been waiting
for two and a half years.” He emitted a dry laugh and started walking
aimlessly toward the elevators like a man who never had time to catch up
with himself. “Just what did you want?”
“A friend of mine is a patient of yours, and I would like to know how I
can go about arranging for his release.”
“See the cashier.”
“Of course, but can you tell me if the man is in any condition to travel?”
“Sure. What’s his name?”
“Leslie John Stephenson.”
Rodden began flipping through medical charts on his metal clipboard.
“Although from what your nurses have told me, Stephenson has been
registered as John Doe number sixteen,” H.G. commented, expressing his
distaste.
Rodden’s eyes narrowed and he perused his charts more carefully. He
stopped on a page, read it through, frowned and looked away. “Every so
often—once a week, once a month—something unexpected happens around
here for which medical science has no damned good explanation. This case
was routine. We just wanted to look after him for a while.” He sighed. “I’m
sorry to have to report that the man died between two and four A.M. this
morning.”
OceanofPDF.com
7
“Dead?” H.G. gasped. “Dead?”
“I’m sorry.”
“Can I see the body?”
“Wait a minute,” said the doctor, suddenly suspicious. “Are you related
to the deceased?”
“He doesn’t have any relatives!”
“I’m sorry. I shouldn’t have told you anything in the first place.” He
walked briskly away.
H.G. leaned against the wall of the corridor and used the railing (for
convenience of the handicapped) to hold himself up. Stephenson dead? His
life snuffed out by an alien mode of transportation? True, the chap had no
doubt earned the full measure of a capital judgment, but he should not have
died without first receiving a trial by jury. It was not a fitting end for an
English gentleman, no matter how horrible his crimes might be.
The most ghastly thing of all about the bizarre incident was the fact that
Stephenson had died beyond his own time in a strange world where no one
understood or cared that in this particular case the logical order of the
universe had been violated. His cries of pain, his possible last-minute
expressions of remorse had not been heard in 1893 London. Outside time,
they had not been heard by anyone. The incident was more than unnatural;
it was frightening. To be so alone, so totally lost in death. What a brick to
toss into the cogs of the Hegelian dialectic.
He stuffed his hands into his pockets, looked down and wandered along
a corridor. He had been cheated. Stephenson was dead. He could not return
home bearing the unholy grail. Justice would not be served. His own
society would never know that their most base and vile member had finally
gotten his comeuppance. God knows how long women would continue to
walk the streets fearing that Jack the Ripper would materialize. H.G.’s
odyssey—which a short while ago he had considered to be a trip through
time for the individual rights of man—had failed.
Well, then, so be it. What was done was finished. Leslie John—
wherever you are—may you rest in peace despite your awful crimes.
H.G. sighed and straightened up. He saw that he was standing near the
entrance to a large cafeteria full of people. The odor of hot food wafted out
the door and assaulted his senses. A placard by the door announced that the
daily breakfast special included two eggs, hash browns (whatever they
might be), a rasher of bacon, English muffins, fruit cocktail and coffee all
for only two dollars and seventy-five cents. He checked his funds. Eightyseven cents. He turned and walked away.
He rounded a corner, deep in thought. Logically, he should return to the
Bank of England, explain that he no longer possessed his traveler’s checks
and attempt to get just compensation. But according to his rough
calculations, eighty-seven cents would take him only about a half mile
away from the bloody hospital and then what would he do? He hadn’t the
slightest idea. He might as well have been as far away from the Bank of
England as San Francisco was from London or 1979 was from 1893.
He wandered around another corner and stumbled upon a bank of pay
telephones. He stared. Coins clinked and indefatigable young men shouted
into an electronic stratosphere about boys and girls, pounds and ounces, and
sibling similarities.
A booth was open. He rushed into it, sat down, gazed at the telephone
and for a moment wished that he could remove the plate from the front of
the box and see what kind of machinery was inside. Instead, he read the
instructions, deduced that he could afford to use the device, then removed
the business card from his inside coat pocket. “Ms. Amy C. Robbins.
Operations. The Bank of England, Ltd. 337 Sutter Street, San Francisco,
California. 422-4316.” He remembered that he had asked her to have lunch
with him and that she had responded by referring to a telephone number on
her calling card. The number in question, then, must be the seven-digit
figure printed on the lower right-hand corner.
He glanced back at the telephone. But why were there letters on the
push buttons? He thought hard for a few moments before sighing with
resignation. There seemed to be no logical explanation. After all,
“telephone” was spelled with a “ph” as opposed to an “f.” What was the
reason for that?
Suddenly, H.G. cursed his procrastination. If he had the courage to push
the time machine’s Accelerator Helm Lever forward why was he balking at
a telephone? Was he actually afraid of technology now?
H.G. removed the receiver from its cradle, placed it to his ear (as he had
seen others do) and dropped his dime into the coin slot. He pushed the
buttons that corresponded to the seven digits on the card, held his breath
and waited. There was series of clicks, a static hush and then a ringing noise
that sounded like a muffled bird call.
H.G. giggled with excitement.
“Bank of England, may I help you?”
“Marvelous,” he inadvertently mumbled into the receiver.
“Bank of England, may I help you?” the operator repeated, slightly
irritated.
H.G. opened his mouth to reply, then stopped. He had no idea what to
say. He stared at the mouthpiece and was speechless.
He heard a click, and then the tone he had heard when he first picked up
the receiver. Where had that woman gone?
Mortified, H.G. blushed, then muttered, “What bloody nerve!” He put
the telephone back onto its cradle, dug out another dime and rehearsed
several lines for his next attempt.
He pushed the second dime into the slot and dialed again.
“Bank of England, may I help you?”
He took a deep breath, then forced out the words. “Hello, Miss Robbins,
how are you this fine morning? This is Mr. Wells from London, that is, if
you don’t recognize my voice, but I’m sure that you haven’t forgotten—”
“Sir, I am not Miss Robbins. Would you like me to connect you?”
“Why… certainly. Of course.” His mind raced. The telephone system
must be more complicated than he had originally thought. Lines must be
multiples of hundreds and they must intersect with multiples of thousands
and so on. The proliferation must be astounding. “Yes, please.”
But the operator had already placed him on hold. He sighed, leaned
back against the side of the booth and listened to an electronic symphony
that he did not understand. Yet, the sounds were actually quite pleasing.
Suddenly: “This is Amy Robbins.” The voice was muted, breathless, yet
definitely her.
He blurted, “Hello, Miss Robbins. How nice you look this morning.”
“Hello?”
“Hello.” He grinned foolishly.
“Who is this?”
“You mean, you don’t recognize me?”
“How could I recognize you?”
“We met yesterday.”
“Is this Frank?”
“No, this isn’t Frank. You are speaking with Mr. Wells from London.
Remember?”
“Oh, yes,” she replied brightly. “I was hoping you’d call.”
“You were?”
“Well, not exactly. I knew you would call.”
“You did?”
“Sure. Anyone who leaves fifteen hundred dollars in traveler’s checks
on my desk and doesn’t call to find out where they are would be pretty
strange, don’t you think?”
“You’ve got a point.” He sagged with relief. Thank God. She had his
money. It wasn’t lost, and he hadn’t been robbed. Life would go on, and he
would get home again—after a vacation in the wilderness. He smiled
impishly. Everything was going to be all right.
“Mr. Wells, are you there?”
“Of course, I’m here.”
“Did you hear what I just said?”
“Certainly, but that wasn’t why I telephoned.”
“It wasn’t?”
“No, it wasn’t. I was wondering if you would have lunch with me
today.”
“I’d love to.” She sounded awed and quiet.
“Good, then. I’m absolutely delighted. May I call you Amy?”
“Yes.”
“Where shall we meet, Amy?”
“Anywhere you like.”
“Why don’t we meet here?”
“What time?”
“The sooner the better. I’m famished.”
“Come to think of it, so am I. Where are you?”
“San Francisco General Hospital.”
“What? Is there something wrong?”
“There’s nothing to be done,” he replied calmly. “I’ll explain it all when
you get here.”
“Are you sure that today’s a good day for lunch?”
“My dear girl, I’ve never been more certain of anything in my entire
life.”
“Okay. I’ll see you around eleven.”
“And Amy? Would you be so kind as to bring my traveler’s checks with
you?”
She agreed and hung up.
He left the phone booth feeling very good about himself. He ambled
along and put the sirens and the urgent broadcasts for doctors out of his
head. Instead, he thought of Amy. Her brown hair, her dark eyes, her
delicate mouth, her curvaceous figure. It was amazing to him how quickly
he had conjured up a mental picture of her purely on the basis of her voice
transmitted by the telephone.
Indeed, he left the hospital in a dream about the telephone. He had to
learn more about that method of communication. It was revolutionary; it
was necessary; it was worthy of man.
Very excited, he hurried up the walkway, for he had just been struck
with an idea. Telephone signals, he assumed, were transmitted by magnetic,
electrical fields of energy—the same kinds of fields that powered his
rotations through time. Therefore, he postulated, once he had a working
knowledge of the telephone, it shouldn’t be too difficult to adapt the device
so that one could speak both into history and into the future. Telephoning
through time! Speaking with dead relatives and unborn children. Querying
Queen Victoria, the Tsar of Russia or a future leader of, say, the Chinese.
How about that for the greatness and immortality of the human species?
He was deep in thought picturing a telephone installed inside his time
machine when he heard a horn. He turned and saw her waving at him from
a sleek blue vehicle with silver letters on the rear spelling “Honda Accord.”
The interior of the machine was attractive and clean—nothing like the
taxi he had ridden in the day before. He eased back in the seat.
“Oh, before I forget…” She smiled and handed him his traveler’s
checks.
“Thank you.” He looked around. “What a lovely motorcar. Beautiful.
Simply beautiful.” He felt the dash.
“It’s not exactly a Rolls-Royce,” she said.
“No, it certainly isn’t,” he replied vaguely.
“Would you like to drive it?”
“I’m afraid I don’t know how.” He grinned dreamily. “But someday I’d
like to learn.”
“That can be arranged.” She pulled away from the curb and began
driving down the street.
“‘D’ stands for ‘drive’ and ‘R’ indicates ‘reverse’?” he asked.
She glanced at him with surprise. “Surely you’ve ridden in cars with
automatic transmissions before.”
“Not very often.”
She laughed. “Ah, the British! So traditional.” She gestured at the floor.
“Look, ma, no clutch. Just a brake.” She touched it with her foot. “And a
gas pedal.” She pressed it down and accelerated up a ramp and past a road
sign that read “Bayshore Freeway.”
He grinned with pleasure, thinking that linear speed definitely could
become addicting.
“Herbert, what were you doing at the hospital?”
He frowned and looked away. “Oh, yes. That.” Then he briefly
explained that Leslie John Stephenson had been accidentally struck and
killed by an automobile.
“Oh, no!” She placed her right hand around his and held it tightly. “I’m
so sorry!”
“So am I.”
“Is there anything I can do? I mean, I know he was your friend, and I
know—”
“He wasn’t my friend.”
“Huh?” She raised her eyebrows. “But yesterday you said—”
“He was no one’s friend.”
“I don’t understand.”
“I’d just rather not discuss it, if you don’t mind.”
“Oh.” She took her hand away. “Okay.”
He felt small. She didn’t say any more, and very quickly the silence
became heavy. He grew worried and did not enjoy the scenery, his first trip
on a modern highway or the contagious rhythm of high-speed driving.
Certainly, the death of Stephenson meant that now he could leisurely
investigate 1979. He could be thorough and scientific. And if he survived
his own archaisms, he could return to his own time with the vast knowledge
of modern mankind.
But that didn’t help. Here he was with a perfectly gorgeous young lady
and he could not bring himself even to talk to her. He was embarrassed that
he had cut her off so abruptly. He supposed that they would have a brief
lunch somewhere and that that would be the end of it.
They parked and got out of the car. H.G. saw rows of small shops and
markets; beyond were the masts and spars of a fishing fleet at anchor. Gulls
circled. He felt very much at home, for aside from the architecture, he could
have been strolling through the restful streets of Eastbourne. The smells and
the sounds were the same.
“Ah, the waterfront!” he cried. “I love the seashore. How on earth did
you know?”
She faced him, her eyes full of concern, her hands clasped in back of
her. “Look, Herbert, I’m sorry about the way I acted in the car, but I’ve
never really been very good when it came to things like death. If you don’t
want to talk about it, that’s your choice and not mine. So, I apologize,
okay?”
His stomach slipped, and his body surged. Before he knew what he was
doing, he grasped her shoulders and pulled her close. His cheek touched her
hair; she smelled clean and fresh—like the sea—with just a hint of perfume,
just enough to make his knees sag. She returned the embrace, and he felt
her shiver slightly. He almost told her right then and there who he really
was.
She took his hand and led him toward the small establishments of
Fisherman’s Wharf.
“Do you like seafood?” she asked gaily.
“Right now, I’d eat anything,” he replied.
And so they entered Alioto’s, and the maître d’ seated them at a table by
a large window that had a panoramic view of the wharf, the fishing fleet,
the bay and the green mountains of Marin County. But what commanded
his immediate attention, what he gazed at in awe was the Golden Gate
Bridge. In his view, the massive twin towers, the suspension cables, the
mile-long span stood as a monument to the infinite capabilities of man.
“Magnificent,” he exclaimed.
“It is a nice view, isn’t it?” said the waiter who had been hovering near
their table for several minutes.
“View, indeed! It’s that bridge! It’s both impossible and spectacular! I
never could’ve imagined! The men who built it are geniuses, you hear?
Pure geniuses!”
“Yes, sir,” said the waiter, blushing at the show of overexuber-ance, yet
managing a thin smile.
“My good man, how might one contact them and query them about their
construction techniques?”
The waiter looked around, then replied discreetly, “I doubt that would
be possible, sir, since the bridge was completed in 1937.”
“Oh.” H.G. stiffened. “Oh, yes. Quite impossible.”
“Would the lady and the gentleman care for a cocktail?” the waiter
asked with a slight Italian lilt to his words.
“I’d love some wine,” said Amy.
“A smashing idea,” concurred H.G. He raised his eyes to the waiter.
“You wouldn’t just happen to have a grand cru Chablis, would you?”
“Any particular château, sir?”
“I’d prefer a château de grenouille, vintage 1890, actually.”
“I believe that the oldest grenouille that we have in the cellar is a 1976,”
he replied smoothly.
H.G. turned crimson at his faux pas, realizing too late that white wines
turned to vinegar if aged for longer than three years.
“Could I interest you in a California Riesling, sir?”
“We’ll try the 1976 grenouille, thank you.”
“An excellent choice, sir.” The waiter bowed slightly and left. H.G. got
the distinct impression that the man would have said the same thing had the
order been stale beer.
The wine was extremely good, but Amy did not have the courage to
admit that she would have preferred the California Riesling. She ordered
abalone, and he tried—devoured, actually—the scallops. The lunch was fun
and the atmosphere perfect, although she began to suspect that there was
something significantly wrong with the behavior and mannerisms of her
companion. He kept questioning her about things that she had always taken
for granted. And his references weren’t quite right. They lacked the brevity
that she was used to in the speech of other men. True, it could be merely the
charm of an English gentleman. Or perhaps she had been in San Francisco
too long.
He sipped his tea, then leaned back in his chair, delightfully sated, mind
still buzzing from half a bottle of Chablis. He knew he was talking too
much, but didn’t care. For the first time since landing in 1979 he felt
completely at ease.
“Good?” she asked.
“My dear girl, the slight touch of crushed herbs, the perfect blending of
lemon and lightly salted butter, the thin, browned crusts—along with this
exotic vegetable… I have never eaten a finer meal. And to dine with such a
charming companion makes the entire affair a most pleasant experience,
indeed.”
“But then again, it’s not McDonald’s,” she said with tongue in cheek.
He looked away, thought, then turned back. “No, it isn’t.” He was quite
serious. “You’re right.”
She looked at him askance, sighed and poured herself the last of the
wine. Was he putting her on?
“The view, that bridge… this is all too, too memorable.”
“Herbert, are you an actor?”
He laughed. “Good God, no. If I were, I certainly would not be here.”
He laughed again, a faraway twinkle in his eye.
“Where would you be?”
“Oh, I don’t know. Probably back in London, strutting across the boards
of the Lyceum doing Addison’s Cato.”
“Addison’s Cato?” she exclaimed in disbelief.
“Maybe not. Perhaps I’d fare better in Lady Windermere’s Fan. I must
tell you, though, I detest the theater.”
“You like movies then?”
He was momentarily speechless.
“What’s your favorite movie, Herbert?”
Right then and there he thought that she had finally caught him and for
what seemed like the longest time could not think of a response. Finally: “I
don’t have a favorite movie,” he said candidly.
“How perceptive you are.”
He blushed at the compliment and immediately changed the subject.
“My dear girl, how is it that a divorced young lady like yourself can make
her way so easily in the world without a male companion?”
“Who said it was easy?”
“Well, I mean, you drive your own motorcar, you have a respectable
position, you live in a comfortable flat, no doubt.”
“So I work hard. How does that make me any different from an English
divorcée?”
“An English divorcée would go home to her parents in the country,” he
replied without thinking.
She laughed. “Either that’s bullshit or you’ve been living in a cave,
population under two hundred.”
The words stung him. She excused herself to visit the ladies’ room, and
he certainly hoped that it wasn’t for a breath of fresh air. While she was
gone, he tried to sort out his thoughts. He felt cheap. She didn’t know who
he was, and until she did, he would feel like he was involved in an
adulterous affair, for those things thrived on deception. He had to make a
decision soon. Either he had to tell her about Stephenson and himself or he
had to break it off.
Break what off? She hadn’t asked him to become a suitor. Why the
bald-faced assumption?
She returned to the table and smiled brightly at him. She had freshened
up and applied new makeup, but the hint of red in her cheeks from the wine
remained. She looked both ravishing and angelic.
“Tell me, Amy—”
“Oh, no. No more questions. You’re avoiding me.”
“I am?”
“Of course. All I’ve done is provide you with answers. I don’t know
anything about you.”
“Why, that’s absolutely ridiculous.” With a nervous swing of his hand,
he knocked over his empty wine glass.
“Are you married, Herbert? Is that the reason you’re being so strange?
Is that it?”
“Good Lord, no!”
“Well, then?”
“Well, then, what?”
“Are you sure you’re not married?”
“Well, I was certain the last time I was home,” he said lightly, then
added, “But if I were, then I’d be paying my housekeeper, Mrs. Nelson, a
decent living wage for nothing, wouldn’t I?”
“Ah. You’re living with someone.”
“She occupies the upstairs bedroom off the kitchen along with pictures
of her deceased husband. She is sixty-seven and makes the most delicious
mint-flavored roast mutton I have ever tasted.”
Amy laughed; she was relieved.
“The French poet Charles Baudelaire once said, ‘Marriage is like a
cage. Those who are inside want to get out, and those who are outside want
to get in.’”
“You’re divorced, then?”
“I told you that, didn’t I?”
“No, you didn’t.”
“Oh.” He blushed. “Well, yes, I’m divorced.” He sighed. “I suppose that
makes me unsuitable.”
“For what? The priesthood?”
“I was unsuitable for that halfway through grammar school,” he said
ruefully.
“Just to remind you, I’m divorced, too, Herbert. Does that make me
unsuitable?”
Suddenly very warm, he loosened his collar and wiped perspiration off
his face with his napkin.
“Well? Does it?”
He supposed that it did when it came to the bans and vows of a proper
marriage. One’s bride should be Venus Urania—distant, unattainable, yet
endlessly pursued and ultimately seduced on a celestial bed of white
carnations. A divorcée did not qualify. He scowled because he knew that
those thoughts were incompatible with his enlightened views on social
change and scientific progress.
“No. But you’re different. You’re an American.” He fervently wished
that he had purchased a book on contemporary sociology before keeping the
luncheon engagement with her.
“Copout,” she sung.
“I beg your pardon?”
“Never mind,” she said. “Tell me what happened to your first marriage.”
“I ran off with one of my students.”
“You bastard,” she said lightly. “Why?”
Her language made him pause. “I didn’t want to be a suburban
breadwinner.”
“Now that, I can understand.” She leaned forward and gently touched
his hand. “Do you still love her?”
“I don’t know. I probably never really had a chance to find out.”
“What went wrong?”
“I was at the university when I met her. She was my first love and… my
first cousin.”
Amy’s eyes widened.
“After we were married, I didn’t have a job or any money, so we took
up chambers in her aunt’s house, and auntie’s little ceramics were all over
the place. Knickknacks, we call them. There wasn’t any place for me to sit,
let alone write or tinker. We never talked. To make matters worse, when we
went to bed, Isabel wouldn’t even undress in front of me. Do you know that
to this day I have never even seen her body? We weren’t exactly David and
Bathsheba, if you know what I mean.”
She laughed. “Thank God you didn’t have any children.”
He was startled by her thought, then suddenly laughed, too, and the
mirth was good, for he felt cleansed and worthy now. She was a child of the
twentieth century and had told him that she had had liberal-minded parents,
a middle-class childhood and a good education. Yet she had left college to
spend two years in a marriage that was as empty and frustrating as his.
Whereas he was the child of the nineteenth century and was forced to
accept the concept of an angry God. He had had a wretched childhood, the
family always bordering on poverty. The fact that he had even made it to
the university was miraculous.
They were totally different. They might as well have been from separate
planets as well as being from different centuries. And yet, they had ended
up in the same place. Both had endured problems and failures. He sensed
that they were equals; certainly, neither one was the product of a Utopia.
He looked at the bill for the lunch. $79.83. The price for the wine,
alone, had been $55.00. He grinned. No, she was not a perfect human being.
He wasn’t, either. And at prices like that, they hadn’t exactly eaten lunch at
the Erewhon Restaurant in the Garden of Eden. The world, then, did not
seem so alien.
They left Alioto’s hand in hand.
“Do you have a previous engagement for this evening?” He slipped his
arm around her waist and felt proud.
“Oh, no, sir,” she teased.
“Shall we have dinner together?”
“Why not?” Her eyes sparkled.
“Why not, indeed.”
“I must warn you, though, that you are not the kind of man that I
normally go out with.”
“Oh?”
“I’ve never met anyone quite like you before.”
“I’ll accept that as a compliment and meet you at your bank this
evening, then?”
“Around six. Can I take you back to town?”
“No thank you, Amy. I want to browse awhile.”
“Have fun,” she called. “And don’t hurt yourself.”
H.G. spent the entire afternoon at the San Francisco International Airport
examining the art of winged flight. He would have stayed there for days,
but he did not want to miss his dinner engagement with Amy Robbins, so
he reluctantly climbed aboard an Airporter Coach for the ride back into the
city. As the bulky vehicle pitched and yawed north along the Bayshore, he
settled back in the plush seat and recalled what he had seen.
The most distressing discovery had been “airport security”—employed
to combat a particularly vile phenomenon called “air piracy.” And to think
that just a few days ago he had predicated that crime would be eradicated in
the late twentieth century. He had been wrong. Mankind’s sense of morality
had not kept pace with advanced technology. He would have to warn others
of that fact when he returned home.
He shuddered. Thank God, Leslie John Stephenson would never have
an opportunity to travel on an airship.
Then there had been the giant airliners themselves. He had watched
them for hours. On the ground they had maneuvered like prehistoric
pterodactyls gathering the strength to fly. But when they were launched a
transformation took place. They leaped and soared into space—glistening in
the sun and rivaling any celestial angel that William Blake had ever etched.
H.G. had tried to find out what part—if any—he had played in the
development of the aircraft, but had been unsuccessful, airport security
being what it was. Perhaps another day.
He climbed off the Airporter Coach at Taylor and O’Farrell, then briskly
made his way through crowds of pedestrians to the Bank of England. He
pushed a button on his digital watch and saw that he was half an hour early.
He had enough time to learn more about his new environs, and hence
appear less of a naïve fool in Amy’s eyes.
He saw a newsstand across the street where men in suits browsed. He
went over, hoping to find a pocket-sized history of the twentieth century.
Instead, he found a day-old edition of the London Times for which he paid
the grizzled and handicapped proprietor one dollar. Reminding himself not
to be provincial, he tucked the newspaper under his arm (but in all truth,
thanked God The Times still existed) and continued to inspect the offerings.
He saw a magazine with an abstract design on its front and picked it up.
It was titled Scientific American, and he flipped through it until he came to
an article that captured his attention: “Wind Turbines—a Way into the
Twenty-first Century.”
The piece began by capsulating the depletion of oil and natural gas
fields, the dangers and limitations of nuclear power (of which he knew
nothing) and the impracticality of harnessing the sun in the next few
decades. It proposed as an alternative the use of wind to power the
enormous electrical plants which were so necessary for the survival of
modern civilization “as we now know it.” The next page pictured windturbine systems already in use. The devices were short, squat and as unlike
windmills as a cable car was an airliner. And yet H.G. understood. As
opposed to something taken from the ground and burned, the wind always
blew no matter what. Seafarers, for example, had been aware of the
majestic and limitless power of the wind for centuries, H.G. told himself.
And yet, so far it wasn’t an integral part of this great, advanced technology?
He was amazed and continued reading. The article concluded that mankind
had to harness the wind in order to survive and progress. H.G. shrugged
with disgust and replaced the magazine in the rack.
“I could have told them that eighty-six years ago,” he muttered.
From another rack he lifted off a publication titled Penthouse. On the
cover was a scantily clad young lady, perhaps the most beautiful female that
he had ever seen. He stared, unabashedly meeting the eyes in the
photograph, half thinking that they promised him something intimate. Great
Scott, it was the opposite of experiencing Henry James, he told himself.
One didn’t want to skip a damned thing!
His hands fluttering, he carefully opened the magazine and looked
farther. He came to a layout called “Scarlett,” and almost buried his face in
the pages. Talk about never seeing Isabel’s body during two years of
marriage! Here—in front of the entire world—was a hazel-eyed nymph
with nothing between her and her readers except a pair of long white
stockings! And those were discarded on the next page! He blushed, but
could not stop staring at Scarlett.
H.G. turned the page. Scarlett’s right hand was between her legs now,
her left upon her breast, her mouth open with self-induced passion. Then
she was sitting up, looking surprised—as if someone unseen had stolen into
her room. Her expression changed, and on the last page she was lying back,
beckoning the reader to join her on the bed and taste her charms.
Good-bye, Queen Victoria, whereever you are!
H.G. realized that he was gazing at something for which he could be
jailed back in his own time. The relaxation of censorship standards was
obviously incredible. He definitely approved, but he couldn’t fathom the
change. His heart swelled with both lust for Scarlett and pride for whoever
published the magazine. Why shouldn’t a free man be able to admire the
unfettered beauty of the female form? And if governments had finally
stopped legislating morality, then maybe mankind had taken a giant step
toward Utopia.
“You going to buy it or wear it out?”
H.G. jumped and turned. The proprietor of the newsstand was frowning
at him, his hands spread for emphasis. H.G. blushed, jammed the Penthouse
back into the rack and moved away, fighting an erection that would not
subside. He felt shameful. Why should he react that way? What the devil
was wrong with nude and alluring women? It was the Church, he angrily
thought, the Church, mother, the environment at Up Park, the early school
masters and the stifling effects of Victoria’s reign. He must change his
behavior; he must make his emotions as liberated as his intellect; he must
free himself from the concept of original sin before he could even consider
returning home to alter the bumbling course of mankind’s history.
Another time. Amy was waiting. And thank God he could finally
straighten all the way up when she saw him, turned, smiled and waved.
She took him to the Ben Jonson for drinks and dinner, and he was delighted,
for the decor of the restaurant was Elizabethan London. And he was pleased
to be inside a room where for once he was not faced with synthetic
materials. The tables were actually wood, the carpets wool, the napkins
linen, the silverware pewter. (In fact, it was imitation pewter, but he could
not tell the difference.) It made him unusually relaxed and comfortable to
be in an environment that was real.
The food was excellent and made him proud that he was an Englishman.
And since the gin was Bombay, he drank too much of it and waxed eloquent
throughout the entire meal. With sweeping gestures, he spoke about the
need to take a fresh look at John Stuart Mill’s utilitarian notions, given the
energy crisis and the drain on the world’s natural resources. Wind machines
weren’t the answer—mankind needed to rethink its priorities and honestly
admit that pleasure was its ultimate goal. And so on.
The only problem was that he laced his limited knowledge of 1979 with
phrases and references that were a century old. He even commented, with a
wild stab at sophistication, that the success of Penthouse was like what
would have happened much earlier if post-Sedanist sentiment had
prevailed.
That was it. No more. Despite his wit and charm, he was driving her
crazy. “Herbert, you’re either an actor or an anachronism.”
“I’m neither.”
“Well, something’s different about you! You’re the most well-educated,
well-read man I’ve ever gone out with, but where have you been for the
past ten years?”
“Are you saying that I’m naïve?” he asked, blushing.
“Oh, no.”
He grinned and recovered. “Well, my audacity compensates for my
innocence.”
She laughed with delight, shook her head and gave him a look full of
tenderness and admiration.
He knew then that he had already begun to court this girl in earnest.
What he didn’t know was that if she had not been interested, he might as
well have tried to charm a mother superior in the order of St. Teresa. She
chose her men now, having been chosen once in her life, which had been
one time too many.
They drove through the city, and a light mist began falling.
“Have you seen Star Wars?” she asked. “It just came out again.”
“I beg your pardon?”
“Star Wars. Have you seen it?”
“Did you say star… wars?” He straightened up and slowly turned, his
mind racing with questions that he was afraid to ask.
“Oh, come on, Herbert, will you quit putting me on? You know, the
movie!”
“No,” he gulped. “I haven’t seen it.”
“You haven’t?”
“I’ve been rather busy.”
“Boy, you really did need a vacation, didn’t you?”
And so he found himself next to her inside a theater that was not as
impressive as some of the great halls he had been to in London, although
the seats were better. If nothing else, he thought flippantly, mankind has
learned how to build comfortable furniture in the last eighty-six years.
The curtains parted, revealing, instead of a naked stage, a giant square
of white that he did not comprehend.
“A long time ago in a galaxy far away,” the entertainment began. A
book projected on a screen? H.G. thought. Then he gasped and ducked
down below the seat in front of him, for two strange-looking air… No, they
weren’t airships, they were… spaceships? Good God, they were firing at
each other. Who would have believed this after dozing through a staid
performance of The Importance of Being Earnest with Isabel less than a
year and a half ago? He peeked up over the chair and saw the large ship
swallow up the smaller one.
Amy turned and laughed. “Herbert, quit putting me on,” she whispered.
“You’re worse than a kid.”
H.G. composed himself and sat up straight, his eyes never leaving the
screen. The magic of the film was overwhelming, the illusion so complete
that he assumed his time machine had taken him into a future he never
dreamed possible. Not that it was Utopian, either. Far from it. True, there
had been the delightful little mechanical men who could think electrically,
but what of the weapons, the ominous death star? Annihilation of worlds at
the push of a button? The glorification of evil? Why, Darth Vader made
someone like Jack the Ripper seem insignificant. After all, what were a few
murdered courtesans compared to the destruction of entire cultures?
Obviously, evil had not vanished with the dawn of a new age. Stephenson—
damn his soul—may have been right.
H.G. sighed. He had glimpsed the future of the future and had seen how
mankind could perversely turn progress into cataclysmic horror. Could he
really have expected anything else? Perhaps not. But he could warn people
against it.
Nevertheless, he was depressed, for the vision of the entertainment was
twisted. The obsession was with how mankind in the future could use a
fantastic technology to prolong oppression, enslavement and violence. That
good had so blithely triumphed was not convincing to H.G. Star Wars, he
opined, could have been written by Seneca.
“Like it?” she asked.
“It was interesting,” he replied with deliberate ambiguity.
“Yeah. A little simplistic, but a lot of fun.”
Simplistic? What did this girl know of? Were there already civilizations
out there in space? He did not have the courage to ask.
“Maybe tomorrow night we can see something else,” she said casually,
then caught herself. “I mean, if you don’t have any other plans.”
He grinned. He didn’t and he wouldn’t. Obviously, she wanted to be
with him, and that was the most reassuring thought he’d had since dinner.
She took him back to her apartment and nonchalantly invited him up for
a drink. If he had not grown accustomed to her subtle directness, he would
have been astonished, for never before had a female asked him anywhere.
Still, that was the most radical change in social behavior he had
experienced yet. The freedom of a woman to take the initiative, which
throughout history had been a masculine prerogative. He wondered how
long the change had been the norm and what modern man thought of it.
He immediately liked the inside of her flat because it was old, yet had
been remodeled to suit her tastes. Like the Ben Jonson, everything was real
here—tables, chair, rugs, walls and bookcases. He didn’t comment, but he
sensed that some people in 1979 may not be all that thrilled with the fecund
abundance of synthetic, imitative materials.
She took his coat and gestured at her couch. He sat down rigidly,
uncertain and nervous in this, his first truly private encounter with a 1979er.
She returned with two glasses of chilled white wine, set them down on
the table in front of the couch, smiled and asked him if he liked Mozart.
“I love Mozart,” he replied, relieved that he would not have to comment
on contemporary music.
A wall of sound came from across the room. Surprised, he looked up
and saw that she had engaged an electronic music device that obviously was
the current version of the gramophone. Never had he heard such beautiful
melodies—so crystal clear, so pleasing to the ears. He sighed, closed his
eyes, leaned back and for a moment imagined that the entire London
Symphony Orchestra was in the room playing for just him and her. He was
transported, his nervousness swept away by the delicious flights of an
eighteenth-century concerto.
“It’s a quad system. Nice, huh?”
He nodded.
“I think I’ll change. Look around if you want to.” She left the room.
He got up to explore the flat and saw a beige telephone on the floor and
carefully inspected it. He ached to dismantle the device, but he knew it
wouldn’t be cricket without asking Amy for permission. Then again, just
how did one go about phrasing such a question? Excuse me, may I have a
look inside your telephone?
Finally, his curiosity got the better of him. He fished in his pocket, came
up with a dime and used it—as he would a halfpenny back home—to
unscrew the housing from the base. He lifted the cover off and grinned at
the minute, complex circuitry. It reminded him of the time machine’s RRL
components which had been so difficult to assemble; except that all his
wiring had been black.
What a deceptively simple idea! If one used colored wire to code the
circuits, one eliminated the possibility of serious error.
“Beep! Beep! Beep! Beep!”
He straightened up. What was that noise? What had he done? He
frantically inspected the telephone, but the beeping continued. In a panic, he
quickly reassembled the device, but it was only when he finally but the
receiver back onto its cradle that the noise stopped.
He retreated to the couch, took a large swallow of wine and calmed
himself. Muck about with the technology of this age and it ends up
shrieking at you, he muttered to himself.
She came back into the room, having brushed her hair and changed into
rather curious clothes. The shirt, a pullover, was common enough, but the
other garment resembled a blacksmith’s coveralls with a zipper that ran
straight down the front. Interesting. Nevertheless, she looked ravishing, and
thank the god of decorum she hadn’t put on any more of her perfume.
She settled down into the pillows on the other side of the couch and
tucked her toes under a cushion. Then she sipped her wine. She held the
glass close to her lips and smiled at him over the edge.
They talked lightly of music and books, Amy being direct about what
she liked and didn’t like. H.G. was cautious if she mentioned something
that he hadn’t heard of, but once he got the drift of a subject, he did allow
himself to expand and expound. She was pleased, for he seemed genuinely
interested in her opinions, which placed him apart from most of the men she
knew.
“You know, Amy, when two people can communicate in an atmosphere
like this without fear of malicious gossip, who needs marriage? Aside from
religion, it’s the most worthless institution I can think of.”
She laughed. “Well, then, a woman would never have to worry about
you proposing, would she?”
“My dear lady, I’m quite serious. I mean, I’ve never been able to
understand—for example—why two people in love needed a marriage
license before they could get into bed together.” He spread his hands.
“Who says they do?” She smiled playfully. “As a matter of fact, who
says they even have to be in love?”
He gave her a quick glance, then looked away and fooled with his
mustache. “Well, I’ve published a number of articles on free love, but I’m
not sure I’d go that far.”
“Free love?” She laughed again. “I haven’t heard that term since the
eighth grade!”
“Oh, really? What would you call it, then?”
“What’s wrong with ‘The Sexual Revolution’? Or haven’t you heard of
that, either?”
Sexual revolution? My God, he thought, what did it mean? There were
so many connotations. He grinned. “May I ask who is revolting against
whom?”
“That all depends on the company you keep, doesn’t it?” She replied in
a low voice, then moved nearer to him.
He sat up straight. His head was buzzing again, and he didn’t know
what to do with his hands. Given her close proximity, he had no place to put
them. Suddenly, he discovered his knees and hung onto them for dear life.
“This has been a delightful evening,” he managed to comment.
She nodded. “It’s certainly nice to meet someone you can really talk to
for a change.”
“Isn’t it? Especially when you share the same views.”
“Who said I agreed with you?”
Surprised, H.G. raised his eyebrows.
“I mean, I don’t happen to believe that religion is obsolete.”
“You don’t?”
“No, and I happen to think that marriage is a good way of keeping
records. Especially if children are involved.”
“Records? All they do is perpetuate bureaucracy.”
“You’re beginning to sound like an anarchist.”
“You must be joking!” he ejaculated. “I’m a progressive socialist!”
“That’s even worse,” she said lightly.
He stiffened. “I beg your pardon?”
“What difference does it make? The corporations run the world,
anyway.” She paused. “Besides, you’re one of the most charming men I’ve
ever met.”
“You’re not exactly dull-witted, yourself.”
She looked into his eyes, then slowly reached up and touched his cheek
with her fingertips. He melted back into the couch, uncertain about how to
respond. Always when he had been with a woman before, he had been in
command of the situation. Here, he wasn’t sure of anything. The lights
weren’t even out! There was no way he could reach over and grab this
woman and tell her that it wasn’t wrong while taking her clothes off. They
didn’t have to be quiet; they didn’t have to hurry; there were no time limits.
He was not even sure that the furtive nature of sex existed anymore.
She finally looked away (Was there disappointment in her eyes?), and
he regained the courage to speak.
“Well, I suppose that I should be going.”
“Oh? Where are you staying?” she asked flatly, and he knew that he had
said the wrong thing.
He smiled sheepishly. “Where am I staying? Nowhere, really.” He
blushed.
She sat up straight. “You mean, you haven’t even checked into a hotel
yet? Herbert, you’ve been here for two days!” She laughed and shook her
head.
“I haven’t had the time.”
“But where’s all your luggage?”
He grinned weakly. “I left rather unexpectedly.”
She leaned forward and placed both her hands over his. “You are a very
strange man. No, not strange. Mysterious.”
Once again, he rose to the occasion. “Hasn’t truth always been stranger
than fiction?”
She stared at him again in wonderment, then smiled. The magic
between them had returned. “You don’t have to go, you know.”
“I don’t?”
“No. You can stay here,” she whispered, her voice husky.
“I can?” he croaked.
“Herbert, will you please kiss me?”
She didn’t wait for an answer. She embraced and pulled him down onto
the center of the couch, her lips and tongue doing things to his mouth that
he had never before experienced. She kissed him again and again, and each
touch of her lips and tongue was more passionate and deeper than the time
before. He shuddered and trembled. What was she doing to him? He felt as
if his erection were going to burn a hole through his trousers; he crossed his
legs. She maneuvered him onto his back and let her hair envelop his face
and neck. Then she began caressing his chest, moving her hand in slow
circles that gradually went lower on his body.
He became acutely aware of her hand when it reached his lower
abdomen and began inching inside his trousers and shorts! He was
paralyzed. This beautiful girl was not distant and unattainable; she was
about to place her small, fragile and perfumed hand on his aching member.
The last woman he had coupled with wouldn’t even look at his penis, let
alone touch it.
This was not what he was used to; this was not the way it was supposed
to happen. He had always insisted that both men and women were sexual
beings, and that the act of love was a natural pleasure that should be shared
equally. But, good Lord, who had ever heard of a woman seducing a man
except in French novels?
Just before she was about to gently grasp his erection, he extricated
himself and sat up. (Once again, practice had defeated theory.)
Confused, she opened her eyes wide and stared up at him. “Did I do
something wrong?”
She must be joking, he thought. On the contrary, she had been
proceeding with more perfection than an angel in heaven, and he had been
unable to cope with it. Shame-faced, he looked down and saw that a small
stain had formed on his trousers, thanks to lubrication excreted by his
Cowper’s gland. He covered the blemish with his hand and blushed
crimson. “I guess I should be checking into a hotel.”
“Don’t you want to stay here?”
“I shouldn’t.”
“Okay, fine. I mean, if you don’t like me or if you’re all nervous and
uptight about something, there’s no point in you spending the night.” She
exhaled in a rush. “It’s better to find those things out up front anyway.”
“Right.” He stood, took a step, then turned and looked back at her. He
was trembling.
“Hey.” She sat up, reached out and took his hand. “What happened?”
“I really can’t explain.”
“You’re not gay, are you?” she asked with surprise.
“Gay?” He didn’t understand.
“Homosexual.”
He exploded with laughter, then abruptly stopped. She was being
serious; she did not understand that the problem was with his attitude, now
obviously archaic. He frowned and sat back down.
He had always considered himself a radical when it came to social
issues, but in reality he was a hypocrite. His feelings toward sex had never
really changed. He was a free-love advocate in name only. In the past, he
had used the rhetoric to be fashionable and to convince reluctant women to
submit without vows of marriage. Certainly, he had told them that they
should enjoy sex, but he never really expected them to. And certainly, he
had searched for a superb lover, a shadow-lover, but he had never expected
to find her.
There was no doubt that Amy was a different kind of woman. Was she
his Venus Urania?
He gulped, then turned and stared at her. She was pouting, and he had
never seen her—or any other woman—look that way. Her face was flushed;
her eyes were almost black; her lips were swollen and slightly parted. She
was neither an animal nor a chaste goddess. She was a sexual young
woman.
“Amy…” He felt a sudden rush of desire and lunged at her. She lunged
back. Soon, they were twisted and tangled on the couch, and both her hands
were inside his trousers, and he was gasping with pleasure and trying to
bury his face in the fullness of her breasts.
She extracted herself from him long enough to take him by the hand and
lead him down the hall into her bedroom.
They made love until they exhausted each other. She left the flower-printed
sheets to luxuriate in a hot, scented bath while he lay back and stared at the
ceiling. He realized that he was still mired in Victorianism, for when they
had first gotten under the covers, he had expected her to turn off the light
and passively allow him to mount her missionary style. It hadn’t happened
that way. Instead, after she had lit candles… He blushed at the memory.
Needless to say, the entire sequence of events added up to “equal”
lovemaking, but now he was somewhat apprehensive. He had just joined
the sexual revolution of the late twentieth century. He had been initiated,
and yet he would have been satisfied with much less. True, he had written a
few months ago that a female should enjoy sex as much as a male, but so
openly? Without pledges of love and marriage? She had overwhelmed him,
innocently taking pleasure as well as generously giving it back. For her to
be so honest with her own sexuality… No, he was not apprehensive, he was
frightened. Besides, he inwardly groaned, after this, how could he return to
the nineteenth century and be happy with a “normal” sexual experience?
“Great Scott!” he exclaimed and sat up straight. What the devil was he
doing sleeping with a lady of the future anyway? It was dishonorable!
Certainly he could make no commitment to a woman who was perhaps one
hundred years younger than he. He had to return to 1893 and get on with his
life. He had no business breaking sexual bread with a lass who ultimately
could expect nothing in return from him.
He groped for his shirt on the floor, then suddenly straightened up
again. What if she didn’t want anything from him? What if her sense of
freedom extended far beyond the confines of her bedroom? Could she share
her body with another as casually as she could indulge in a gourmet meal
and a premium bottle of wine? Moreover, was he to be judged on such a
basis as that? He frowned and lay back again, his hands under his head, his
eyes staring at the ceiling once more. He genuinely liked her. He didn’t
want her coupling with some strange man on this bed or any other! He
didn’t even want to know about what she had done in the past. Yes, he
wanted her to expect a commitment from him, even though he could not
offer one. He sighed.
“Blast.” What a dilemma. To be removed a century in time from one’s
ideal lover. And if he did try to bridge the gap by revealing his identity, she
would no doubt consider him insane; thus any chance for a serious
relationship would be shattered, the pieces left to drift along the vast, alien
emptiness of the fourth dimension.
His brain grew weary. He rolled onto his side. His last thought for the
night was that this lovemaking with Amy had been Utopian—a brief romp
through the meadows of Eden. The only problem was that the apple had
been eaten some time ago and the tree shaken bare of its fruit.
He slept deeply, but not well.
Something soft and light touched H.G.’s face, a moist, gentle pressure on
his lips that felt wonderful. Was he dreaming of her already? He must be.
No one else had ever kissed him like that.
His eyes fluttered open, and he saw her delicate face above him. If
every future morning promised this exotic return to consciousness, he might
not ever go back home, or get out of bed, either. Come to think of it, he
could stay here for the next thirty years and still unfailingly return to 1893.
After all, what was past was past, and no one would know that he was gone
until after he returned. He bubbled with laughter.
“Good morning,” she said after breaking the kiss.
He looked up at her and grinned. “If you could fashion an alarm clock
that felt like that, you’d make a million pounds.”
She laughed lightly, then gestured at the bedside table. “I brought you
some tea.” Sweet-smelling steam rose out of a tall, blue and gray mug.
“Why, thank you.” He rose up on one elbow.
“And the paper.” She dropped the morning edition of the Chronicle
beside him.
He picked up the front section then realized that Amy’s pale-blue robe
was open all the way down the front. He stared at her nude torso and
willowy thighs. Then he swept away the paper between them. It floated into
the air and fell to the floor, a confusion of stories and sections. He pulled
her down beside him, kissed her and caressed her. She began to respond. He
held her tightly. She pressed her body against his. He couldn’t wait. He
rolled on top of her, but was so eager that he failed to check his momentum.
He kept right on going and fell off the bed.
Surprised, she rose up on one elbow and looked down at him. “Are you
okay?” Then she began to giggle; she put her hand to her mouth, but could
not suppress her mirth.
H.G. did not share her humor, however, for he was staring at the San
Francisco Chronicle.
“Herbert, are you okay?”
The jumble of flying newspaper had fallen open to a page-three story.
The headline had captured his full attention. “GIRL FOUND MURDERED
IN MASSAGE PARLOR. Police say ‘Jack the Ripper’ style slaying has no
motive.” H.G. slumped. He put his head in his hands and softly moaned.
“What’s wrong?”
Dr. Leslie John Stephenson was alive.
OceanofPDF.com
8
Number 13 Nob Hill Circle was a stately, narrow and tall residence,
recently renovated into five spacious apartments, complete with the latest in
security systems to prevent the dangerous and unwanted from even getting
past the hedgerow surrounding the place. Freshly painted brown with a gray
roof and trim, the structure glistened in the sun as it had done over one
hundred years ago when first built.
On the top floor, a window opened as the building’s newest tenant let
the crisp morning sea breeze into the beige and rust decor of his kitchen.
Leslie John Stephenson stood naked, leaning over the sink with his nose
up to the good salt air. He turned, stretched and pounded his rock-hard
belly. In the microwave range he brewed himself tea, then took the cup and
padded through his one-bedroom flat, not just furnished, but decorated. He
loved the feel of the thick shag on his feet, the look of the hanging chrome
lamps, the pastel colors on the walls, the contemporary furniture that was
designed for sprawling instead of sitting. He smiled. The place was dark
Victorian on the outside and opulent modern on the inside. He could not
have chosen better living quarters to start his new life.
He set his tea on a glass table. Then he lit a Danish fireplace (the
instructions had identified it as such), and basked in the instant glow. He
settled into a chair in front of the fire, spread his muscular legs and let the
heat warm his lower body. The uninhibited feel of being nude was
exhilarating, for if his father had ever caught him undressed he had been
immediately beaten. But that was past now. He sipped his tea and recalled
how he had arrived on Nob Hill—high above exotic San Francisco—and
how the final break had come.
The night before last, he had awakened in a hospital ward. After a brief,
catlike inspection of the room, he had realized that he was being kept inside
something called “Intensive Care” and that everyone there, including
himself, had been designated “John Doe.” He had scanned his chart and
discovered that he was number sixteen, was suffering from a concussion
and was being held for observation, yet he felt fine.
But there was more: he had heard a noise and ducked down behind his
bed. After a moment, he had peeked over the top and seen a nurse push
open one of the double glass doors, look inside, then leave. He knew he
must leave the place before they discovered who he was. Wells was no
doubt somewhere in the hospital trying to find him. He must disappear from
the medical facility just as he had outfoxed Scotland Yard in the late
nineteenth century.
He straightened up, then looked at the chart of the patient next to him.
The poor chap was suffering from emphysema. Stephenson clucked his
tongue, remembering that that particular form of lung disease was
incurable. He saw that the thin, elderly man was encased in a translucent,
tentlike affair that rose and fell with his labored breathing. How marvelous,
he thought.
The man was actually being kept alive by a mechanical device that
governed his breathing, fed him an oxygen mixture and prevented infection.
Remarkable!
Stephenson had retrieved his clothes out of the ward’s common closet,
quickly dressed, then gone back to his bed. He had taken his chart and
switched it with that of the emphysema victim, then destroyed the poor
soul’s records and buried them in a waste receptacle.
Next, Stephenson had gone back to the oxygen system and admired it
all over again. What enormous strides medicine must have taken in the last
eighty-six years. Despite the dim light, he read the rather simple
instructions and traced the series of valves and tubes, then checked the
pressure gauges and indicators. He clucked his tongue again; the technician
who had last calibrated the machine had done so incorrectly. The patient
had not been getting enough oxygen. Stephenson carefully adjusted the
machine until it was working properly. He noticed that the emphysema
victim began to breathe easier almost immediately. He smiled broadly.
Yes, he had been so taken with the automatic oxygen system that he
almost hated himself for turning it off.
After he had left the hospital, he had gone back to the Jack Tar Hotel,
retrieved his belongings, then checked out. Then he hired a cab driver to
take him through the city despite the late hour. They rode along the dark
streets of the Mission District, and Stephenson saw trash and slime in the
streets and gangs of brown youths strutting in the shadows, charged with
bravado and evil. He observed drunks in doorways—half-living testaments
to the god of human despair. There were also policemen, which, he sensed,
were all that kept this section of the city from being overrun by the denizens
of chaos and anarchy.
Then they toured the Fillmore District where Stephenson witnessed
similar monuments to the wretchedness of the human condition, only here
the few people on the street were black, and the police did not hesitate to
arrest them. As before: trash in the gutters was the decor here, and slime
was the mortar that kept it from blowing into other sections of town.
He laughed gleefully. So the blacks were still enslaved, were they? And
the nobleness of an Abraham Lincoln had all gone for naught. True, they
had obviously made it out of the cotton fields, but into what? Like their
eastern European counterparts who had gone to London to escape
oppression in the late nineteenth century, these blacks had fled their rural
chains only to be dumped into the bowels of a city and kept there by the
invisible walls of a faceless ruling class.
The cornucopia of violence and crime that he had watched on the Jack
Tar Hotel’s television was a true barometer. Satan had not let him down. If
anything, conditions here were worse than they had ever been in London’s
East End.
H.G. Wells had said that technology was the salvation and the
redemption of mankind. What a simpering, incorrect fool. Technology
hadn’t erased urban blight, it had been used to create it!
But, oh, Wells had been right about one thing: science was indeed a
wonderful tool. The powerful few could use it to distance and shield
themselves from the stench and anger of the masses. Stephenson was
exhilarated. He really did belong—here, in 1979.
His tour ended with a cruise down North Beach’s Broadway. He felt an
instant affinity for the area. The lights were bright and gaudy, yet the alleys
and side streets were dark. And the majority of small establishments
advertised commodities of an illicit sexual nature! How simply smashing!
He gaped at several scantily clad ladies curved into doorways who
beckoned passers-by in off the street. Yes, he definitely had to be near
Broadway. Within walking distance.
He had rented his flat within hours after leaving North Beach. Granted,
the twelve hundred and fifty dollars for one month’s rent was outrageous,
but money was no object. In addition to his pound notes, he had three
thousand pounds in gold in his money belt. If perchance he ever came up a
bit short, he could always go back to 1895 and get more. Yes, Nob Hill was
the perfect location for him. Such tranquility, such elegance, and only a
mere six blocks away from Broadway.
He shuddered with pleasure, then sprang to his feet and headed for the
bathroom. The time machine, he thought, what a simply marvelous
invention. If one used it properly, one need never lack anything worldly at
all. (Not that anything spiritual was worth a damn.) One need never even
die.
He looked up and smiled at his rugged visage in the vanity mirror.
Imagine the potential! In a matter of hours, he could be back in ancient
Egypt, lurking through the palace antechambers, easily disposing of the
guards with an automatic weapon, surprising Cleopatra in her boudoir. He
could be assaulting and butchering her voluptuous body before Antony ever
reached the shores of the Nile. A few minutes further along the fourth
dimension, and he could be sodomizing Helen of Troy and cutting up the
face that launched a thousand ships. Mary Magdalene could he his, too,
raped and slaughtered before Jesus ever had a chance to save her wretched
soul. But why stop there? Just a few centuries away, and he could violate
and murder the simple peasant girl Joan of Arc, saving the British the
trouble of a stake and a fire at Rouen, not to mention several thousand lives.
He leaned against the vanity, for the prospect made his knees weak. He
envisioned all of history laid out before him like an obscure street in
Whitechapel. He could pick any woman from any era; and when he had
finished with her, he would have changed the course of human events. And
what man had ever accomplished that? He could choose a queen or a
princess. Isabella or Elizabeth, Catherine or Mary Queen of Scots. Think of
it!
If only he had the special key that overrode the Rotation Reversal Lock.
He looked down and discovered that he had reached into the vanity,
picked up and was fondling the surgical knives that he had stolen from the
hospital.
“I’ll tell you what’s wrong,” said H.G., getting to his feet. “Dr. Leslie John
Stephenson is alive, that’s what’s wrong!” He put on his trousers.
“I don’t understand.”
He gave her the newspaper, then went to the bedroom window and
stared out, but did not appreciate the morning sunlight shining through the
delicate trees and making shadow patterns on Green Street.
She quickly read the article but was still puzzled. “This doesn’t say
anything about Leslie John Stephenson.”
“Of course, it doesn’t!” he exclaimed. “The man obviously committed
another horrible crime and then escaped! It’s not as if he would leave a
calling card, you know.”
She came up behind him and placed her arms around him. “Would you
mind telling me what’s going on?” she asked gently.
He broke away from her and paced by the window. How much could he
tell her? After all, she would need some explanation. He decided to proceed
as if the notorious Whitechapel murders had occurred just a few years ago.
And—in his reality—they had.
“Amy, Dr. Leslie John Stephenson is actually a pathological killer who
came to San Francisco several days ago. I am here to apprehend him and
see that justice is properly served.”
“Oh. Then you work for Scotland Yard.”
He cleared his throat. “Their interests are involved, although I am
accountable only to myself, and Dr. Stephenson is totally my
responsibility.”
“It really doesn’t matter who you work for.” She could not hide the
disappointment in her voice. “What’s important is that you’re not a writer or
a world traveler at all, are you? And you told me that you were.”
He was stung. He sat beside her and took her hand. “Amy, I wasn’t
lying to you! You must believe me!”
“Then if you are what you say you are, why are you—of all people—
chasing a murderer?”
He groaned. “You might say that it is a personal vendetta.”
“Did he do something to someone in your family?”
“No. The fact of the matter is that I allowed him to flee to San
Francisco.”
“How?”
“Amy, please. I can’t explain just yet, but please give me your trust.”
“First you tell me that this Stephenson is a traveling companion of
yours. Then you tell me that he’s dead. Now you tell me that he’s alive and
is a killer. And all because the newspaper says some poor prostitute was
murdered.” She paused. “If I hadn’t actually seen him, I’d wonder if he
existed or not.”
“No one else but Stephenson could have committed that crime!” he
interjected.
“Okay, okay, you’ve made your point.”
“You’ll trust me, then?”
“Why is that so important?”
“Amy, I might need your help.”
“I’m not related to Sherlock Holmes, Herbert.”
“You don’t believe a word I’ve said, do you?”
“Hey! I’m not involved in this, remember? So what does it matter?”
“Oh, blast!” He threw up his hands. “If only—”
“Herbert, if you’re really convinced that Dr. Stephenson is responsible
for this murder, why don’t you just go to the police and be done with it?”
“I don’t think they’d understand,” he replied vaguely with a distant glint
in his eyes.
“Oh, damn!”
“Amy—”
She scowled at him. “I’m going to be late to work! And I’ve never been
late to work before!” She hurried out of the room.
He caught up with her in the hallway, turned her around and held her
gently, but tightly. She resisted at first, then relaxed, for she could feel his
concern, his need for another human being to understand. She didn’t
understand, but her sudden anger had melted away.
“Amy, I—”
“Shhhh!” She placed a finger over his lips. “Don’t say anything. None
of this makes any sense to me right now, but that’s not important. You feel
genuine, therefore you are. And whatever you do, take care of yourself and
don’t get hurt. I’m a lousy nurse.” She kissed him as she had done when she
first woke him up. Then she turned, quickly went into the bathroom and
closed the door.
He stared blankly at where she had been and heard the shower running.
He grinned and felt a rush of emotion; tears rolled down his cheeks and into
his mustache.
Stephenson found an English pub and restaurant several blocks away from
his apartment. The place was not crowded. It looked like an establishment
that catered more to a drinking clientele than a dining one. That was good to
know, for if he ever got nostalgic, he could come in here some evening, sit
at the bar and swap lies with the rest of the British expatriates.
Since he was famished, he ordered the most expensive item on the
menu. Soon he was brought a rib-eye steak, three fried eggs, a basket of
chips, a plate of fried bread and a pot of hot tea. The main part of the meal
was decidedly American, but after several bites, he wholeheartedly
approved. When he finished eating, he pushed his plate away, then saw a
morning newspaper on a chair several tables away. He opened it up While
sipping his tea he looked for a story that recounted last night’s escapade but
was disappointed that he hadn’t made page one. That would come in due
time. Besides, page three wasn’t all that obscure, and he was particularly
satisfied with the use of his infamous sobriquet, “Jack the Ripper.” He
loved the accurate reportage of what he had done to the petite Chinese
courtesan. It had been a pity that he hadn’t had more time to work, but the
blood had started to seep under the partition into the next cubicle. He had
departed prematurely.
He chuckled at the story’s last sentence. “Police spokesmen refused to
speculate about the murder, commenting only that ‘no suspects exist at this
time.’” He dropped the paper, leaned back in his chair and thought.
According to hospital authorities, he was dead. Since he was currently a
visitor in 1979, he didn’t exist, either! Smiling, he couldn’t ever recall
feeling so secure. He felt an omnipotent sense of well-being. Not only was
he dead, he did not exist, he repeated to himself. Yet, he had never been in
better health and he could render evil anytime he wanted to. The choice was
his. Whoever struck his whimsical fancy.
He was about to leave when he overheard several customers speaking
about crime. He listened.
“Did you read the story about Manson in the paper this morning?”
“Yeah.”
“Think they’ll let him out?”
“Not a chance.”
“You know what really gets me? It costs the taxpayers twenty grand a
year to keep that son of a bitch alive.”
“Yeah,” said the other. “And did you read about the other psycho that’s
running around out there?”
“No.”
“Somebody killed one of them oriental massage-parlor girls.”
“Boy, when the hookers ain’t even safe, you know something’s wrong.”
“You better believe.”
“Give us two more, bartender.”
Who was this chap, Manson, that they were discussing? Stephenson
wondered. He picked up the paper again and turned to the front page. The
banner was “MANSON UP FOR PAROLE SOON.” He avidly read the
article, gleaning that “Charlie” was responsible for a whole string of brutal
slayings.
What annoyed Stephenson, however, was the suggestion that Manson
was the worst killer of all time. He didn’t know who was (although it was
an interesting question), but he certainly didn’t think that the crown should
rest on Charlie’s head. What about Jack the Ripper’s reputation? So,
Charlie’s the worst of them all, is he? Well, then, maybe we should show
the people of San Francisco who really is the greatest. Seventy-three stab
wounds in someone’s back is easy, Charlie. Wait until you read about what
my little lancets can do.
When he paid the bill, he noticed that he was getting short of American
currency. He stepped out onto the sidewalk, squinted into the sun, then
looked around to get his bearings. He wasn’t that far from the Bank of
England. Hadn’t the delectable young lady said that he could exchange
money anytime between the hours of ten and three? He had plenty of time.
He eyed the men that passed, appreciated their casual and debonair
attire. He scowled as he recalled that the bloodstains had not quite come out
of his only other outfit of clothes, now drip-drying over the tub in his Nob
Hill flat. He must go shopping. He did not have nearly enough clothes for
this time and this city. He had always prided himself on his dapper
appearance and saw no reason why he shouldn’t continue that standard in
1979. He must appear as the most ultramodern and exotic gentleman ever to
strut down The Broadway. He turned—his half boots flashing in the sun—
and triumphantly started off toward the bank.
When Amy Robbins rapped on one of the bank’s glass doors with her car
keys and was let inside by the security guard, she was embarrassed and
hoped no one would notice that she was twenty-three minutes late. Eyes
down, she hurried for her desk. She sat down and had begun sorting through
a stack of credit-card applications when she saw someone lean against her
desk. She looked up, face hot with guilt.
“You look great,” said Carole Thomas, a buxom, keen-eyed woman who
had just recently risen from the ranks of the tellers to become the bank’s
only other female officer.
“Oh hi, Carole.”
“Something happened, didn’t it?”
“What do you mean?”
“You’re almost a half hour late.”
“Traffic.”
Carole laughed and nodded. “Where? Going in or coming out of the
bedroom?”
“Carole!”
“Okay, okay, I won’t pry. I’ll just say congratulations. It’s about time
you met someone worth meeting.” She started away.
Amy smiled and felt a surge of joy. “Carole?”
She turned. “What?”
“He’s like a little boy and a grandfather all rolled into one.”
“Interesting. Do I know him?”
“You’ve never met. I promise.”
“Well, then, does he have a brother?”
“How should I know?”
Carole laughed. “A cousin, maybe? Look, I’ve got to run. Coffee later?”
“Sure. Hey—why don’t you come over for dinner Friday night? You
can meet Herbert.”
“Herbert?” She rolled her eyes. “Are you sure you got the name right?”
Amy laughed. “Around six-thirty?”
“I’ll be there. I wouldn’t miss a look at a Herbert for anything in the
world.”
Amy daydreamed about the night before. She felt warm and had no selfdoubts. Her time with Herbert had been one of those momentous occasions
when she knew that the feelings had been reciprocal. Even the mysterious
scene with him this morning had not diminished her sense of well-being.
Except just who was Mr. Herbert Wells from London? She sensed that
when she did find out, she ultimately would be pleasantly surprised. She
leaned back, placed her hands behind her head and let her mind drift back
into her bedroom. She smiled.
Suddenly, she bolted straight up in the chair and stared at the clock
across the room. What was she doing? The doors would be open in less than
an hour, and she hadn’t accomplished a thing! She grabbed all the papers
out of her “In” basket and placed them in front of her, as if that would make
them go away faster. Then she read a loan application from a Ms. Alexis
Lynd who wanted to renovate a town house on Twin Peaks. The woman
was an account executive for an advertising agency and had liquid assets in
the sixty-thousand-dollar range. (Amy wished she did.) Application
approved. And so it went.
When the security guards unlocked the doors for the patrons of the
bank, she was concentrating on a report about fluctuations in world
currencies, imagining the wails of Italian financiers as the lira continued to
plunge, conjuring up the grins of sultans as the dinar tripled in value. She
felt a presence. She dropped her pen and looked up.
“Yes, may I—” She gasped and almost put her hand to her mouth, but
had the presence of mind to hang on to the arms of her chair. Herbert was
right! Standing before her in a poised slouch was Dr. Stephenson, the lean
and dark Englishman who was supposed to be dead. He loomed larger than
life, his deep-set eyes instinctively searching her face for weakness. She
forced a smile and felt some color return to her face.
“Good morning, Miss…”
“Robbins,” she replied automatically.
“Oh, yes. Miss Robbins. I hope I didn’t startle you.” He smiled thinly. “I
would like to exchange more currency.”
“Certainly.”
He handed her a stack of pound notes.
She stared at them dumbly for a moment, thoughts racing through her
mind. She opened and closed her desk drawer, then smiled again. “If you’ll
excuse me, sir. I’ll check this morning’s rate. It’ll only take a minute.”
“Take your time.” He nodded imperceptibly and sat down.
She crossed the room, desperately hoping that her voice hadn’t
quavered. She went behind a row of teller windows, furtively grabbed a
telephone and dialed her apartment. The five rings were maddening, but
finally she got an answer.
“Herbert!”
“Oh, hello, Amy, dear, how nice that you should—”
“Herbert, he’s here!”
A long, static-filled pause.
“For God’s sake, did you hear me?”
“Keep him in the bank as long as you possibly can. I’ll be there
straightaway.”
“But what if I can’t?”
“Try.” He hung up.
With a trembling hand, she hung up, too, then glanced back at her desk
and saw that he was still sitting there. What she hadn’t seen was that he had
watched her make the telephone call.
She returned to her desk, chin held high, and forced a smile. She made a
show of sitting down and arranging her clothes, as if movement would keep
him occupied.
“One-point-seven-eight this morning, sir,” she reported. “That’s better
than when you first came in.”
“Smashing,” he replied in low, rich tones, continuing to lounge in the
chair. His head was back and his eyes almost closed so that he appeared half
asleep. Actually, he was brooding, his fingers twitching compulsively as he
ran them back and forth over his lips.
She calculated the amount of money due him, then opened her drawer
and slowly began counting out the dollars. She desperately tried to think of
a ploy. She couldn’t have a security guard detain him because there was no
cause. Finally, she handed him the cash.
“There you go, sir.”
“Thank you.” He folded the money, pocketed it, rose and smiled at her.
She stood up, too. If she could just get him to talk. Something. “Are you
enjoying your stay in San Francisco?”
“Yes. Very much. Thank you.”
“How did you like the Jack Tar Hotel?”
He frowned darkly; his eyes narrowed and glittered at her. Then he
laughed derisively.
She realized her slip and placed her hand to her mouth.
“Miss Robbins, you wouldn’t just happen to know a gentleman named
Wells, would you?”
H.G. arrived at the bank five minutes too late and had to calm a visibly
shaken Amy Robbins by tightly holding her hand across the desk and
whispering reassurances. She was on the verge of tears, but controlled
herself lest she call attention to herself.
“I’m sorry,” she uttered. “I’m really sorry.”
“It’s quite all right, Amy. Really. I’ll find Leslie John Stephenson. After
all, he is only human.”
She managed a smile. “You’re so damned nice.”
“Come on, then.”
Amy made a quick phone call and learned that Stephenson had checked
out of the Jack Tar Hotel yesterday, paid cash and hadn’t left a forwarding
address.
He might as well be dead, H.G. thought wryly as he flagged down a taxi
outside the bank. He asked the driver to take him to the police station, then
sat back and blankly stared out the window. He took no pleasure in his ride
through the city.
He was, however, quite simply amazed when he saw the size of the San
Francisco Police Department. It was almost as large and forbidding as the
hospital, although at least it was clean and freshly painted on the outside.
Uniformed policemen left the building in fours and fives, casually
checked their weapons and other paraphernalia, then climbed into black and
white vehicles waiting like cavalry horses and sped away. H.G. watched in
awe. Never before had he seen so many police. And every one of them
carried sidearms. Were most San Franciscans criminally inclined, as
Stephenson had opined in the Jack Tar Hotel suite? Was that why a city
(even now) one fourth the size of greater London needed regiments of
police to maintain the status quo? Or was the enemy the citizenry itself?
And if that were the case, then America had indeed become a totalitarian
state. He frowned and pondered. If the land of the free had succumbed to
some form of oppression, it certainly wasn’t visible. He had detected no
chains, no slavery, no one functioning against their will. No, no, he said to
himself, there was no dictatorship here. Still, why the vast numbers of men
in blue?
“Wait.” He grinned. Of course! They were employed to assist the city’s
populace. That explained it.
He turned and started for the door, then stopped again. If they were
good samaritans, he postulated coldly, then why did they carry weapons?
He entered the building with a foreboding sense of melancholy.
He made his way to the Homicide Division with relative ease, correctly
surmising that employees who directed him assumed that because of his
conservative attire he was either a government official or a barrister. Once
there, however, he became embroiled with a bureaucratic desk sergeant who
wanted to know his name, address, telephone number, the nature of his
business and to see his identification before he would consider arranging an
appointment with the lieutenant. Annoyed and ruffled, H.G. refused on all
counts, then argued with the man, but got nowhere. So, he sat on the bench
opposite the desk and decided to wait. He read through the newspaper and
became knowledgeable of the political shenanigans of a certain Jerry
Brown, governor of the state of California. The man was a master of
gerrymandering and the red herring, he mused as he put the paper down,
then resumed glaring at the desk sergeant.
Three hours later, H.G. sighed and decided to relent. He told the desk
sergeant that he had information concerning the identity of the “massageparlor murderer.”
“Well, why didn’t you say so in the first place?”
Within minutes, H.G. found himself seated on a red-leather couch inside
an office. The walls were lined with plaques, degrees, photographs and
other sundry milestones of one man’s long career of public service. Behind
a desk and staring out the window was Lieutenant J. Willard Mitchell, a
graying but trim twenty-seven-year veteran of the force. Occasionally, he
would drink from a large mug and puff on a cigarette. His ashtray was
overflowing. So were the stacks of papers on his desk. So was the number
of telephone calls that came into his office, making the electronic box
beside his chair light up like an electric Christmas tree. As he regarded
Mitchell, H.G. quickly understood that he was in the presence of a man who
had seen it all, who had done everything, but didn’t have the time to reflect
upon one iota of it.
Mitchell picked up his telephone and pressed a button. “Ruth, hold the
calls, will you please?” His voice had a slow and pleasant quality, making it
seem like his thoughts were detached from the frenetic activity around him.
“And tell Sergeant Ray to step in here, if he’s got a minute.”
Moments later, a man came into the room. He wore his hair shoulderlength. He was dressed in jeans and a colorful shirt open to his abdomen.
Incongruously so, thought H.G.; first, he was a detective, and second, his
face resembled that of a wise English bulldog. No doubt he, too, had had his
share of experiences.
Ray took a chair across the room and regarded H.G. with a suspicion
normally reserved for representatives of the mayor’s office. He pulled a pen
and note pad out of his pants and waited.
“Mr. Wells has some information on the murder last night, and I thought
we should both hear him out. For the record.”
“Which murder?”
“The one in the massage parlor.”
“Oh, yeah.” Ray made a note.
“Are you a U.S. citizen?” Mitchell asked H.G.
“No,” H.G. replied. “As you can obviously tell, I’m from London. I’m
here on a visit.”
“First time in the States?”
“Yes.”
“And yet you have information concerning a murder in the city of San
Francisco?”
“Yes. You might say that I’m a citizen of the world,” he added weakly.
Mitchell leaned over his desk, folded his hands over a mass of papers
and forced a grin. “Fine. Now why don’t you tell us what you came to tell
us?”
H.G. cleared his throat. “I happen to know that the person responsible
for the death of the Chinese courtesan is a man named Leslie John
Stephenson.”
“S-t-e-v-e-n-s-o-n?” asked Ray, furiously scribbling.
“No. Step-hen-son. The man resides in London. He is a Harley Street
physician, approximately thirty-one or -two, six feet tall, one hundred
eighty pounds I would guess, dark-brown hair and deep-set eyes.”
“Check it out, Sergeant.”
“Yes, sir.” Ray left the room.
Mitchell turned back to H.G. “How do you know this, Mr. Wells?”
“That’s a bit hard to explain. As a matter of fact, it’s impossible.” His
hands felt clammy.
“I see.” The lieutenant thought a moment. “Are you a psychic?”
“I beg your pardon?”
“Do you have spiritual powers? I’m curious as to the source of your
information.”
“I have no supernatural gifts, Lieutenant! If I could reveal my source to
you, I would do so gladly, but I can’t. I’ve told you what I know.”
Moments later, Ray returned and handed Mitchell several large, folded
sheets. Then he excused himself and left the office. The lieutenant briefly
studied the information before smiling tactfully at H.G.
“Well, I appreciate you coming in and sharing your insights with us, Mr.
Wells. Where can we reach you in the event we need to ask you something
else?”
“Is that necessary? It’s rather awkward… . I’ve been staying with a
friend. Must we involve her in this?”
“Only if we have to contact you. We’re very discreet, believe me.”
“Very well. I’m staying at 92½; Green Street and my friend’s name is
Miss Amy Robbins.”
Mitchell nodded and put down his pencil. “Thanks for your time, then.”
Suddenly, H.G. realized what was happening. He straightened up and
spoke indignantly. “You’re not going to do anything, are you?”
“Mr. Wells, you’re asking us to arrest a man for murder because you say
he committed a crime. If we worked like that, half this town would be in
jail.”
“Are you doubting my word?”
Mitchell frowned, picked up the information, and began to read. “U.S.
Customs has no record of a Dr. Leslie John Stephenson entering this
country, but he could have entered illegally. The British Government has no
record of ever issuing a passport to a Leslie Stephenson, but he could’ve
forged one. The London police have no record of a Leslie John Stephenson,
and neither do Scotland Yard, the FBI, CIA, MI-5, Interpol or the Sûreté.”
He paused to light another cigarette. “Finally, the United Kingdom’s Bureau
of Vital Statistics has no record of a Leslie John Stephenson.” He scowled
at H.G. “Yes, Mr. Wells, I am doubting your word.”
H.G. was so impressed that he did not realize that Mitchell had called
him a liar. “How did you get all that information so quickly?”
“Computers, Mr. Wells.” He got up and went to the window. “We have
them just like everybody else.” He turned and gestured at the door. “Now, if
you don’t mind, I’m a very busy man.”
“You’re asking me to leave?” H.G. was astonished.
“Let me put it another way,” he said kindly. “I’ve tried to be nice to you
because you’re a foreigner. Still, I don’t appreciate publicity stunts or
receiving false information. If I didn’t have to deal with your consulate, I’d
have you locked up and held for seventy-two hours.”
H.G. stiffened. “I have not given you false information, Lieutenant!”
“The computers don’t lie!” Mitchell replied sharply.
“My good man, do you mean to say that you would trust an electronic
device more than the word of a gentleman?”
“Wouldn’t you?” Mitchell grinned and held the door open for him.
“And please, Mr. Wells, don’t ever let me see you in this building again,
okay? Cheerio.”
Shaken, H.G. left and hurried for the exit. He bit his lip, disillusioned,
his optimism shattered. Oh, certainly, these 1979ers had cars and airships
and telephones and television and an entire potpourri of electronic wizardry
that did everything from drying one’s hair to thinking for him. And yet, the
technology had not freed mankind from crime; rather, man’s inhumanity to
man appeared to be on the rise. Why, if Lieutenant Mitchell’s implications
were accurate, crime was increasing faster than the police could control it.
He left the building, deep in thought. Was man incapable of keeping
pace with science? Or had anyone bothered to find out? Or was it that the
marvels of science did not serve all mankind, hence some reacted against it
and committed horrible crimes? Or could it be that technology created its
own form of alienation?
H.G. would have to answer those questions before he left 1979. For a
moment, he wanted to cry. Would he have to warn people about the dangers
of progress? Would he have to write that the future was a brilliantly lit,
clean yet poisonous environment where one had nothing to look forward to?
He clenched his jaws and turned his back to a sudden gust of cold wind.
Face it, H.G. Recognize it. You will write whatever is the truth and you will
remain a champion of the intellect and the rational, no matter what.
He began walking away from the police headquarters, head down,
soberly looking at weeds that grew out of cracks in the concrete. All right,
he thought, so there was no Utopia. So man couldn’t handle technology
right now. Who was to say that resilient and clever human beings of 2079
wouldn’t straighten things out? Or 3079! He smiled. Perhaps he would take
another flight along the fourth dimension and find out.
So, the San Francisco Police Department intended to do nothing about
Leslie John Stephenson. He straightened up and threw back his shoulders.
Then he would jolly well have to catch Jack the Ripper all by himself. And
by so doing, he would teach them a lesson from the past, no doubt
forgotten. He would show them—specifically Lieutenant Mitchell—that
they should never take the word of a gentleman lightly.
Stephenson got off a cable car at Hyde and Beach streets after a most
unpleasant ride. Despite the laughter and gaiety of the tourists, he hated the
awkward little conveyance. The car was antiquated! A buggering relic of
the past. Slow and uncomfortable and inefficient. The experience reminded
him of the many nights he had ridden the District Line and breathed the
horrible fumes while crouched on a hard wooden bench, wondering if he
would be accosted by the police. Yes, the cable car was nineteenth century,
and it made him angry.
He paused to spit on the rear window of the car, then hurried away. He
strolled along Beach Street, but did not appreciate the remarkable view of
the Pacific, the graceful sea gulls or the brisk salt air. He wished for the fog
and the night, disliking intensely the bright winter sun. The incident at the
bank had left him deeply concerned. True, the fact that he did not exist in
1979 had put him in an ideal position. He could murder at will and not have
to worry about leaving evidence behind. But the reactions of the young
woman at the bank had been too obvious to ignore. H. G. Wells knew that
he was alive, and that was a problem. Granted, Wells had always been inept
when it came to physical confrontations, but the little man was clever and
brilliant. He was a foe not to be taken lightly.
Stephenson found himself in Ghirardelli Square surrounded by small,
exclusive shops that had once been part of a chocolate factory. So Wells
knew he was alive, did he? Certainly, he would have to rectify that. True, he
was reticent to kill a male human being since murder was by definition a
sexual act. Maybe there was another way to deal with Wells. He didn’t have
to avoid the little scientist. He didn’t have to worry about being tracked
down by the man. Quite the contrary. He didn’t even have to kill Wells. All
he had to do was find him.
He remembered the large, heavy book in his Jack Tar Hotel suite that
had been beside the telephone, then found a telephone booth. He went
inside and opened the directory that was chained to the shelf. What was the
girl’s name? The one who knew Wells? Robbins. Yes, that was it. He found
the “R’s,” scanned the pages, then grinned with satisfaction. There it was.
He memorized her address. He left the booth, strolled back into the square.
He had absolutely nothing to worry about, for now he could resolve the
problem of Wells. Perhaps tonight. When the city was dark and thick with
fog. Late tonight after she had gone to bed. If he felt so inclined.
He swaggered into a clothing store named (tastefully so, he thought)
“The Body Shop.” He saw the establishment was empty, a fact that
surprised him. There was an abundance of contemporary haberdasheries;
and the decor was mainly chrome and glass. Unseen speakers played
modern music that made him want to dance without inhibitions. Indeed, this
was no refuge for tails, top hats and waltzes; this shop felt like the future,
and he was thrilled to be within its mirrored walls.
He selected seven colorful silk shirts with wide collars, balloon sleeves
and fabric-covered buttons. He grinned. Perfect plumage for the here and
now.
Then he saw her come into the room with a long curvaceous stride,
tossing her head so that her hair flew like a thoroughbred’s mane. She wore
tight, bleached-muslin pants and a matching jacket-blouse left unbuttoned
six inches below respectability. She had a pleasant face that was not
beautiful; her mouth was a touch too wide, her brown eyes a little too
trusting. Perhaps that was why he sensed that she lacked confidence. Then
again, he could be wrong, for she stopped directly in front of him, placed
her hands on her hips and did not shy away from his gaze.
“Hi, I’m Marsha. Can I help you with something today?” Her voice
sounded husky, but had a cheerful quality.
“I’d like these, to begin with.” He handed her the shirts.
“Hey, I like your accent!”
He grinned.
“Are you sure the size is right or would you like to try them on?”
“Oh, no, it’s not necessary. The sizes are correct.”
“All right.” She went over to the cash register and left the shirts on the
counter, then pirouetted and smiled. “Anything else?”
“Trousers. I’d like to have a look at some of them, if you don’t mind.”
“It’s a pleasure.” She led the way into an ell of the room where pants
were stacked on shelves. He was acutely conscious of her behind and the
fact that there were no lines beneath her pants. She wore no undergarments.
His face became hot.
“These are all cut differently, so I better check your size and then you
can try some on, okay?”
“If it’s not too much of a bother.”
“Hey,” she said with a laugh. “It’s my job.” She looped a tape measure
around his waist.
She was so close he could smell her. The odor was clean, yet a trifle
musty, as if she accepted that it was perfectly natural for women to perspire.
The palms of his hands became moist; he felt himself stiffen slightly against
the fabric of his trousers.
“Thirty-one.” She kneeled and held her tape along the inside of his leg.
She seemed to pause, and the moment froze in his brain. He couldn’t tell if
she was looking at him or trying to read the tape measure, but he could see
all the way down her loose top past her breasts. He could not control the
twitching in his groin.
“Thirty-five.” She rose, flashed him a bright smile, but gave no
indication what she was thinking. “Any particular kind?”
He began looking through the stacks of pants. “Are you alone here?” he
asked, his voice thick and guttural.
“The other girls are on a lunch break. Why?”
“I just wondered.”
“Oh, I don’t run the place, if that’s what you mean. I just work here, and
it’s not a bad job. I get half off on anything I want.”
She talks too much, he thought, as he selected a pair of jeans that had a
small Union Jack sewn on one back pocket. He held them up and admired
them.
“Want to try them on?”
He nodded.
She indicated a changing booth, and he went inside, stripped off his
trousers and sighed with relief. His erection had vanished. Now he would
be able to speak to the girl without stuttering. Now she would not know that
she had touched the core of his lust and hate.
He slipped into the jeans. They were the tightest trousers he had ever
worn, but they were not uncomfortable. He came out of the dressing room,
went to the mirror, turned in front of it and loved the blatant fit and feel of
the jeans. He was about to question the girl when he saw that she was
looking at his crotch. He followed her eyes. The thin material actually
outlined his private parts! He glanced up; she was still looking. He couldn’t
believe it. He knew that he had always been attractive to a certain kind of
woman, but this genuinely surprised him because no self-respecting,
nineteenth-century English shopgirl would ever look at a man that way, no
matter what was in their hearts.
Still, she stared! Why, she was behaving like the most obvious prostitute
on Commercial Street. Come to think of it, he had noticed while on The
Broadway that courtesans in 1979 looked like any other kind of woman.
There seemed to be no special code of dress or behavior so that a gentleman
might know if he were approaching a professional. Perhaps all women
responded like slatterns nowadays, even if some didn’t receive money for
services rendered. If that were the case, then he could solicit sexual favors
from any female and not have to fear a response of outrage. Great Scott, he
thought, how bloody marvelous. How simply smashing! Never again would
he have to fear rejection, or a lass—like his sister—who was overly eager
and willing. He could treat them all like prostitutes. He could control them
until that sublime moment when their barriers gave way and they acted like
frenzied animals. Then he could take both their degraded lives and their
noble virginities, for it wasn’t right that a lady should enjoy the filth of a
man or a father inside her.
He returned to the changing booth and quickly donned his other
trousers. Then he came out and selected seven pairs of the jeans, all in
different colors. She was at the counter, boxing his shirts. When she heard
him, she glanced up and smiled.
“Find what you like?”
He nodded and set the jeans down on the display case, his hands
trembling with fear and excitement, for he could not find the courage to ask.
He had never asked in his entire life. Furthermore, didn’t he already have
plans for the night? Wasn’t he going to visit the Robbins girl, hence clear up
the affair with Wells? Yes, but that could wait.
She rang up his purchases and handed him two plastic bags thick with
boxes. “It’s been a pleasure serving you, sir.”
The bill was close to three hundred dollars. He handed her a roll of bills,
and when she gave him his change, their fingertips touched. He felt a surge
of emotion that gave him all the courage he needed.
“Marsha?” His knees felt weak; his voice sounded strange. “I mean, that
was your name, wasn’t it?”
“Unhuh.”
“I was wondering,” he stammered thickly. “Did you have a previous
engagement for this evening, or could I have the honor of calling on you?”
It wasn’t that late, but the night was already black and cold. H.G. stood
there drinking expensive gin—something he did not ordinarily do—and
stared out the dining-room window. It was a time for contemplation.
Playing cause and effect as well as Thomas Aquinas ever did, he silently
cursed his early interest in mathematics, for that really was where it all had
begun—ending with the construction of the time machine and his
rendezvous with Amy Robbins in 1979.
Then she came into the living room, fresh from a shower, looking
gorgeous in faded jeans and blue work shirt tied loosely at the waist. She
dropped down onto the couch and gestured for him to join her. He wished
that both the past and the future would disintegrate, leaving him with this
woman in this room for eternity. That hope realized would remove him
from the responsibility, the mandate that lay heavy on his mind. But it was
not to be so.
“Before I sit down, may I offer you a drink?”
“Sure.”
“Neat or American?”
“American?”
“With ice.”
She giggled, pressed her thighs together and curled her toes,
anticipating and enjoying it. “Ice and Seven-Up. Please.”
“Seven-Up?” His eyes widened and his free hand went to his mustache,
a sure sign that he had been caught short. 7-Up? What the devil was that?
he wondered. Some synthetic substance, or perhaps vegetable, that
guaranteed that a person would rise at seven o’clock sharp regardless of
what had happened the night before? The name made no sense.
“It’s in the fridge. There’s a six-pack on the bottom shelf.”
He quickly translated “fridge,” for the word was derivative of both
“frigid” and “refrigerator,” and he knew that she was referring to the
electrically powered cooler in the kitchen. (As he did the other devices that
a 1979er so nonchalantly plugged into the wall, he regarded the
refrigeration appliance as a technological stroke of genius.) But the other
noun that she had uttered left him feeling stupid. For an instant, his mind
went blank. Then he grinned.
“I know this is terrible,” he said enthusiastically, “but I’m all sixes and
sevens.”
“Herbert, that’s not terrible, it’s awful!” She laughed.
“Well?”
“Well, what?”
“My dear lady, just what the devil is a six-pack?”
“Come on, you’re putting me on! They have six-packs in London!”
“Under a different appellation, I’m sure.”
“The Seven-up is in the six-pack of green cans on the bottom shelf—
you do know what a shelf is, don’t you?”
He bowed slightly and started for the kitchen, his eyes twinkling. “Of
course. It’s a geological phenomenon created by the erosion of winds or
tides, generally found—but not exclusive to—the polar regions of the
earth.”
She stared after him, laughing and shaking her head, not quite sure
whether he had a terminal case of naïveté or an overdose of charm. It didn’t
matter. Either condition would win both her heart and her hand.
He found the 7-Up and opened a can with relative ease. The
effervescence reminded him of quinine water. He grew curious, sniffed the
liquid, then tasted it.
“Hmmm.” It was like sweet lemonade, only—to use a modern image—
somewhat electrically charged. He took a large swallow and made the
mistake of sloshing the stuff through his teeth. The resultant fizz bubbled up
into his sinuses and down into his lungs. He gasped for breath, then was left
coughing violently over the sink.
“Are you all right?” she called.
“It’s nothing,” he managed to reply. He wiped his eyes dry, then made
her a drink. He put the 7-Up back into the refrigerator as if it were a can of
nitroglycerin.
“Bloody Yanks’ll drink anything,” he muttered.
He returned to the living room with the drinks.
“How’d it go?” she asked softly.
“Not well. The police refused to cooperate.”
“But why?”
“They didn’t believe me.”
“Didn’t you show them your credentials?”
“You know as well as I that I am traveling incognito.”
She sipped her drink and thought for a moment. “Why the secrecy,
Herbert? I mean, really. It worries me.”
He had a chance to tell her then, but when he looked into her open,
concerned eyes, he could not bring himself to do so. “Believe me,” he said
glibly, “you have nothing to worry about.”
“For sure?”
“For sure,” he replied, thinking that the American vernacular sounded
strange on his English tongue. “It is I who am beset with problems.”
She nodded, uncertain about what he would say next. She was afraid,
too, sensing love and not wanting it aborted at such an embryonic stage.
She nervously ran her fingers through the curl of hair alongside her face.
“What problems?”
“You know. I have to stop Stephenson.”
“You’ll do it. You followed him this far.”
“Only with great difficulty and some blind luck,” he understated. “The
man is a very wily fellow.”
“I’ll help you in any way I can, if you’ll tell me what to do,” she said
brightly.
“You will?”
She slowly nodded. “I’d love to.”
“It may be dangerous.”
She smiled quickly and looked up at the ceiling. “I took a modern
history course in college. And Robert Kennedy once said, ‘Those who
never dare to fail greatly never succeed greatly.’ And that pertains to more
than just your Dr. Stephenson.”
“Ah, yes, Robert Kennedy. Irish chap.”
She laughed and punched him lightly on the arm. “Will you stop it with
your pretensions of ignorance?”
And then suddenly they were embracing and kissing tenderly. He held
her tighter than usual for a long time. He felt her muscles relax and then her
warmth.
“Amy. My dear. You’re wonderful.”
She pushed her head up alongside his, kissed his ear lobe, then
whispered, “All I ask in return is that you be honest with me.”
He fell back against the couch and felt the breath go out of him, but held
on to her still. Never before had he experienced such tender emotion. At the
very least, they had become temporary partners and lovers, but who knew
where it might lead? Perhaps they would hopscotch along the fourth
dimension pausing to meet with her ancestors, then his. Maybe they would
twirl in time and meet—their children? He blushed with delight at the
thought and felt his mustache move against her cheek. Who knows? Maybe
he would manipulate time so that they could exchange nuptial vows at a
way station somewhere in the universe, and in attendance would be their
parents, grandparents, great-grandparents, children and grandchildren. Why
—Moses could officiate the ceremony, reading from stone tablets! Aristotle
could be there, too, along with… Who was that man she had mentioned
responsible for the admirable quote? A Robert Kennedy? He grinned and
drifted back to the reality of her arms.
He considered their alliance. He understood that she was perhaps more
capable than he. He was going to have to depend on her and hoped that he
could return the favor with love and companionship. The partnership, then,
was an equal venture, a union of two individuals on the same footing.
Neither had experienced such reciprocity before.
He frowned and tensed slightly. She felt the change, rose and looked at
him. He averted his head and sat up straight, a troubled expression on his
face.
“Are you all right?”
“I’m not sure.”
“What’s wrong?”
“Nothing’s wrong,” he replied, staring across the room at a fern in a
terra-cotta pot. The bloody hell nothing was wrong!
Since she trusted him already, didn’t she deserve the honesty that she
had asked for? Then he shuddered. He might never again have her arms
around him and feel her lithe frame next to his. He might as well call her
Juliet and admit that he had stabbed Tybalt without cause. Yes, what he was
about to say could shatter them forever, and no trip on a time machine could
repair that kind of damage. But she had to know.
“There’s something I haven’t told you,” he said, quietly anguished.
She took his face in her hands and looked square into his eyes. “If
you’re going to tell me that you lied to me before just so you could—”
“I haven’t lied to you!”
“Let me finish.” She paused. “If you’re going to say that you’re
married, I won’t believe you.” She looked down. Her face was pale and her
voice became distant. “And if you really are, then please don’t tell me. Just
leave and don’t come back.”
“For the last time, Amy, I am not married!” he exploded, then sprang to
his feet and paced. “What do you think I am? A bloody philanderer?”
Puzzled, she stared at him as he walked in irregular patterns. “Well, if
you’re not married, what else could possibly be wrong?”
“I… I don’t know how…” His voice cracked.
“Dammit, Herbert, will you please tell me?”
“I… I was born in Essex, London, on September twenty-first—”
“Oh my God.” Exasperated, she exhaled in a long hiss. Then she glared
at him. “So you’re a Virgo. Terrific. I’m a Scorpio. Want to throw the I
Ching?”
“Amy!” he cried with agony. “I was born one hundred and thirteen
years ago!”
OceanofPDF.com
9
He must be joking, she thought, staring at him, amazed. What incredible
gibberish! Is he mad?
There was, however, a limit to her threshold of pain. She could take no
more of this little man rattling on about the fourth dimension. She slowly
rose to her feet.
“Herbert?”
“Now that you understand, my dear,” he said, unthinking, “I can tell you
that I hate to be called Herbert. I am H. G. Wells, and I prefer to be
addressed by my initials.”
“H. G. Wells?” She hadn’t been prepared for that. “And Shakespeare’s
just around the corner, right?” she said sarcastically.
“I beg your pardon?”
“I think you’d better go now,” she said, a slight quaver in her voice. She
saw his eyes open wide. Then dim as if someone had turned off a light
behind them.
“You don’t believe me,” he said dully. “For a moment there, I thought
—” Suddenly, he approached her, his arms open wide. “Amy, you must—”
“Please don’t come near me!”
He sighed bitterly. “I knew this would happen. I knew that telling you
the truth would ruin everything, but you had to know. And I could no longer
carry on the grotesque charade of being a modern, incredibly naïve
Britisher, especially if we were—”
“If we were what?”
“Please forget it. Nothing matters anymore.” He started for the door,
head down, disconsolate.
“Forget what?”
He turned. “It’s a damnable pity!”
“What’s a pity? What are you talking about?”
“I don’t know about anyone else in this room, but I happen to be falling
in love with you!”
Surprised, she stared at him, astonished and bewildered.
And then suddenly he sank onto the couch in a paroxysm of sobs. He
angrily wiped away tears. “There is no God! No Supreme Being would ever
create a human being and then allow this to happen to him!”
“Herbert, are you all right?” She wasn’t at all sure about herself. “Will
you please tell me what is going on?”
“I just did! My name is H. G. Wells, and I was born in 1866, and I came
here—not on a bloody airship—but on a time machine that right now I wish
I’d never invented!
“And I probably never would have landed here in the first place if Dr.
Leslie John Stephenson hadn’t stolen away in my machine! And he is no
ordinary killer, my dear lady! Oh, no! I don’t know how much of a history
buff you are, what with your Robert Kennedys and the like, but villain I am
pursuing a man they call Jack the Ripper!”
The man’s definitely a nut, she told herself, and God knows what his
reference to Jack the Ripper means. She began looking around for
something to protect herself with. Her heartbeat pounded.
He rose from the couch. “It is of no use.” His voice was low and sad. “I
might as well try to tell this couch here that it is—like me—a perpetually
moving swirl of electrons.” Defeated, he slowly moved toward the door.
He might be a mental case, she thought, but it was clear that he was not
going to harm her. As a matter of fact, the more she watched him, the more
normal he seemed. Hold it, she thought, and sat up straight. She had to play
this out, for no man was going to get off that easily after spinning such an
incredible tale.
He had his hand on the doorknob when she spoke.
“Wait.”
He sagged and pressed his forehead against the cool, enameled surface.
“Sit down.”
He returned to the couch and gingerly perched on its edge, appearing to
her vaguely reminiscent of a dog with a broken spirit. She leaned forward.
She thought, is any of this possible?
Was he actually from another galaxy? Or an alien who had
transmogrified himself into a small and infinitely lovable English
gentleman? She shivered. If this were indeed an encounter of the third kind,
then that meant that she had slept with a creature! God help her if his
original form were that of an insect and she was pregnant! No, no, she told
herself, that’s just too surreal.
Finally, she began thinking clearly and smiled grimly. First, this man
was naive and helpless. Second, she had made both spoken and unspoken
commitments. Third, she had obviously frightened him. Fourth, this was his
demented way of extracting himself from a delicate situation. (Perhaps all
he had expected was a one-night stand and had suddenly discovered that he
cared for her.) Therefore, what he was really trying to say was that he was
already spoken for. That was it, wasn’t it? Pure and simple, no matter what
he’d said before, he had a wife back home in a cottage near the seashore.
He wasn’t chasing a killer, he was probably collecting books for the
University of Oxford’s library. That had to be the answer.
“Why didn’t you just say so in the first place?”
“I beg your pardon?”
“Why didn’t you admit that you were married? What did you think I
was going to do? Shoot you? I mean, face it. I’ve slept with married men
before.”
He blushed.
Aha, she thought. I was right!
“The irony of it.”
“What irony?”
“My dear girl, the irony is that someday I might be able to prove to you
that I am the writer and inventor H. G. Wells, from 1893 London, but it
seems that I’ll never convince you that I happen to be foot-loose and fancyfree.”
“Oh, come on, Herbert!”
“H.G.,” he corrected her.
“All right, H.G., whatever! Since you’re obviously not man enough to
admit it, you might at least tell me why you concocted that bullshit story
about spinning along the fourth dimension in a time machine! I mean, there
must be a reason!”
“I would agree.”
“Well, then?”
“It is the truth,” he replied flatly.
“Ohhh, damn you!” She pushed back in the chair and stared at the
ceiling. “That’s it, then. I’m sorry. Would you please leave?”
“What if I could prove to you that I am H. G. Wells? And that I recently
arrived in San Francisco in a time machine?”
“That’s impossible.”
“Nothing is impossible, given the wizardry of science and technology.”
“Look, just forget it, okay? Just forget it and lock the door on your way
out.” She turned away and closed her eyes tightly, but could not ignore the
twinge of interest inside her.
“Listen, wasn’t I right about Stephenson being alive? That was the truth,
wasn’t it?”
“Yes.”
“What if I could prove to you that I am who I am?”
“Okay, okay! Just let me think a minute, will you?” She bit her nails—a
habit that she had given up at age eight—and thought hard. She sighed. He
might not be lying to her, but what he was saying was impossible. Yet, she
had to see this thing through, she had to go with him every step of the
journey.
She got out of her chair. She was slightly dizzy and had to hold her
head. Then she smiled. Her giddiness was not the result of emotional
turmoil; rather, it was the product of a strange excitement that had seized
her. What if he could prove his identity? If so, her predilection for him
might turn out to be cosmic.
“All right, H.G. Prove it.”
“Do you have any tools?” he asked in an urgent voice.
“Tools?” She could not hide her amazement.
“You know, pliers, screwdrivers, wrenches, wire cutters, drills and the
like.”
“Yes, I have a few, but why?”
“And some oil. I’ll need a can of oil, too.”
At the corner of Fourteenth and Noe streets in a dour and uninteresting
section of the city, Stephenson got out of a taxi, paid the driver, then walked
briskly to the address she had given him. He suddenly shivered. His purple
silk shirt beckoned the cold; he felt as if it were fashioned from ice.
Tomorrow, he must purchase a coat. Not anything as dreary as a wool
Chesterfield, but rather one of those imitation-leather creations that the
colored men seemed so enamored of.
He went up concrete steps into the foyer of a Victorian apartment
building. The worn carpet was clean, yet smelled musty, and someone in the
ground-floor flat had fried bacon several hours ago. His nose wrinkled with
distaste, just as his eyes narrowed upon seeing the faded decor. He hated to
be reminded of the nineteenth century.
He scanned the mailboxes for her name. Sure enough, there it was:
“Marsha McGee: 37½ Noe Street.” He turned and bounded up the stairs
two at a time. If he hesitated now—on this, his first legitimate liaison with a
woman—then he would bolt from the building and run screaming to The
Broadway. He could not think about it. He had to trust his own animal
magnetism. He did not want to pay for the postmortems he performed
anymore.
Suddenly, he was there, staring at the numbers on the door. Below them
was a peephole window and a metal knocker with the brass plating peeling
off. He took a deep breath and rapped quickly on the wood.
“Just a second!”
He heard quick footsteps, and then the door was flung open (without a
prudent look through the peephole window). He felt a pleasant rush of
warm air.
“Hi. C’mon in.” She was wearing jeans and a tight undershirt that
emphasized her breasts and naked shoulders. Just brushed, her abundant
hair shone, and he was reminded of a forbidden French postcard he had
once found in his father’s study called “Lady Godiva.”
He entered her apartment hesitantly. Was he overdressed for the
occasion? If so, she did not seem to notice. She took his hand, led him
across the bare wooden floor and pushed him down onto a splayed couch. It
was the only piece of furniture in the room.
“Like a wine cooler?”
He nodded.
“Great, I’ve got a couple made up already.” She went into the kitchen
and returned moments later with two glasses. She handed him one, set hers
on the floor by the couch. Then she went through what was once a double
doorway into a darkened portion of the room that now served as her
boudoir.
He saw her rummaging through a dresser (perhaps for a blouse to don?),
then averted his head and tasted the concoction in the glass. It was a
mixture of soda water, a peel of lemon and red wine. He was unimpressed,
but the chilled liquid did soothe his dry throat.
She came back into the room proper, hips swaying as she moved, and
went to the phonograph, which had been placed in the dormer bay window.
“You like Fleetwood Mac?”
“Quite,” he uttered, vague but curious.
“Everyone I know goes for Linda Ronstadt in a big way, but she’s just
too sad for me. All those ruined love affairs and lonely nights. What a life.”
Then she laughed. “I could sure go for the money that chick’s got, though.”
She pressed a button on the record machine and turned up the volume.
The room was flooded with sound, and Stephenson instinctively jumped,
making a quick move to protect his ear drums. He was sure that the music
could be heard blocks away, yet she was swaying to the beat in the center of
the room as if the sound were the most natural thing in the world. He
relaxed, and enjoyed the primitive rhythm and the high, sweet harmonies.
The music did not have the grandeur of his favorite, Ring of the Nibelungen
(which he had had the great fortune to see performed by the London
Symphony Orchestra and conducted by the brilliant Wagner himself when
he, Stephenson, was a first-year student at the Normal School of Science),
but it was satisfactory. He smiled. It would do.
She sat down beside him, opened her left hand and revealed a handrolled cigarette. She lit it and inhaled deeply. The odor was unfamiliar to
him; it wasn’t tobacco, nor was it opium, which he had tasted in the squalid
dens of the East End.
“It’s some homegrown that I got from an old boy friend when I went
back to Modesto to see my folks last month.” She spoke directly into his ear
in order to be heard over the music. Her close, hot breath made him shiver.
She took another drag on the curious cigarette, then held it out for him.
He balked at first, then quickly figured that her gesture must be some
modern refinement of the old American Indian custom of passing the peace
pipe. It was, thus, a ritual of friendship and trust, and he laughed inside. He
took the homegrown, imitated her then collapsed with a series of coughs.
She giggled. “Oh, that homegrown! You gotta get used to it.”
He wiped away the tears in his eyes and nodded dumbly. A silent
moment passed between them; there was only the music. He took a more
conservative pull off the weed and passed it back.
“So what brings you to San Francisco?” she asked between drags, her
eyes slitted now, her voice thick.
“The weather,” he replied, suddenly light and giddy inside.
“The weather? Jesus, if I could afford it, I’d move to Honolulu in the
morning.”
He fell back onto the couch, closed his eyes and placed his hand on his
forehead. The music seemed louder. His flesh tingled.
She lay back next to him. “Good stuff, huh?”
“I feel remarkable.”
She smoked the last of the homegrown, stubbed it out on the upturned
lid of a jar and then—much to his astonishment—swallowed the remains.
“I’ve always been a conservationist,” she said wryly.
He nodded, but was unable to speak. He had no idea what she was
talking about.
“What’s it all about, anyway?” she said—not to him in particular—and
stared at the bare walls.
“Life, I suppose,” he croaked.
“Yeah, that’s part of it, I guess, but you never really know, do you? I
mean, sometimes I wonder, if you know what I mean.”
He didn’t, but he thought that he must understand, so he nodded again,
slowly and with import.
“Hawaii is so far away and yet you can get there in just a couple of
hours.”
“I’ve never been.”
“Neither have I.”
“What’s it like?”
“Oh, you know. What’s this space like? I mean, we’re into it, but what’s
it all about? It’s the same there, for sure. Only warmer. But then again,
maybe not. They have freak storms, too, you know.”
“It must be nice.”
“Let’s go.”
“We can’t.”
“Why not?”
“You have to open up the shop in the morning.”
“Ah.” She paused to take a long swig of her wine cooler and to reflect
on the significance of his last statement. It seemed to linger in the air,
blending nicely with the flights of Fleetwood Mac. “Limitations.”
“Need not exist.” His voice was thick and droll.
“To hell with them. All I want is to have a good time.”
“That makes sense.”
“I may never go back to work again.”
“How delightful.”
“And that may be what it’s all about, anyway.” She ran her hand lightly
across his cheek. “You want some more wine before we leave?”
“Leave? Where are we going?” He frowned imperceptibly.
“I don’t know. Somewhere.”
“I’m surely not averse to staying here, if it’s all the same to you,
Marsha.”
“Hey!” She bounced up, suddenly full of energy. “I know!”
“What? Hawaii again?”
“No, no, we’ll do that tomorrow.”
“What, then?”
“Have you ever seen a porno flick?”
Amy parked in the empty lot by the Japanese Tea Gardens. H.G. took her
hand and led her in a wide circle around the back of the museum concourse.
They made their way to the side door of the museum, from which he had
first emerged into the future some three days ago.
Since the door was locked, he took a chisel out of the small bag of tools
and began prying the metal face of the handle away from the door. When he
had enough room to work, he inspected the bowels of the lock with a
penlight. It was a sophisticated, cylinder dead bolt that operated on the
same principle as the first pin tumbler lock did, invented by the American
Linus Yale, Jr., in 1861.
He had her hold the penlight and began to dismantle the device. He
became totally absorbed with his task and started to tinker. He took apart
little nuances of machinery that he didn’t have to, admiring modern man’s
advancement in the field of security. He came to a series of tumblers that
interfaced, which meant that he would have to remove the entire bolt. With
her nail file, he sawed through the machine screws that held the bolt plate
into the door. Obviously, the bolt was flanged and could not otherwise be
extracted. He began whistling a Brahms melody through his teeth.
“Shhhh!”
“Oh. Sorry.”
“Will you hurry up?” she whispered frantically.
“This is not a mere wooden bar behind a castle door, mind you,” he
replied with a touch of sarcasm.
“Why don’t you just break it?” She handed him a small hammer.
He spurned the crude bludgeon. “What do you think I am? A bloody
Philistine?”
Before she could respond, he removed the cylinder, the door handles,
then the bolt itself, which he held up in the light and inspected, as if he had
just extracted an impacted tooth from someone’s mouth.
Then they gathered up the tools and quickly slipped inside the
museum’s basement. After their eyes had adjusted to the blackness, he led
her up to the first floor. Night lights were on.
Suddenly, they heard the ring of footfalls coming in their direction.
Amy looked around wildly for some place to go and started pulling him. He
gasped when he looked up, for she was about to yank him inside the ladies’
room.
He struggled with her, ignoring her frantic whispers. She finally gave up
and pushed him away. The sudden change in momentum caused him to fall
over backward, arms flailing at the air. He landed on his back and looked up
in time to see the ladies’ room door close behind her. He scrambled up and
saw, across from Amy’s cache, the sanctuary of the men’s room. He ran for
it and slipped inside just as a guard rounded the turn into the great hall.
H.G. hid inside a stall. When he heard the guard also come inside the
bathroom, he climbed on top of the toilet seat and crouched. Cold, nervous
sweat ran down his flanks. Then he heard a sigh and urine hitting porcelain.
There was a great roar as the urinal was flushed, footsteps, a door opening
and hissing shut, the faint echo of receding footfalls. H.G. crept to the door,
stuck his head out and looked. He was momentarily startled, for he saw
Amy directly opposite him, peering out of the ladies’ room in a similar
fashion.
They were reunited in the center of the hall, and despite her protests, he
took her farther inside the museum.
They came to a rotunda. There was an information desk in the middle of
the space, and the guard sat behind it, reading the newspaper and drinking
coffee. They hid behind a pillar for what seemed like an eternity. Finally,
the guard put the paper down, yawned, got up, nonchalantly crossed the
rotunda and disappeared into a dark corridor.
H.G. nodded to Amy, and they continued on. Eventually, they got to the
display room. He ushered her inside, and turned on the lights. Then they
stepped over the rope barrier which separated guided tours from the
milestones in the career of H.G. Wells. Beaming, he went to The Utopia. He
patted its dull surface as if greeting an old friend and felt a surge of
emotion. He yearned to be home again, enjoying a good read and a glass of
claret in his study by the fire. He sighed. Another time, perhaps.
He looked inside the engine compartment. The crystalline bars glistened
like new and the stainless-steel gears still turned with ease. The insulation
on the RRL circuitry was brittle, but still intact, and the ivory and diamond
buffers had aged only in color. Metal rot had affected only thin sheets of
casing. The critical parts were in splendid operating condition. He was
pleased. He lubricated the connections, closed the hatch, straightened up
and wiped his hands on a rag. Suddenly, he realized that Amy wasn’t there.
He hurried around the time machine and saw her perusing an old book atop
a display case.
“What are you doing?”
She didn’t look up. “How come you didn’t like George Bernard Shaw?”
she asked lightly.
Her question puzzled him. “You don’t mean the drama critic for The
Times, do you?”
She laughed. “Among other things.”
“I’ve never even met the man!”
“Well, apparently you found him stuffy.” She read from the book. “‘A
dried-up, old vegetarian virgin who wrote for insomniacs.’” She looked at
H.G. knowingly. “If, of course, you are who you say you are.”
He jerked the book out of her hands and slammed it shut. He trembled.
“Would you mind terribly much not doing that?”
“What’s wrong?”
“I’d rather write the books before someone quotes me.”
“I was only kidding.”
“Well, I’m not. There won’t be any point to my life if I know what I’m
going to write and invent in the future.” He dropped the book back onto the
display case. “Blasted thing is nothing but an oversized epitaph.”
He noticed that she was looking from him to some old photographs in
another display case, comparing his visage to the black and white prints.
“Yes. The resemblance is uncanny, isn’t it?”
She nodded, somewhat bewildered.
He went to the cabin door, kneeled down and pulled on a small ring
handle. A prism-shaped device—covered with a fine, multicolored dust—
came out of the time machine. He wiped it off and inspected it.
“What’s that?”
“My version of a declinometer. It holds the magnetic variation steady
during flight. In the process, it collects extratemporal residue and
occasionally should be cleaned.”
“What’s it for?”
“It keeps the machine from rotating into infinity.”
“What’s wrong with infinity?”
“It has no beginning and no end. So once you get there, you stay there.”
“Why can’t you get back?”
“Because there is nothing to get back from,” he replied hollowly. “You
become permanently frozen in a time warp.”
“Oh,” she said thoughtfully after a pause. She regarded him critically.
“You certainly know a lot about this, don’t you?”
He blushed and looked down modestly.
“I know!” she exclaimed, then snapped her fingers. “You heard about
this exhibit, boned up on time machines, then brought me along because
you were afraid to sneak in here and try it yourself! Right?”
He frowned. “Wrong.”
“And you’re not really H. G. Wells, you just happen to look like him,
right?”
“Wrong again.” He carefully pushed the prismlike device back into its
housing, then climbed into the cabin.
She followed. “Hey, it’s okay. I’ll try anything once.”
Miffed, he ignored her and frowned with disgust when he saw the dials
on the control panel. The glass coverings were so smoked with age that it
was impossible to read the facings. With a small screwdriver, he removed
the covers and tossed them into the corner. They shattered with small,
brittle tinkles.
“What are you doing?”
“Using my poor but immediate resources to correct a careless flaw in
design.”
He inspected the controls. Fortunately, the switches which activated and
blended the engine’s energy fields had been cast with porcelain, so they had
survived the ravages of time. A drop of oil on each lubricated the brass
springs beneath, making the switches easier to manipulate.
Soon he came to the Rotator Control, frozen in the eastward position.
He cursed his lack of foresight in using a low-grade steel for this crucial
handle, then dumped the rest of the oil over it. He tugged on it, mouthing
Victorian obscenities. Finally, he tried to kick it loose. The Rotator Control
did not budge. He turned to her, smiled weakly and spread his hands.
“At the present time, I am not equipped to repair the Rotator Control.
Hence, we can go only into the future.”
“Oh.” She thought for a moment, then said flippantly, “So who wants to
go back and change history?”
Once again, he ignored her remark. He gestured at the swivel chair.
“When to, Miss Robbins?”
“Saturday,” she said lightly. “Let’s just go to Saturday. After all, I
wouldn’t want to lose touch now, would I? Or the entire weekend.”
“Very well,” he said politely. He turned and squinted at the dials, then
very carefully set them with the aid of the small screwdriver. After
synchronizing the cabin’s clock with his digital watch, he finally
straightened up.
“How long will it take?” She sat casually in the chair.
“To travel three days?” He raised his eyebrows. “Precisely one quarter
of a second.”
She laughed. “That’s impossible.”
“You don’t think it works, do you?” he exploded. “You just think that
I’m a bloody, asinine fool who’s mucking about with a useless relic of a
museum piece, don’t you?”
“I didn’t say those things.”
“You didn’t have to.”
He closed and locked the hatch, squeezed in next to her, strapped them
in, then engaged the switches. Then he cast a sidelong glance at her. He was
redeemed and smiled grimly, for at that moment an expression of utter
terror was on her face. She might as well have said, what if—by some
miracle—this mad Englishman were right? He drummed his fingers on the
mahogany arm of the chair while waiting for the familiar whine of the
electromagnetic energy fields as they spun up to speed and interlocked.
“Well?”
Now it was his turn to be concerned, for no familiar noise was
forthcoming. He turned off all the switches, then tried them one more time.
Nothing happened.
“There seems to be a bit of a problem.”
“What?”
“It doesn’t work.”
“Damn.” She sighed. “For a minute there I thought I was going to be the
first real Alice in Wonderland.”
He broke out into a cold sweat, suddenly struck with a horrible thought.
What if he were stranded out of his own time?
His face ashen, he quickly unstrapped them, sprang out of the cabin and
ran to the engine compartment. He glanced wildly at the displays around
him, but they did not reassure him. The terrible thought crossed his mind
that someone else—perhaps Grinnell or even Preston—could have assumed
his identity and continued his career. He lifted the hatch and inspected the
engine with the penlight. His hands, however, were shaking so badly that
the beam of light fluttered radically. He could not see a damn thing. He took
a breath and collected himself, then began investigating the electrical leads
from the switches to the flywheel and the pulse generator. They were all in
good condition. Then he wondered if his machine could traverse such a
minuscule time differential of three days. It shouldn’t make any difference,
he told himself. Certainly, to have an engine operational for exactly one
fourth of a second was cutting it close, but it was not beyond the
capabilities of his design.
“I just realized something,” she whispered into the compartment. “This
is the most ridiculous thing I’ve ever done in my life!”
“If I were you,” he countered matter-of-factly, “I would have thought
that agreeing to have lunch with me was a much more serious mistake.”
“Listen, don’t you think this—this charade has gone on long enough?”
She hesitated and nervously glanced across the room at the door. “Face it,
this is insane!”
“Call it what you like.”
“Can’t we please get out of here? Any minute now someone is going to
walk through that door!”
“My dear girl, I have no intention of leaving here until I discover what
is wrong with my time machine,” he said. “For you, the choice is a matter
of trust. For me, the decision is cosmic.” He continued working, his face
and hands now black with grease.
“I’m not going alone!”
“Suit yourself.”
“Come on, H.G.! Let’s go!”
He did not respond.
She leaned against the outside of the engine compartment, closed her
eyes and bit her lip.
He worked his hand inside the reversal housing to see if any kind of
debris could have lodged there. All seemed clean and clear and well
lubricated… there were no burrs from friction… no foreign metal chips that
may have stuck to the gear teeth… . Wait a minute! What the devil was
that? Fingers moving like spiders’ legs, he felt a cylindrical object that hung
loosely, yet was attached. That did not belong there!
He extracted his hand, rummaged through his motley assortment of
tools and found a hacksaw blade. He pushed the flexible steel into the
housing cavity and laboriously sawed through the foreign object. There was
a small clink when the thing finally fell into the housing well. He pulled it
out and examined it in the flashlight beam.
It was a small, obscure lock.
He did not comprehend, for he was trying to remember something that
he had done which had not yet occurred. “Now why in the devil would I
have locked the engine?”
“What?”
“This was the reason it wasn’t working.” He held up the lock for her to
see. “The gearing ratio was locked so that it wouldn’t turn.”
“Why did you do that?”
He crawled up out of the compartment, closed the hatch and
straightened up. “I’m not sure that I did. Since it hasn’t happened yet, I’m
not sure who put the lock on.”
“Would you please explain something to me?” she asked. “How could
you arrive here by time machine if the damn thing wasn’t working?”
He grinned. “It was working… when I left.”
She stared at him, unable to respond. She did not resist when he took
her hand, led her into the cabin and strapped them both into the chair. She
seemed dazed by the implications of his last remark. He engaged the
switches. There was that characteristic low hum, and he was gratified and
relieved. Since the “Ready” light was not working, he waited a full twenty
seconds until he was sure that the pitch of the idling energy fields sounded
right. Then he glanced at her, the ultimate question in his eyes.
She gazed back—astonished at the sound—then gulped and nodded.
His lips formed a brief kiss and he winked at her. Then he resolutely
shoved the Accelerator Helm Lever forward until it locked in the flank
position.
Stephenson had to clutch his knees to keep his hands off her as she drove
back to her apartment. He kept glancing at her, wondering if she felt the
same way that he did. The porno flick—as she had termed it—had been
more than either of them had bargained for. It had involved the violation of
a beautiful teen-age girl by a cult of desert-sun worshippers, climaxing with
an orgy in homage to Satan.
He remained incredibly aroused. He wondered if he should touch her.
After all, she had suggested the entertainment in the first place. No, no,
better to let her make the initial move. He feared rejection; he feared
surprised outrage. Observing was a long way from participation. He could
not blindly accost this Marsha McGee, for she was obviously not a
professional harlot. But, oh, how he wanted to.
“Well?” she asked. “Did you like it?”
How could I not like it? he thought. It was a marvelous, priceless work
of art! A glossy black pearl to toss into the ugly eye of morality and
womankind! I loved it!
“I thought it was an extremely interesting and challenging piece of
entertainment,” he replied.
“Yeah, it got a little heavy in the end. I would’ve been satisfied with just
some clean, good, old-fashioned sex. But I gotta admit, it really turned my
head around.”
When they were back inside her apartment, she replaced the Fleetwood
Mac music with something called Alice Cooper. Stephenson did not
understand the name, although he preferred the sound to that of its
predecessor. She made them drinks and reported that they had smoked the
last of the homegrown. She seemed surprised that he did not carry his own
weed; or for that matter, drugs of any kind. Then she shrugged.
“I guess it’s pretty hard to come through customs and security and all
that with anything that gets you high.”
“Quite true.” He nodded.
She laughed. “I’ll bet if they legalized everything no one would do it.”
Then she was up again and in her bedroom going through her dresser. She
returned with a small vial of white powder and a tiny silver spoon, the
handle of which had been sculpted into the form of a man and a woman
engaged in a sexual union.
He grinned, for he recognized the substance in the vial as cocaine, a
stimulant that he had used liberally in medical school. He recalled with
pleasure the incredible athletic feats he had performed under the influence
of the drug. Once, he had come out of a scrimmage against Oxford carrying
the ball and had trampled five of their best players while galloping the
length of the field to score the winning points. He had, however, never
permitted himself to indulge in the drug while on his sorties in the East End.
He had always feared that the cocaine would cause him to spurn caution in
favor of reckless abandon.
“Like a toot?”
“Would you mean a spot?” he asked good-naturedly, trying to hide his
excitement.
“Toot, spot, whatever.” Her voice quavered with anticipation.
“It is cocaine, is it not?”
“High-grade. My boss brings it in on his boat and gives me grams for a
song.”
“Please, then.” He bent his head forward expectantly. She shoveled,
held a spoonful under his nose. He pressed one nostril shut and quickly
sniffed. She did his other nostril, and he fell back against the couch, his
blood racing, his head popping clear. He was unaware that a slight trace of
white powder remained on his upper lip beneath his nose. He heard her sniff
several times and gasp. Then she leaned over him—her breasts pushing into
his shoulder—and slowly licked the cocaine off his lip.
The gesture was so incredibly erotic that he was unable to move or
respond in kind. She settled back on the couch and gazed at him.
“This has been a wonderful evening!” he exclaimed.
“Unhuh.” She nodded.
“A delightful dalliance! A perfectly marvelous way for two
extraordinary human beings to prepare for, ah—a time-honored moment?”
“Really.”
“You know, Marsha, I feel that I have been in your shadow for ages
now, and that quite suddenly you have turned to face me and acknowledge
my presence.”
“Whatever.”
“Do you—do you wish that we honor our—celebrate your
acknowledgment and my humble acceptance?”
“Unhuh.”
“Then why don’t we—” His throat went dry, and he was seized with a
fit of coughing. “Excuse me.”
He bolted up, fled into the sanctuary of her bathroom and looked at
himself in the mirror. His breathing was shallow; his sinuses were draining;
his teeth were grinding. He suddenly realized that the cocaine was not pure
no matter what she had said. There was some other chemical mixed with it
that was twisting his thought processes. And yet, he felt so good! The drug,
however, was not his dilemma. The problem was that he had never asked a
woman for sex before without first making the perfunctory deposit of a gold
coin. Even his romp with his sister had been at her suggestion. This Marsha
McGee was not a prostitute. Oh, she might be a wanton little slut by
Victorian standards, but she obviously did not accept money. So bloody
what? If she gave it away, she was a fool.
He sniffed, then swung out of the bathroom and slammed the door. He
would just come right out and ask: would she like to rut with him?
Fornicate? Copulate along with the ghoulish noise of Alice Cooper?
He came around the corner, his voice heavy and guttural. “Marsha…”
He began. He stopped, then took out his pocketwatch and opened the lid,
for he did not have to utter a sound.
She was lounging on the couch, one leg drawn up and thrown over the
back, the other spread out on the pillows, its foot touching the floor and
moving in small circles; her arms were behind her head, and her hair fell
over them in the shape of a flower. She was smiling up at him impishly,
because in his brief absence, she had removed all of her clothes.
In a quiet, chilling sort of way, he went berserk.
Amy felt unbelievably weak and drained. She lifted her head, opened her
eyes and instinctively glanced at her watch. It read 10:23:45. Only a few
seconds had passed since H.G. pushed the lever forward. He pulled her up
from the chair, and she leaned against the side of the cabin. The metal wall
felt warm, and she thought that strange since she would have expected it to
be cold. She also heard creaks and groans emanating from inside the
plating; that seemed even more bizarre. She tried to remember what had
happened after the lever had clicked and locked, but the passage of time had
been so brief, so infinitesimal. She was vaguely aware of a mad swirl of
bright colors and then a flood of blackness, but that was all.
They left the time machine. Her strength returned, and she glanced
swiftly around the display room. Everything seemed the same. He certainly
appeared no different. What was he doing now, anyway? Inserting and
turning a small key in a thing marked “RRL” over the door handle? Oh,
well.
“Nothing’s changed,” she uttered hollowly.
“We only went to Saturday, remember?” He smiled generously like the
Cheshire cat.
Was she the first real Alice? Had she actually jumped forward in time?
She frowned, not wanting to believe, yet knowing that something had
happened.
“What have you done?” Her voice was crisp and clear.
“Taken you to Saturday.” He appeared perfectly relaxed; he was not
tugging on his mustache.
“I have the distinct feeling,” she said “that you haven’t taken me
anywhere.”
“Oh,” he replied casually. “You’re in the same place. It just happens to
be Saturday night right now as opposed to Wednesday night.”
She wanted to say, bullshit, but sighed instead, determined to let him
play out his hand.
“Come on,” he whispered brusquely.
She followed him out of the exhibit to the door of the display room. She
looked back at the time machine and she saw a faint, bluish glow
dissipating around it, but wasn’t sure.
They came to the edge of the rotunda, and she remembered it well from
what seemed like just a short time ago. The space was empty. She could
hear the wall clock clack away the minutes as they remained poised on the
periphery. Finally, he gestured and moved off to the right. She did not
follow, for she had spotted a newspaper left folded on the information desk
next to a cold cup of coffee. She knew that H.G. could not have staged that;
she had been with him the entire time. Before he could stop her, she boldly
headed for the desk. Section two of the morning Chronicle lay on top, and
her eyes immediately went to the date.
“Saturday, November 10, 1979.”
She gasped and lurched back. Oh my God, she thought, is it so easy to
skip days, then return to one’s own time and become a prophet? There was
no doubting the newspaper. Herbert had not been playing games; he had not
been lying; he was as true as Antony was to Cleopatra, as Romeo was to
Juliet. She looked up—astonished, bewildered—and saw him cautiously
approaching her. He was H.G. Wells, and she was certain that he loved her.
She looked at the newspaper again. No, she was not deceiving herself; the
date was the same. As an afterthought she rummaged through the sections
of newspaper just so she would know what the big deal was Saturday
morning according to the gospel, Chronicle. She found page one on the
bottom of the pile, took one look and gasped again.
She sat down hard in the desk chair, her hand to her mouth, her body
convulsing with fear and nausea. The headline would be eternally etched in
her memory.
“What is it?” asked H.G.
She only had the strength to point. He followed her gesture, stared at the
newspaper and exhaled slowly. His face became ashen, then turned
crimson.
“We shall see,” he hissed. “We shall bloody well see about this!”
“What are we going to do?” she managed to utter.
“What else? Change the future.”
He folded up the newspaper and stuffed it into his pocket. Then he
picked her up and half carried her back to the time machine. Right now, she
was alive and she wanted to prolong that precious gift forever. She did not
know exactly what he was thinking or what he could do, but she definitely
had destiny on her mind. Once in the cabin, he kicked the Rotator Control
until it was free and they were thus able to journey into the past.
No, she would never forget that banner story: the San Francisco
Chronicle. Saturday, November 10, 1979. “CAREER GIRL MURDERED.
Fourth ‘Ripper’ Style Slaying Has Police Baffled.” There was no mistaking
the photograph of the victim and the identifying caption underneath:
“Bank of England employee, Amy Catherine Robbins.”
OceanofPDF.com
10
When they reached the sanctuary of her apartment, he held her for a long
time even though she seemed remarkably stoic. He knew that time-traveling
just in itself had had a profound effect on her mind. That, combined with
the shock of the newspaper, would have sent anyone else into hysterics.
Amy was strong, he thought. And thank God for that.
Finally, he felt her relax in his embrace. “Are you all right?”
She nodded, her head still buried into his chest.
“Want to talk?”
“I don’t suppose you can tell me I just woke up after a horrible
nightmare.”
“No. I’m sorry.”
She sighed. “Well, I’m not going to blame you for all this. I didn’t have
to get involved with you.”
“I suppose we can always leave,” he said, looking off, preoccupied.
“What?”
“I don’t like the idea of retreat and I detest the thought of leaving Leslie
John Stephenson at large in this fine city, but if worst comes to worst we
can go away in The Utopia before the time of your death. Or even on an
airliner, I suppose.”
“What are you saying?”
“Simply this—we avoid your murder,” he said flatly. “And by so doing,
we effectively change the future, quod erat demonstrandum.”
For a moment, she was excited. Then the light in her eyes faded. “What
if we can’t change anything? What if it’s hopeless? I mean, you’ve heard
that old saying, ‘What will be, will be.’”
He raised his eyebrows. “If you don’t mind, I’d prefer not to hear a lot
of rubbish about predestination. I happen to believe that man is capable of
controlling his own destiny.”
“I just don’t want to die!” Her voice quavered slightly. She bit her lip.
“Amy, you are not going to die! Free will exists. And I have already
changed the future by coming here on a time machine and meeting you.”
“I’m sorry.”
He did not remind her that Stephenson had also changed the future by
committing two grotesque crimes.
Then he remembered that the newspaper from the future was in his coat
pocket. He spread it out on the dining room table and studied it, hoping that
the article would provide him with some clues as to Stephenson’s
whereabouts. It did not, but, the story did recount Stephenson’s heinous
activities leading up to Amy’s demise.
“Hm.” He skipped over the section about the oriental prostitute in the
massage parlor, for that much he already knew. He read with horror and
interest about what Stephenson had done to a rather pretty salesgirl named
Marsha McGee. Other than Amy, however, most of the reportage was
devoted to the death of someone named Dolores Clark, the daughter of a
prominent and wealthy black attorney. The girl’s body had been found in
John McLaren Park near a parking area between the lake and John F.
Shelley Drive around 3:05 A.M. Thursday morning, November 8;
approximately one-half hour after she had been murdered, police experts
estimated. H.G. pressed a button on his watch. It was now 11:30 P.M.
Dolores Clark would die in less than three hours.
Suddenly, he looked up. An idea was taking shape inside his head. A
marvelous idea: infinitely clear and simple and foolproof.
He got up and hurried back into the living room.
“What?”
“By George, I think I’ve got it!”
“You do?” Her eyes shone gratefully.
“According to Saturday morning’s Chronicle, Dr. Stephenson has
already murdered someone else. Her name is Dolores Clark and she will die
in a matter of hours.”
“All due respect—and I mean that sincerely—what has that got to do
with me?”
“Everything.”
“Explain.”
“If we prevent that atrocity from occurring then your death will not
occur, non quod erat faciendum.”
“In other words, we head him off at the pass.”
“Precisely.”
“But how is that possible?”
“We know exactly when and where her murder will occur.”
Wide-eyed, she stared at him for a moment, then slowly nodded and
agreed. “That’s—that’s brilliant!” she whispered, then laughed, full of
immense relief. “Everything’s going to be all right, isn’t it?”
“My dear girl,” he replied, “nothing is beyond the capabilities of man.
All one has to do is think positively.”
“You’re absolutely amazing.”
“How long does it take to get to John McLaren Park?”
“Twenty minutes. At the most.”
“Just so we have plenty of time, why don’t we leave at one-thirty?”
She nodded enthusiastically.
“In the meantime, I suggest that we rest. I, myself, want to be fresh for
something as historic as a match with destiny.” He sat down on the couch.
“What if we overslept?” Amy asked. She moved next to him so that her
breasts pushed into his arm.
He chuckled. “You, a child of the present, are worried about
oversleeping?”
“What’s so unusual about that?”
“You have clocks that are run by the mighty, endless electron,” he said
expansively. “They don’t lose time and their alarms are never stilled.”
“Unless we have a power blackout.”
“Oh.” He gave her a brief, sidelong glance and felt stupid. “Yes. Of
course.”
“We don’t have to sleep.”
“How the devil could I sleep now?” he scolded. “My bloody eyes will
be glued to the clock for the next two hours waiting for the damned
electricity to stop!”
“I mean, there are other ways to relax.” She placed her hand on his
thigh then stopped.
“I wonder,” she asked.
“What?”
“When this is all over, we’ll have to sneak into the museum again and
try it.”
“Try what?”
“Making love, silly! Can you imagine what it would be like if it were
timeless?”
He gaped at her with astonishment. “What a simply marvelous
suggestion.”
Just off Broadway and Columbus Street was a nightclub and sometime
discothèque. Its façade was a wall of imitation black marble crammed
between two larger buildings and deliberately located on a narrow side
street to promote the idea of an intimate and exotic hideaway. Other than
the soundproof front door, the only break on the glossy black surface was a
green neon sign, its letters drawn out into an elongated parallelogram.
“THE GREEN LIGHT BALLROOM” winked every thirty seconds,
implying to those who cared that the inside of the club was an ultramodern
lie, yet at the same time urging one to enter, pay five dollars for a mixed
drink and find out for himself.
One who did not care was sitting at a small table inside drinking gin.
Leslie John Stephenson idly watched young couples—not necessarily
heterosexual ones—dancing in front of the curtained stage. The men—some
attired in flashy three-piece suits—twirled their partners as if they were
dolls to be experimented with. Stephenson guessed that he was witnessing a
modern minuet. The pace was no doubt faster than it had been in the
seventeenth century, but he imagined that the cynical and decadent
overtones were the same. Some things never change.
He sipped his drink and leaned back. It was good to relax afterward.
The suggestive movements of the dancers reminded him of Marsha McGee
swaying to the music in her apartment. Before.
He recalled her face and how her expressions had changed. At first,
when he had begun to beat her, she had reacted with a surge of passion;
then, when she realized that the force of his blows had far exceeded the
bounds of lustful exuberance, her eyes had opened wide with uncertainty.
And finally, after he had hit her with his closed fist, her look was one of
pain, terror and utter vulnerability, for she was naked, pinned beneath him,
and he was inside her. She had started screaming, but moments later he had
slashed her throat and ended her life.
After he had performed his bloody ritual, he had cleaned up in Marsha’s
antiquated bathroom. Then he had left the Noe Street flat and taken a taxi to
Russian Hill. He had gone to Amy Robbins’s address and broken into her
place. He had been surprised that she wasn’t there, for he had assumed that
a working girl would have been in bed early, resting up for the next day’s
toil. He had been wrong. He had considered waiting for her return, then had
grown nervous. What if she didn’t come home at all? Given the late hour,
that was entirely possible. In fact, she was probably coupled with someone
right now elsewhere in the city, the morals of these modern women being
what they were.
He had left then, as quietly as he had come, cool-headed with the
knowledge that time was on his side. So Amy Robbins was not home. He
would come back tomorrow night.
Then he had gone to North Beach and discovered the Green Light
Ballroom.
The music ended and the dancers returned to their tables. A master of
ceremonies spoke into a microphone. “Ladies and gentlemen, the Green
Light Ballroom is proud to present for the first time in San Francisco, the
Pet Killers!”
To mild, perfunctory applause, the curtains parted, revealing a band of
lean and tall musicians dressed in black, their faces painted white, their lips
purple. On a dais behind them was a silver cage. Inside it was a blond
woman attired in a flowing chemise gown. Stephenson leaned forward with
interest.
The band began with a complex oratorio that was titled “Blood Fever
Blues.” The room shook with the voluminous decibels from the huge
speakers. Lights flashed and glittered, and Stephenson was enthralled, for
he could imagine that Satan himself would gladly make an appearance on
that stage.
Midway through, the woman was released from the cage by a singer. He
led her around by a leash. Other band members pushed her, screamed
epithets at her. Some even slapped her. At the music’s climax, they ripped
off her gown, tied her up, then doused her with gallons of crimson fluid that
Stephenson hoped was real blood.
As the guitars crescendoed with the final chords, the singer pushed the
woman to the floor, stepped on her, then pulled her across the stage and out
of sight, leaving a dark-red trail behind her that was bathed in green light.
Stephenson leaped up and began applauding vigorously and shouting for an
encore while most of the audience sat in humorous or detached disbelief.
The musicians, themselves, seemed surprised that one guest in particular
would receive their first attempt at musical macabre so enthusiastically
when even they wondered if they’d gone too far.
When the Pet Killers finished, Stephenson thought, why not? He hadn’t
done two women in the same night since September 1888. That had been a
time when he had been anxious to demonstrate not only his virility but also
(thanks to his class in basic surgery) certain other newly acquired skills.
London had panicked then. So why not give the splendid city of San
Francisco the same opportunity?
“Would you like to dance?”
He turned. The girl kneeling on the empty chair behind him had not
been there a moment ago.
“I’m Dolores.” She smiled.
He was surprised and taken aback by her because she had approached
him. Moreover, she was black, and he had never considered a woman of
color before. She had exotic eyes, a pert nose and a lush, full mouth. Her
body was not buxom as Marsha McGee’s had been. Rather, this Dolores
was petite and willowy, almost oriental in flavor. Her hair had been
arranged into dozens of small braids, and the unusual styling made her
appear to him a combination of the urbane and the tribal.
The attire was something to behold, too. She had on silk pajama pants
which were tucked inside alligator-skin boots. Instead of a blouse, she wore
a moss-tinted undershirt which advertised the club that they were
patronizing. Her wrists were sheathed in thin bracelets that jingled when
she moved, and her long neck was adorned with pearls deliberately tied
askew.
Perhaps this black girl would be an interesting partner, he thought. And
why not? They both would have been condemned in the nineteenth century
for being together, but apparently that was no longer the case. He had
observed and rather approved of the casual mixing of the races in 1979. It
seemed areligious, asocial and out-of-step with Mother Nature, hence fitting
to a Luciferian world. Therefore, wasn’t it time that he participated?
Besides, this girl projected sophistication and charm, indicating that she
came from a wealthy background. She was definitely a step up from Marsha
McGee, the middle-class shopgirl. That settled it, then.
“I’m Leslie John.”
He rose and guided her to the ballroom floor. They began to dance. He
was hesitant at first, then closed his eyes so that he could sense the mood.
He tossed his head back and became involved in the hard beat of the music.
He moved closer to Dolores, twirled her back and forth, and imagined that
she was a swaying, hooded cobra like the one he had seen at the Zoological
Gardens in Regent’s Park. The vision became graphic: she alternated
between the deadly reptile of the Kashmir plains and the houri, a beautiful,
voluptuous, colored virgin—indigenous to the Koranic Paradise. Were those
her fangs that were drawn back or her legs? His own dance became more
frenzied, and he imagined that he, too, was a cobra. They were doing a
mating ritual. Soon, they would entwine, exchange mutual strikes of
passion and inject poison into each other.
He opened his eyes. When he focused, he saw that she was clearly and
pleasantly surprised by his quick mastery of the dance. He grinned. A
celebration lay ahead.
The alarm rang.
They were both instantly alert and staring at each other. H.G. jerked his
wrist between them, gazed at his watch and saw that the time was one
o’clock. He sighed with relief, rolled over and punched off her clock alarm
(the noise was music, and it seemed ridiculously inappropriate at that hour).
They both got out of bed. She went into the kitchen to make him tea and
herself coffee. He detoured into the bathroom, where he doused his face,
not realizing or expecting how cold water got in the middle of the night.
“Blast!” he exclaimed. Right then he decided to take a hot shower. He
and Amy were well ahead of schedule.
Standing under the warm water, he was suddenly nagged with selfdoubt and worry. His ploy to stop the horrible Stephenson seemed so
divinely simple, but had he let his optimism get in the way of Aristotelian
logic? True, he had been the first man in history to conquer time, but that
did not necessarily mean that he could overcome either destiny or cause and
effect. Specifically, he could not explain the contents of Saturday morning’s
newspaper except by—what was the colloquialism she used occasionally?
—“copping out” to predestination, and that, he was determined not to do.
“Free Will” was a song that he had hummed ever since grammar school,
like the great British thinkers.
He lathered up with soap, then scowled again, inwardly cursing St. Paul,
Thomas Aquinas and the entire bloody lot of the pessimistic yet brilliant
Roman Catholic theologians. That didn’t help, either, for the specter of the
newspaper returned to his mind. How could he rationalize it? Dolores Clark
had died and Amy had been butchered too. Those were/would be facts!
How could he fight them? Was knowledge of the future worth a damn?
Suddenly his breath whooshed out. Why hadn’t it come to him
previously? The entire basis of his fourth-dimensional methodology was
that time spheres were geometrically stacked against each other like a
massive pile of cord wood. All time was permanent in the universe; events
continually occurred over and over again just as the atoms and electrons
never stopped dancing in their perpetual swirl. (If time and events were not
that way—if they were temporary as opposed to temporal—then travel into
the past or the future would be absurd and of no consequence, for there
would be no time, hence nothing to travel to.) And since time, events,
causes and effects were permanent, that meant that Amy—and himself, too
—were already dead somewhere in the universe. What they had discovered
in the future, then, was an old event perhaps replayed enumerable times.
Thus, the cosmic nature of what he and Amy were going to do was
staggering! When he stopped Stephenson from committing a murder, he
would be tossing a pebble into the mythic Sea of Tranquility. The ripples
would travel across the universe and change everything in their path. When
they reached the shores of Eternity, those same ripples would be a tidal
wave, and they would shatter the predestined walls once and for all. Man
would reign supreme.
He was not, then, just going to change a simplistic “destiny”; rather, he
was going to replace an old time pattern with a new one. One newspaper
had already been printed on Saturday, next. It would yellow and age with
decay and fall from the cosmos, a petrified ash of what once was but would
never again be. A second newspaper would take its place.
H.G. left the shower placid, a cosmic grin wrinkling his face. He
leisurely dried, then began dressing. His thoughts turned inexorably to
Amy, and he wished that he understood emotional patterns as well as he did
scientific ones. Did he love her already? If he truly did, and if she felt the
same way, how would they solve the problem of being from different
centuries? He had seen interracial mixes in 1979 and had accepted them as
a natural and inevitable in the great American experiment called
“democracy.” But an intertime mix? Theoretically, it should work, yet he
was sophisticated enough to know that when it came to human relations,
theory didn’t mean a blasted thing.
He frowned. If only this Stephenson matter were finished. Could take
Amy back home with him, for someday he would have to return to his own
century and pick up the thread of his life. But she would never consent to
such a radical uprooting. No, he was certain that she would not go. After
all, how could she be happy in the nineteenth century when she was happy
here? How would she put up with Victorian ideals and standards? Not to
mention the restrictions that his society placed on women. She would not be
able to work in a position with any authority. Furthermore, not only was she
a woman, she was an American woman. Why, just the accepted code of
dress for ladies alone would send Amy rocketing back to 1979 as fast as his
device would allow. And if, in 1893, she ever expressed her attitudes about
men and the female sexual response, she would be denounced in every
social circle in greater London.
“Bah!” he exclaimed with disgust at his rigid Victorian world.
Unfortunately, if she ever did entertain ideas about going with him to
1893, he should convince her to stay here, in 1979 San Francisco. They
would both be better off. Unhappy, but that would pass with time and the
daily demands of existence. And then he could arrange to time-travel
occasionally; hop into the cabin, close the hatch and twirl forward into her
arms. Ah, yes, that would be delicious; to steal away for the weekend or the
Christmas holidays and to spend such rare moments with a lover eighty-six
years removed in time. And when he redesigned and improved The Utopia,
they could journey into the distant future together and examine the changes
in the inimitable human condition. Who knows? Somewhere along the
mysterious fourth dimension, they might find a real Eden where they might
make their way hand in hand until they found the Elysian fields; both might
forsake their home centuries for a life of eternal bliss.
He became worried again. What if—for some inexplicable, generic
reason—he could not save Amy from Stephenson? What if he was wrong
about the fallibility of Fate? What if—and he blushed at the thought—the
Catholics had been right all along?
Amy was in the dining room, wearing loose, warm clothing, her hands
wrapped around a steaming mug of coffee. H.G. came into the room, saw
that she was dressed, and nodded.
“Ah, good, then. You’re ready.”
“There’s tea in the kitchen.”
He went and poured himself a hot and stimulating cup. The fog would
undoubtedly be thicker across the moors and reaches of McLaren Park, his
own mythic Bosworth’s field where so much was at stake for him and her.
He sat down next to her at the dining-room table, then checked the time.
“I suppose we should be leaving soon.”
She nodded.
He gave his mustache a tug. “All right. To begin with, we are agreed on
things in general? Such as the police?”
“If we call them, either they won’t believe us or they’ll show up and
Stephenson will merely do his horrible thing elsewhere.”
“Precisely. Hence, to rely on the police would give destiny an opening,
wouldn’t it?”
“Yes. And we can’t alert Dolores Clark because she’s with him and we
don’t know where they are.”
“Therefore,” he said loftily, “we proceed to the site of the crime. Now,
according to the newspaper, the murder occurred”—he stopped and glanced
up—“I should say, will occur, shouldn’t I?”
“How about won’t occur?”
“Ah, yes.” He frowned and briefly started off. “At any rate, the event
which is not going to occur happened at approximately half-past two.
Hence, we should plan to arrive early.”
“Just what do you intend to do?”
“Why, surprise him and stop the poor girl’s murder! What else?”
“But how? We’re not armed.”
“I wouldn’t want to be.”
“I don’t understand.”
“My dear girl, when I confronted him before at the hotel, I cast the first
stone, as it were. I stooped to his barbaric level, and I lost. He was right
about one thing—violence is contagious.”
“But there comes a time—”
“Look at it this way, Amy. The first man to raise a fist is the man who
has run out of ideas.”
“Very nicely put, but Stephenson is bigger than you, H.G., and
extremely dangerous! What if you do run out of ideas? And words?”
He sighed. At that moment, he had. Then: “There are two of us. And the
intended victim, of course.”
“And if worst comes to worst?”
“I suppose your motorcar could be considered a weapon. He would
certainly regard it as such. And”—he concluded ruefully—“Dr.
Stephenson’s surgical instruments can be used against him.”
She placed her hand over his and gave him a concerned, sympathetic
look.
“None of that will be necessary, of course,” he said in clipped tones.
“Now. Shall we?”
Three minutes ahead of schedule, they left her apartment descended the
stairs and went outside. He sighed, realizing that ultimately his faith in
himself and his feelings for her were the most powerful weapons he had.
Before he got into the motorcar, he glanced over the top and saw that
she was smiling at him, her eyes full of love. Good Lord, he thought, had
she been reading his mind?
He climbed into the Accord and settled himself in the seat. He glanced
at her, then quickly looked away, for she was still gazing at him with a
tenderness that until this point had been reserved for what she had termed
“afterglow.”
“Me, too,” she said quietly.
They drove away. Out in the bay, a foghorn droned. Below in the city, a
siren shrieked. Several blocks away a basset hound responded with a
mournful howl.
Leslie John Stephenson and Dolores Clark sat together at his table, sipping
drinks, legs pressed tightly together. Their heads almost touched so that
they could talk low and still hear each other over the music. She smoked
long, dark-brown cigarettes and blew the smoke past him. Occasionally,
some would wisp up and fog her facial features, making her seem
mysterious. That, he enjoyed.
“Ah, my dear Dolores,” he said in rich tones. “Meeting you has been a
sweet, albeit unexpected, pleasure.”
She laughed. “Likewise.”
“Are you enjoying yourself?” he asked, his eyes hooded.
“Unhuh.”
“Well, then.” He drained his glass and smacked his lips. “Shall we?”
“Shall we what?”
“Consider the remainder of the evening as an opportunity to improve on
the beginning? Or, as an occasion to celebrate the exciting, the unknown
and the uncharted?” He gave her a peck of a kiss and just a touch of his
tongue.
She shivered, leaned into him and emitted a small laugh. “You talk like
you dance.”
They left the club, and after exchanging the necessary banalities with
respect to when, where and how, he let her lead him toward her mode of
transportation, which turned out to be—like herself—sleek, black and
elegant. The name “Porsche 944” gleamed from the rear of the machine.
He slid into the snug capsule alongside her slender frame and inhaled
the heady aroma of the rich leather seats. Now he would let this svelte
young lady of color take him somewhere and he would thoroughly enjoy
himself. And, on the morrow, he would return to 92½ Green Street, surprise
Amy Robbins and abduct her. She would lead him to the inimitable little
scientist, Wells. And if she refused to cooperate? Then he would violate her
and she would die as had all the others before her.
But that was tomorrow. Now was time for Dolores.
He eased back in the plush seat and adjusted the fall of his shirt as she
accelerated hard out of the parking lot, hit the street in second gear and soon
was doing seventy miles per hour, the harsh, high echo of the powerful
engine disturbing the stillness of Pacific Avenue.
He placed his left hand on her thigh and began caressing her. With his
right, he removed his pocket watch and absently fondled it.
Amy and H.G. left Russian Hill and drove down Jones to Market Street.
Thanks to the late hour, the traffic was light. She decided that they would
arrive at McLaren Park quicker if she took the freeway, so she headed for
the Bayshore, deep in thought. She had racked her brain, trying to discover
errors in H.G.’s logic. But how could anyone question “A” exists and is
followed by “B” and both are concluded by “C”? And face it, she told
herself, if the man was brilliant enough to build a time machine, there was
no reason why he couldn’t stop a couple of murders.
She drove up an on ramp and steered south on the Bayshore, increasing
their speed to a cautious fifty-eight miles per hour. No need to risk a
speeding ticket; that would be disastrous. And besides, they had plenty of
time.
The closer they got to McLaren Park, the less apprehensive she became.
A bizarre excitement came over her, the likes of which she had never
known before. It wasn’t just the cosmic nature of their mission or
knowledge of the future; it wasn’t merely saving a girl’s life and hence her
own; it wasn’t just foiling history’s most notorious murderer, either. Rather,
it was all those things and more: she had inexorably fallen in love with H.
G. Wells. He was a great man. An author and inventor with few equals. She
had never really thought in terms of an ideal mate before; she had no
checklist of that sort, and she wasn’t about to start one now. But to suddenly
find that a person of his caliber was taken with her… She was awed. She
felt stronger and more capable than she’d ever been before.
There was a loud bang.
At first, Amy thought that it was a gunshot. Then she felt the car pull to
the left and knew differently. She fought to remain in control of the car just
as she tried to ignore the swell of panic, the sick feeling that was building
inside.
“What the devil?” H.G. exclaimed.
The left front tire flapped wildly. Very quickly, the rubber was shredded
by the rough concrete. The car veered farther left and scraped along the
retaining wall that separated the north and southbound lanes. Amy jerked
the wheel hard to the right and braked. The car finally stopped on the
freeway’s left shoulder.
She stared straight ahead, unable to move. Her heart pounded, her hands
shook badly.
“What’s happened?” His face was ashen. He knew that something had
gone horribly wrong.
“We had a flat!”
“A flat? Can it be repaired?”
“We have to fix it!” She sprang from the car, opened the trunk, grabbed
the tool kit and jack, then struggled to get the spare tire out of its well. H.G.
tried to help her, but the spare seemed permanently lodged. It was as if the
car manufacturer had neglected to make the well large enough and had thus
unwittingly placed the tire in the enemy’s camp. Finally, H.G. pried it loose
and lifted it out of the trunk. He barked his shins on the bumper, howled
with pain and dropped the tire. It started to roll across the freeway, and
Amy had to chase it down.
Eyes wide with fear, she brought it back, then began the tedious process
of jacking up the car.
“What can I do?” he asked.
“Nothing!”
He looked around wildly. “If only there were a telephone! I could tell
the police to go to McLaren Park!”
“If you go down the freeway”—she worked rapidly—“there’s a call box
on the side of the road every half a mile!”
“Right.” He started off, then suddenly turned back to her, his hands
clenching and unclenching. “I have to know! Flats! Do they happen often?”
“They happen.” She unscrewed lug nuts.
“Frequently?”
“I can’t answer that!” She gestured at the ruined tire. “Look! It still has
tread on it! It was still in good shape! I don’t know why it happened!”
He stared at her a moment longer, then turned and hurried away.
She went back to the flat tire. She lifted it off the axle with a grunt and
threw it to the side. She tried to place the spare on the axle only to discover
that she had to jack the car up even higher for it to fit. She whimpered while
pumping the handle and imagined that the blowout had been a sound heard
along the entire length and breadth of the fourth dimension.
H.G. hurried along the shoulder of the freeway. Frequently, motorcars
hurtled past, flashing their lights at him, their tires howling.
A simple twist of fate.
Was that what it had been? Or had destiny retaliated? And hence was
omniscient? No, no, he told himself, let the priests think along those lines.
The tire could have been cast from defective materials. The stress points
could have been improperly tested. The tire could have hit something sharp
on the roadway, a jagged rock, perhaps. After all, hadn’t Amy said that flats
did happen? Then he frowned. Yes, but why then? Why not before on the
drive to Fisherman’s Wharf? Or to the museum? He could not answer. He
cursed his pessimistic speculations, his vacillations from the tenets of free
will.
He was spared further self-doubt by a “Call Box.” He quickly read the
instructions on the yellow face and deposited the inevitable coin.
(Unconsciously, he wondered how he was ever going to get along in the
nineteenth century without this marvelous communications device.)
Eventually, he was connected to a desk sergeant in the Homicide
Division. He identified himself as a Mr. Wells from London and explained
the emergency nature of his call.
“Would you repeat that, please?”
“Tell Lieutenant Mitchell that a girl is going to be murdered by the lake
in McLaren Park at any moment! Please get there as soon as possible!”
“Your name again, sir?”
“Wells! W-e-l-l-s.”
H.G. checked his watch as the Accord rocketed down Mandell Street, Amy
at the wheel. The time was two thirty-five.
“We can still make it!” he shouted.
The car accelerated up a steep, curving hill, and suddenly they were
inside the park, motoring through the black confines of a forest at top speed.
H.G. could see the tension in Amy’s face. Yet, she did not wax hysterical or
say a word, and he admired her strength. He could only hope that he would
be as strong when the time came. If only he could have predicted the flat
tire; if only they had left sooner; if only… He shook his head. There did not
seem any way to know the variables as they were drawn closer and closer to
the moment. And yet, if they were to emerge victorious, it seemed
imperative that they be aware of all the twists and turns. H.G. did not want
either one of them to resemble Cuchulainn, that blustering hero of old Irish
legend, the classic picture of tragic irony, who would go down to the shore
every morning at sunrise to do battle with the waves of the Atlantic armed
only with a heavy broadsword. He had not realized until he was a
weakened, wasted old man unable to lift his weapon that the waves were
endless and he was not.
Amy turned her vehicle right onto John F. Shelley Drive and slowed
down.
“Turn off your lights,” he commanded sharply.
She did so.
“When you reach the entrance of the parking lot that services the lake,
stop and let me get out. Then proceed slowly in the direction of a black
motorcar. When you get close enough, use your lights as you would an
artillery piece.”
She gulped and nodded.
They went around a curve in the road and H.G. heard Amy groan with
terror. The car stopped. Then she put her face in her hands and fell back
against the seat. For an instant, he could not imagine what was wrong—
until he saw a black and white patrol car stopped next to an automobile at
the far end of the parking lot, its red, blue and orange lights flashing. One
policeman was frantically shouting into the squad car’s radio. The other was
down on the pavement, hunched on his hands and knees like a dog, retching
out of control. H.G. heard sirens in the distance.
He knew then that they were too late.
OceanofPDF.com
11
Somehow, Amy managed to maintain her composure for the drive back to
Russian Hill. Once they parked in front of her building, however, she
crumpled against the steering wheel and began to sob, her hands trembling
so badly that she could not pull the keys from the ignition.
“Amy, it’s all right! We won’t be here!”
“You promise?” she whispered.
“I promise! It’s very simple. We’ll just leave like we originally
planned.”
Still, she could not control herself. “I don’t want to die,” she moaned. “I
don’t want to die!”
He took the keys out of the ignition for her, dropped them into his
pocket, then helped her out of the Accord and up into her flat. He eased her
down onto the couch. Beyond grief, she just huddled there and stared, like a
catatonic, at nothing. He paced the floor, trying not to be nervous about his
failure to alter the course of human events. There had to be an answer other
than the smug, Catholic concept of predestination. There just had to be!
There were no more Dolores Clarks with which to test out a theory; no
more margins for error; there were only fifteen hours left.
And then he went to her and held her tightly. He felt her pain. All of us
know that we are going to die, he thought, but we can live with the
absurdity of our own death because we don’t know when it is to happen.
Even most terminally ill patients can bear the knowledge that the end will
come soon; but to know exactly when? H.G. winced.
Suddenly, an idea began to form in his mind. What if they used The
Utopia to go further ahead in time? He scowled. No, that wouldn’t work, for
they could time-travel a thousand years and still find out that they had not
changed the future.
What about the recent past? he thought. If he could not change history,
then he could always relive the last few days over and over and
permanently dwell on their Utopian lovemaking. No, he would always
know that he had perpetually eschewed a showdown with Stephenson and
the Fates. That would be downright cowardly. Moreover, if he placed
himself and Amy on such a temporal treadmill, he would be prolonging her
life in limbo. And that would be absurd, for he would be removing her free
will. The only acceptable choice seemed to be to remain on their collision
course with destiny.
Suddenly, surprisingly, she spoke. “This is all so mind-boggling, H.G.”
Her voice quavered. “I don’t feel in touch with reality anymore. Or sanity.
You’re the only thing that doesn’t seem crazy.”
He looked up and saw that the night had lifted; there was a gray fog
outside the window. “It’s dawn. You should get some rest.”
“You’re right, but I’m not sure that I can sleep.”
“I could make you a drink.”
“No. There’s Valium in the medicine chest. It’ll make me feel better,
too. I’ll get it.”
She took two, then curled up on the sofa and gazed at him. “What are
you thinking?” she asked.
“That I am eternally yours.”
She smiled. “I like that.”
He looked off into the near and distant space. When the thought was
complete, he turned back to her. “What was the term that the Bard once
coined, my dear? Star-crossed lovers?”
She became radiant, even though she appeared to be very sleepy.
He chuckled. “Maybe someday I’ll write about time-crossed lovers.”
“I like that even better.”
Lieutenant J. Willard Mitchell crossed the parking lot, got into the plainwrap and lit his tenth cigarette of the day. It was not quite nine o’clock in
the morning. He gestured at his partner. Sergeant Ray started the car, and
they drove away from McLaren Park.
Mitchell rubbed his weather-beaten face as if that would relieve his
worried exhaustion. He had been up all night, and he had a feeling that it
was going to be quite a while before he got a good night’s sleep again. The
press was beginning to rumble and clamor, and he didn’t have a suspect. He
wasn’t even close.
He stared out the side window with a jaundiced eye. First, there had
been the Chinese hooker, Jade Chang. Then—just hours ago—the girl
named Marsha McGee. And now this. A wealthy attorney’s daughter.
Murdered in her own car and then butchered. Mitchell shivered. He had
never seen such vicious brutality before, and yet in all three cases there had
been no sign of a struggle. From all indications, the women had been
willingly involved in sex when the violence occurred. The killer, then, was
smart and dangerous, for he had the ability to come across as a normal,
passionate male. The lieutenant sighed. Yeah, this guy made the Zodiac
killer look like Robin Hood. He swore inwardly. This was all he needed five
weeks before Christmas—a self-styled slasher. What should they call him?
He mused sardonically. Sourdough Jack the Ripper?
Sergeant Ray turned left onto Bryant Street and accelerated up the two
blocks to police headquarters. When he pulled abreast of the main entrance,
his gnarled face opened wide with astonishment. “Look!”
Approximately fifty members of the press corps waited outside the
building. When they saw the car, they started for it en masse. Two local TV
news “minicam” crews jockeyed for position, and one violently shoved a
rival camera operator to one side. The hapless technician stumbled and lost
his grip on his Norelco. The sixty-five-thousand-dollar camera did a topheavy flip and then smacked into the concrete pavement. Broken transistors
spewed out alongside the remains of a twenty-to-two-fifty Canon zoom
lens. The operator stared down in shock and the entire mob of reporters
paused as if in sympathy.
“Christ. They’re really out for blood.”
“Take us around back.”
“You’d think they’d had enough.”
They parked in the motor pool and went upstairs to the homicide
division. Mitchell shed his coat and tie when he finally got to his
mahogany-paneled inner sanctum. His faithful secretary, Ruth, gingerly
placed a steaming cup of coffee on his desk as if it were plasma.
“Thanks,” he grunted gratefully, then lit a fresh cigarette. He swilled the
coffee, sat down and stared out the window. Ruth left, but before Mitchell
had a chance to think, Sergeant Ray slipped into the room and dropped
another computer print-out on the desk in front of him.
“The fingerprints lifted off Dolores Clark’s Porsche match those found
at the Noe Street apartment,” he reported soberly.
“Terrific,” Mitchell replied with unenthusiastic sarcasm. “That means
they also match the ones taken at the massage parlor.”
As did the footprints, the blood traces, the bacteria, the sperm count, et
cetera. Mitchell scowled and dropped the print-out into a wastebasket.
There were no leads; he did not have a shred of evidence. When all the data
—fingerprints included—was programed into the department’s star
computer, there was no answer! Instead, they had received electronic
confusion, and the computer (nicknamed “Sherlock”) would print out “x’s”
and “o’s,” then shut down as if to cool its circuits.
Who had ever heard of fingerprints or a sperm count that didn’t belong
to anyone? Mitchell wondered. It was as if the computer were saying the
suspect didn’t exist! The hell he didn’t.
He was stymied. Maybe he should retire and let some young Turk like
Sergeant Ray take over. Maybe there were things that he was overlooking
that someone newer and fresher might see right away. No, his pride
wouldn’t let him.
The phone buzzed.
“Yeah, Ruth?”
“Are you busy, sir?”
“I wish I was.” He grinned ruefully. “Come on in.”
She entered. “Your calls.” She handed him a telephone log sheet. On
one side of the sheet was the time; on the other, the caller and message. He
scanned it.
“Anything interesting?” asked Sergeant Ray.
Suddenly, Mitchell bolted up in his chair and stared closely at the log
sheet. “You remember that Mr. Wells from London? That curious little nut
who called himself a citizen of the world?”
“Yeah?”
“He called to tell us about the Dolores Clark murder.” Mitchell leaned
back in his chair, dragged on his cigarette, allowed himself the luxury of a
broad smile.
Ray grabbed the log sheet and studied it. “At two thirty-five? That was
before it happened!”
Mitchell nodded wisely.
“Jesus, Lieutenant! Maybe he was right about that Stephenson dude!
Maybe this Mr. Wells really is a psychic.”
“No. He’s no psychic.”
“Wait a minute! The computer said that Stephenson didn’t exist. Just
like the fingerprints!”
“Oh, he exists, all right.”
“Who?” asked a confused Sergeant Ray. “Wells or Stephenson?”
“They’re one and the same.”
“Huh?”
“A psychopathic split personality.”
“You lost me.”
“The rational side comes into my office and says that he knows who a
murderer is because he wants us to stop him from killing. Meanwhile, the
insane part of this guy keeps on cutting up women. I think that this Wells is
in reality asking for help. It’s your classic case of Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde.”
“I still think he could be a psychic.”
“Believe me, Sergeant Ray, he’s no psychic.” Mitchell snubbed out his
cigarette. “He called before the murder occurred because he knew that he
was going to commit it.”
Amy had fallen into a deep, drugged sleep.
H.G. sat beside her on the bed, gazing at her delicate, relaxed features.
He was awed by the tenderness that they shared. He was certain that he
loved this girl now more than he had ever loved anyone or anything before.
He vowed to himself that he would protect her and save her life no matter
what. If he lost her, he would lose everything, including his own will to
live.
From her closet he took down a quilt that had been hand-sewn by her
grandmother and covered her.
In the dining room, he stared out the bay window at the overcast sky.
The grandfather clock across the room bonged once, reminding him that
destiny was inexorably coming closer.
“Blast,” he muttered softly. He did not like the idea of leaving. It would
mean that Stephenson would win by forfeit. He would remain at large, free
to carry on his career of atrocities. True, Amy’s life would be spared, but
he, H. G. Wells, had not Leslie John Stephenson back to the nineteenth
century to face justice.
He glanced at his chronometer and pushed a button. It read precisely
half-past eleven. He had six hours left. That should be time enough to do
something, he thought. As opposed to passively waiting. Dalliance did not
seem worthy of him, Amy Robbins or The Utopia.
Suddenly, an idea took shape. He must try, he told himself. To give up
now would be to drown the hopes for an enlightened mankind in the Sea of
Tranquility. As Huxley had once said, Above all, a man must be true unto
himself; if not, then he becomes vanquished and can be true to no one.
If to no one else, he owed it to Amy.
He left the flat, his mind fresh and clear despite his body’s lack of sleep.
He flagged down a taxi.
“Where to, sir?”
“The San Francisco Public Library.”
He was going to the library to find out if the legendary Jack the Ripper
had ever been caught. If he had, then that meant that he, H. G. Wells, had
successfully taken the villain back to 1893 London and remanded him into
the custody of Scotland Yard. Such knowledge, H.G. deduced, would have
tremendous bearing on what he did this evening.
He got out of the cab and was pleased to be near a library again. He
briefly recalled the many hours that he had used the library in South
Kensington as a refuge during his first marriage.
At the desk, he requested every book on Jack the Ripper. After an
agonizing, twenty-minute wait, an assistant librarian returned and placed a
stack of books in front of H.G. He took the books and hurried into a far
corner of the large reading room. He spread them out on a table, and began
reading.
An hour later, H.G. slammed shut the last of the books and cursed under
his breath.
“I failed,” he said out loud.
He looked at the book again and reread the inescapable conclusion. Jack
the Ripper was never found, never captured and never identified. To this
day, his identity remains one of the great, unsolved mysteries in the history
of crime.
What did that mean?
Quite simply, that events had occurred as it now seemed like they were
going to occur. Destiny had triumphed. H.G. and Amy had fled and
Stephenson was left free to prowl the twentieth century. Or, H.G. could
have stayed at the apartment and confronted Stephenson and then lost. In
that case, Amy would die as reported in the newspaper.
Wait. There was a third alternative. What if he stayed and confronted
Stephenson and Amy lived? Of course! He would send Amy away and he
would stay. Then he frowned and looked at the book again. “… one of the
great, unsolved mysteries in the history of crime.” He had not taken Jack
the Ripper back to the nineteenth century. Therefore, if he had defeated
destiny, then Stephenson had been vanquished in 1979.
But how?
Suddenly, he gasped, for he knew what he was going to do. His face
turned ashen. He slowly stood and shuffled for the great oak doors. He was
going to pursue the only acceptable alternative left open to him.
He was going to purchase a pistol.
“Sam’s Pawn Shop—Instant Cash” was east of Market Street near the
Greyhound Bus Depot. Although only blocks away from the library and the
civic center, complexion of the city was different here. There was debris
and grit in the streets, despair and resignation in the people’s eyes. The
buildings needed painting and the air tasted heavy and foul with fumes.
H.G. tried not to think of this as he stood at the counter and waited for
the proprietor. When he had left the library, he remembered Stephenson
saying that anyone could buy a weapon in this so-called Utopia of 1979. All
one had to do was find a sporting-goods store. Well, apparently pawn shops
sold small arms, too, H.G. thought, along with a little bit of everything else
in the universe. He stood there, staring into the dark black recesses of the
shop and saw relics that had not even been conceived of in 1893. A
technological scrap heap, he mused. Monuments to the future capabilities of
science hanging unnoticed and unused. He wondered what functions they
had once served. And if this were the end for these futurological antiques,
then why had they been built in the first place? He saw an “RCA High
Fidelity tape recorder—only $12.50.” The name was cracked and
discolored.
As other relics took on shape, he imagined the human race might end up
back where it started. Like this, in a cave; man, with his objets de précision
hanging on the wall. Mankind, with its penchant for rushing in where
angels feared to tread, had created a mindless technology already. Who
knew what synthetic monsters man was capable of creating in the future?
Monsters which could devastate the earth’s surface? Were computers, in
fact, the beginning of such a debacle? His thoughts were interrupted by the
proprietor.
“Eighty bucks.”
“Seems reasonable enough.”
The man shrugged. “This day and age I wouldn’t be caught dead
without a piece.” He whistled faintly. “But that’s just me.”
H.G. tentatively picked up the pistol. It was, according to the tag, a .38-
caliber Smith & Wesson special. He could feel and smell the light coat of
oil that covered the weapon’s surface. His hand began to tremble, and the
pistol felt like it weighed a thousand pounds. Never before had he touched a
firearm; never before had he not wanted to tinker with a mechanical device.
He hated the snub-nosed, malevolent example of man’s inability to be
rational; the steel-blue symbol of man’s inhumanity to man; the tempered
icon of Ara, the goddess of vengeance. He detested the pistol. It stood for
everything that he abhorred. He moved to set the weapon down.
Something stopped him.
What about Amy?
Suddenly, he was surprised. Now the pistol actually felt quite good
nestled in the palm of his hand. He hefted it. He felt calmer; a sense of wellbeing came over him. He was astonished.
“Like the feel of it?”
He did not respond.
“Here, let me show you how it works.”
Twenty minutes later, H.G. left the shop, the special in one coat pocket,
a box of ammunition in the other. He moved slowly along the dismal street
and tried to convince himself that everything would be all right. Despite his
purchase, he was worried. Yes, he was going to shoot an ex-classmate for
the good of humanity, past, present and future.
Except what if he couldn’t go through with it?
Amy stirred. Although not awake, she half rose from the bed. As soon as
her body felt cold air, she fell back, rolled into a ball and snuggled in the
comforter. How nice. H.G. had covered her up. She was warm. Toasty. It
felt so good to be warm. To sleep. Everything was fine. Soon, H.G. would
take her away and they would live happily ever after. But it felt so good to
sleep. She dreamed.
She was on the boat at the lake, drifting through the summer, her arm
dangling over the side, the water caressing her fingers. The sun was setting
behind the pine and birch on the shore, making the surface of the lake
golden. A warm breeze blew. The water lapped against the side of the boat
and made a comforting, sloshing sound. The boat rocked gently, and for a
moment she was in her mother’s arms, then a lover’s. The world was
perfect; the joy was endless. She sighed then, completely secure. She had
always been a highly tolerant, strong child. Moments like these were why.
Her existence was placid. Her life would be a smooth drift through the
golden waters of the cosmos. Her thoughts would always be free from
worry; her flesh would always be caressed by cool water and warm breezes.
She was an eternal child of the universe; Amy, the goddess of Tranquility.
Someone was calling her from the shore. The boat turned and she
opened her eyes and could see the dock. H.G. was there and he was waving
at her and smiling. She felt a surge of joy and was surprised. She had not
expected him. Obviously, her lover had come up to the lake to join her for
the holidays. Now every day would be a holiday. Yes, that was him on the
dock, and he wanted to be with her now. Together they would laze through
the universe, a union of blissful perfection.
She should get up and bring the boat around and sail to the dock so that
he could get on board. Yes, that was what she would do, even though she
did not want to disturb her reverie. She looked up. The boat no longer had a
sail; it had vanished. She shrugged. She would row. She reached out
languidly and her hands found the gunwales, but the cold metal eyelets held
nothing. The oars had vanished, too. She sighed. What to do? Nothing to be
done. She missed her lover so.
The breeze became stronger, and the boat drifted farther away from the
shore. H.G. got smaller and smaller; he receded into a dot, and no longer
could she hear him or see him waving. She thought that maybe she should
dive over the side and swim to the dock. He would reach down and help her
up the ladder and they would hold hands and laugh and gaze at the horizon.
But wasn’t it too far to swim now? she wondered. And the boat had drifted
farther away still. Did she know how to swim? Or had she forgotten?
Then she could no longer move. She laughed inside. It didn’t matter
anymore.
Still fast asleep, she pulled her pillow over her head.
H.G. went down Mission Street, his coat sagging from the weight of the
pistol and the ammunition. He walked through six more blocks of the
industrial slum before he realized that he was not going to find a taxi in this
part of town. He turned and headed back toward the center of the city,
depressed. The gloom of the area had finally gotten to him. Almost one
hundred years of technological development and scientific progress had not
improved life for most people here. Moreover he himself had just purchased
a pistol. Did that mean that Stephenson was night? Would he play
Mephistopheles to H.G.’s Dr. Faustus?
“No, damn you!” He said out loud.
All I want is for the juggernaut of science and technology to push
human civilization toward a workable value system, a pervasive golden
rule. Something that mankind has always wanted and now—because it has
unlocked the doors to eternity and the universe—can achieve. All I want is
to see a few examples of that kind of progress so that I may return to my
humble, primitive century relieved and not have to spend too much of my
time worrying about of Armageddon.
Not to mention, Amy. His digital chronometer told him that it was halfpast two in the afternoon.
Soon, he would send Amy off in her Accord—hours before the
supposed time of her death. She would never be in jeopardy. Then he would
take up root in the rocking chair, squarely facing the door, .38 Smith &
Wesson special ready to fire. When Stephenson came through the door, he
would pull the trigger and end the man’s twisted existence.
A taxi finally pulled over and stopped. H.G. climbed in the back and
gave the cabby the address. The driver accelerated north on Market Street.
H.G. sighed. It seemed as though this taxi were taking him further and
further away from a part of himself that he did not want to lose: his
optimistic views on the human condition. And how could he seriously
champion rationality when here he was with a pistol in his pocket? It would
appear that no matter what happened, the inimical surgeon had won the
battle of philosophies. H.G. stared out the window and felt small. How
could he worry about an innocent population, how could he consider justice
when the world he found himself in seemed so much more inherently evil
than the one he had left? He had encountered no bastions of morality, none
even falsely conceived. Rather, his observations had told him that the world
of 1979 was more conducive to a Jack the Ripper than it was to, say, a
savior. Wasn’t he, himself, walking testament to that fact? A peace-loving,
law-abiding human being now actively planning to kill someone?
He suddenly began to weep. Man is the cruelest animal, Nietzsche had
once said. Unto himself, H. G. Wells added. He was utterly disconsolate.
All he had left was Amy.
“Can’t you go any bloody faster?” he exclaimed.
His outburst startled the driver. The man pushed down on the
accelerator. The taxi responded sluggishly, but eventually was lumbering
through the city’s streets at a good clip.
At Jones and Green streets, H.G. paid the cabby, and hurried down
Green Street. He was here. Thank God. He would be with Amy in seconds
and they would be the first two human beings in the universe ever to defeat
destiny.
He stopped by one of the boxed trees on the sidewalk in front of her
building, briefly glanced at a strange sedan parked on the street, then paid it
no heed. Amy was waiting.
He ran up the steps, burst into the foyer and was about to race up to her
door when four, steel-like hands grabbed him. He was jerked back through
the foyer, out the front door and tossed onto the hard concrete of the
sidewalk. Dazed, he tried to rise. A hard, polished boot connected with his
midsection, and he went down again and smacked against the box that held
the tree. He flailed his arms and tried, to scream Amy’s name when
something heavy smashed into the back of his head. The world went gray
then, and his body limp. He was jerked up and tossed into the strange sedan
that he had noticed just moments earlier.
Then the motorcar was moving, turning, accelerating. He was overcome
with nausea, for he was helpless. He was being forcibly taken away from
Amy during her hour of ultimate need.
OceanofPDF.com
12
Leslie John Stephenson stirred in the dark-brown sheets of his king-sized
bed. He stretched, then emitted a loud yawn and relaxed. Smiling, he raised
his head to look at the clock on the dresser. Fifteen minutes past three. My,
wasn’t he the slothful one, lying around until the middle of the afternoon!
Especially when he must resolve the business with Wells. He chuckled.
Enjoying two women in the same evening could put a strain on a man. He
wasn’t as young as he used to be, either. And the police had gotten to
McLaren Park much sooner than he would have expected. It was as if they
had been called. He had been surprised and had to run like back in white
chapel. He hadn’t gotten home until seven o’clock in the morning, and he
had been exhausted.
“Even angels of Satan must sleep,” he said to himself.
He swung his naked frame out of the bed, went into the bathroom and
stood under a hot shower.
It had been worth the exhaustion. The seduction and murder of Dolores
Clark had been the most profoundly satisfying sexual occurrence that he
had ever experienced. Completely naked, she had been astride him with her
back to his chest, her dark, glistening body moving wildly; she had been
moaning, but gradually those sounds had become shouts, frantic pleas for
release. He had groped for his knife, found it, then climaxed with a frenzy
while driving the blade into her belly time after time. He did not clearly
remember what he had done next, so great had been his passion, so utterly
complete his satisfaction.
He took his ritual cup of tea in front of the Danish fireplace and
watched the winter sunlight shining through the large stained-glass window
across the living room. Wells was probably going crazy reading the
accounts of the murders in the newspapers, realizing that his time machine
was responsible. Yes, Wells was no doubt still trying to find him. What
delicious irony! He would find him very shortly, only not quite in a way he
would suspect.
Stephenson poured himself more tea, relishing his classic yet rococo
scheme. His actions would be liberating; they would leave him unfettered
and unthreatened. He would have a time machine at his beck and call; he
would be invincible.
So inspired, he went to the secretary desk in the corner, sat down and
began to compose a poem.
Why, true love belongs to brutality,
Said the King with keen mentality.
Come, come, my queen, my dove,
Let us quench our thirst for love.
I am yours forever, she nodded and vowed,
To be done away with, killed, or ploughed.
For a lass must understand the reality
Which saith, “True love belongs to Brutality.”
He threw back his head and laughed, delighted with his quick, off-the-cuff
creation. He jotted it down for eternity, then shivered with pride. While the
poem had been written quixotically, it nevertheless had a lightness, a
fandango rhythm, a voice that was positively tongue-in-cheek. And yet, he
had sacrificed none of his important thematic material. Yes, this piece of
verse was definitely worth posterity. He would have to arrange for its
publication. He was certain that his composition would rival anything
Shelley had put down in The Cenci.
He quickly dressed, then left his flat. He wanted to purchase an exotic
knife before the night got under way. Maybe—if he had time—he would
stop and enjoy a light supper before proceeding to the flat occupied by Amy
Robbins. He smiled. Surely Satan had blessed him.
He turned into the traffic. No taxis appeared in the next onrush of
vehicles, so he struck a pose that he had already witnessed many times in
1979, stuck out his thumb and waited for a ride.
The smaller of the two men drove the sedan slowly down Jones Street as if
on a languid tour of the city. The other was turned, looking over the back of
the seat and hefting the .38 Smith & Wesson special, a bemused expression
on his face.
“You’re making a mistake!” Wells shouted. “A horrible, terrible
mistake!” The handcuffs cut painfully into his wrists. “A girl is going to be
murdered back there, do you hear me?”
“Nice piece. Where’d you get it?”
“Why don’t you read him his rights?”
“Yeah.”
“Will you please listen to me!”
“You have the right to remain silent—”
“Please!”
“And the right to an attorney of your own choice.”
“For God’s sake, man!”
“You are hereby warned that anything you say may be used against you
in a court of law.”
“You don’t understand, do you!” H.G. screamed.
“Listen, dude! If you don’t quit screaming at me, you ain’t going to be
able to talk much longer! Do you understand that?”
“Or care,” H.G. added softly. He stared out the window, his mind racing
with ominous, cosmic questions. He could not let his mind snap or all
would be lost.
They finally got to police headquarters and drove around back to a
loading dock where uniformed officers lounged, smoking and joking with
each other. A sign overhead read “JAIL”. They pulled him out of the sedan
and led him toward the building. No one took any particular notice. The
little inventor could have been anyone—rich man, poor man, beggar man,
thief. He was routine.
As H.G. was propelled through the door, he managed one last look
behind him. The shadows were long, and he wished desperately that he
could read his watch, but it was on his wrist behind his back.
Time, now the most cherished gift of all, had been stolen by the police.
“I am no criminal!” he exclaimed, but no one listened.
They led him down a green corridor to an elevator. He was made to
board, and the machine slowly descended. He became numb and
bewildered; he was filled with a great sadness. He realized that if he had
been totally honest with Amy and told her his intentions, he probably would
not be here now. At the very least, she would have accompanied him. As it
was, Amy was alone—waiting for him to return. He could only hope that
she would have the sense to leave her apartment. If she dallied, she would
be greeting Dr. Leslie John Stephenson instead. With that thought, he
straightened up, screamed with panic and threw himself at the elevator
doors. The larger detective hurled him against the far wall of the elevator.
His head snapped hard into the metal facing. He slid down the wall to the
floor. The detective impassively helped the little man to his feet and
steadied him.
Then the elevator stopped and its doors opened H.G. was led to a desk
at a caged window, and he recognized that the officer behind it was a
sergeant, hence a man of some authority.
“I demand to see Lieutenant Mitchell!”
They removed his handcuffs. Then they handed the sergeant H.G.’s
pistol, his newspaper, his traveler’s checks, his precious digital chronometer
and everything else in his pockets. As a final indignity, they took off his
belt, and he reddened, thinking for a moment that his trousers would fall
off.
“My good man!”
“We wouldn’t want you hanging yourself now, would we?”
And then he was fingerprinted and photographed and it took such an
agonizingly long time. Everyone was so casual, and H.G. wondered if all
these modern police ever did was laugh at each other’s tasteless jokes,
smoke cigarettes, discuss women and comment on “the Raiders,” whoever
they were.
He was led to a cell. He realized with sudden horror that he was not
immediately going to be given a chance to explain. “Please, there isn’t
much time! I must see Lieutenant Mitchell!”
“You hot to confess or what?”
H.G. pulled away and made a hapless break for the door. He was caught
before he could get outside. They twisted his arms to the breaking point,
propelled him back across the room, hurled him into a tank and slammed
the door.
He got up off the floor and looked around. The cell smelled faintly of
urine and bile. Helpless, he put his face in his hands.
Lieutenant Mitchell was doing what he usually did when a murder
investigation made him nervous. He was enjoying a leisurely dinner at
Rocca’s. For some reason, food calmed him and removed the nausea
brought on by exhaustion. If he ate slowly; and that, he had.
He finished his vanilla ice cream, then sipped his third cup of coffee, lit
a cigarette and reflected. There was really nothing else he could do but wait.
Sure, the press was howling, but they always did. The D.A. and the
commissioner had the good sense to be unavailable for comment; they let
him and the chief handle it. That was what made Mitchell’s job worthwhile.
The politicians respected his track record and left him alone.
He sighed. The meal had removed his tension. He checked his watch,
left a healthy tip for the good service, then drove back to police
headquarters.
When he walked into his office, he saw the light on his phone was
flashing. “This is Mitchell!”
“Where you been, Lieutenant?” asked Sergeant Ray. “I’ve been trying
to get ahold of you for a couple of hours!”
“What’s up?”
“We got him! Officers Spector and Scheff apprehended the suspect
entering the building at 92½ Green Street.”
Mitchell grinned and chuckled. “You can tell Spector and Scheff to pick
up their sergeant’s stripes.”
“You bet, sir.”
“You can lift the rest of the stake-out around the girl’s place, too.”
“Yes, sir.”
“Didn’t I tell you I had it figured right?”
“You sure did, Lieutenant. He wanted to be caught. That’s where he was
staying, all right.”
“He didn’t harm her, did he?”
“Who?”
“Amy Robbins.”
“She wasn’t there.”
Mitchell sighed. “I sure as hell hope that she doesn’t turn up dead
somewhere.” He lit a fresh cigarette. “Where you got Wells now?”
“Downstairs in the slams.”
“I want to talk to him.”
“I’ll set it up right now, Lieutenant.”
Mitchell grinned. “Oh. One more thing, Sergeant.”
“What?”
“You still think he’s a psychic?”
The old grandfather clock in her living room bonged six times with a
muted, brass chime that hung in the air for a few seconds, then dissipated.
Amy woke abruptly and sat up straight, her eyes wide and unblinking.
For a moment she didn’t know where she was, since the drug had left her
senses groggy. She swung off the bed and looked at her window. It was
night outside! She peered at the clock above her bed. Six? There must be
some mistake! What was she still doing here?
She turned on the lights.
“H.G.,” she called tentatively. “Don’t you think it’s time we got out of
here?”
She walked down the hall and rapped on the bathroom door. “H.G.? It’s
awfully late,” she whispered, trying to keep the urgency out of her voice.
“H.G.?”
He wasn’t in the bathroom. She peered down the hall and saw that the
rest of her apartment was dark. She grew afraid and strained to listen for a
noise—anything—that might forewarn her of danger. There was nothing
except the very faint sound of a stereo coming from across the street.
H.G. must have fallen asleep on the couch in the living room because he
hadn’t wanted to disturb her. She relaxed somewhat. Sure. That was it.
After all, he had been up all night.
She tiptoed down the hall. She paused at the edge of the living room and
strained to see into the blackness, but all she could make out were vague
forms.
“H.G.?” she whispered insistently. “H.G.?”
She waited for several minutes, afraid to cross the room, then bolted to
the couch.
“H.G.! Wake up! H.G.!” She was leaning over the sofa and feeling for
him, but all her hands found were pillows in the darkness. He wasn’t there.
He was gone! She stumbled blindly into the foyer. Whimpering, she
fumbled for the light switch and turned it on. She slowly turned and
surveyed the room. She was about to come unglued. She took a deep breath
and controlled herself.
She glanced back and made sure the front door was locked. She hurried
to the couch, found her sneakers and put them on. Where had he gone and
why? When had he left? What had happened while she so blithely slept? If
she hadn’t believed in him, she never would have allowed herself to take
the Valium in the first place! She frowned. He, himself, had insisted upon
total honesty between them. Yet he had not been honest with her. He had
left the apartment and had not told her and her life was in jeopardy.
She went into the bedroom. She put on her coat and turned off the light.
Why? Why had he left? She shook her head. She could not think that he had
betrayed her.
She refused to doubt him now. She could only hope—fervently so—that
he was all right. She wiped away a lone tear, a simple expression of longing
to be by his side. Suddenly: What if something had happened to him?
The grandfather clock bonged once. Six fifteen. The sound resonated
with an ominous finality. Her heart pounded. Her hands were shaking.
She must leave.
She grabbed her wallet off the dining-room table and ran for the front
door. In the foyer she remembered her car keys; she stopped and fumbled in
her pockets, but didn’t find them. She frowned and turned. Had she left
them on the sofa? Or put them in the desk?
In the interrogation room, H.G. sat at an imitation-wood table in a chair
similar to the one he had first experienced at McDonald’s. Three times he
had patiently explained who he was, where he was from, how he had
arrived in 1979, what he was doing and the immediate danger faced by the
love of his life, Amy Robbins. Three times Lieutenant Mitchell—baffled by
Wells’s rational and sane sincerity—had shaken his head in disbelief and
asked H.G. to start again. Three times a police recorder at the other end of
the table had silently, inconspicuously worked a small keyboard and taken
down the bizarre tale.
Mitchell chain-smoked and paced in the center of the room, but
remained calm and detached. He was, a patient, thorough man. He turned.
“Let me see if I’ve got this straight.” He raised a finger and looked at H.G.
with a blank expression. “Your name is H. G. Wells and you came here on a
time machine called The Utopia and you’re chasing a Dr. Leslie John
Stephenson who you insist is Jack the Ripper.”
“You’ve got it, Lieutenant.” H.G. nodded furiously. “That’s absolutely
correct. I could not have phrased it more succinctly myself.”
“Do you realize how ridiculous that sounds?”
The black hand of the wall clock jumped forward. H.G. glanced at it,
then wiped sweat off his ashen face with a trembling hand.
It was 6:17 P.M.
“For God’s sake, Lieutenant! There isn’t much time! Please! Save the
girl!”
“I already have, Wells,” Mitchell replied coldly. “Her and a lot of other
women in this city.”
“In forty-three minutes, Leslie John Stephenson is going to walk into
her flat and murder her!”
“Leslie John Stephenson doesn’t exist and never did.”
“What are you saying?”
“Stephenson is you and you are him. Half of you wants to kill women
and then cut them up. The other half is sickened by such behavior and
wants to get caught.” He grinned. “Congratulations, Wells. Your half
finished first.”
“No! You’ve got it all wrong! You must believe me! Please! There isn’t
much time!”
The lieutenant emitted a dry laugh. “I don’t know about you, Wells, but
I’ve got all night. Now why don’t we try again? From the top?”
H.G. tried to calm himself so that he could explain a fourth time, but
was unsuccessful. He shook badly all over. When he tried to speak, his
throat would close, and he would convulse in a dry retch.
Mitchell observed, then left the room without a word. Moments later, he
returned with a pitcher of ice water and a glass. He poured some and
handed it to Wells.
H.G. gratefully drank. The gagging sensation left him. He looked up at
Mitchell and nodded with thanks.
“Now. Would you like a smoke?” Mitchell held out a pack of Camels.
“Would that help?”
“No,” H.G. replied hollowly. “I detest cigarettes.”
Mitchell lit one for himself, straddled a chair next to the recorder and
rested his chin on its back. He scrutinized H.G. thoughtfully. Someone
rapped on the door. “It’s open.” Mitchell’s eyes never left H.G.’s face.
Sergeant Ray entered the room with a sealed manila envelope which he
placed on the table in front of Mitchell. “These are his personal effects.”
“Anything interesting?”
“Yeah. This.” With his other hand, Ray gave Mitchell the .38 Smith &
Wesson special and the box of ammunition.
The brusquely examined the weapon, then casually tossed it onto the
table. It made a loud and rude clatter. He ground out his cigarette and
rubbed his wrinkled face. Then he fixed Wells with a jaundiced eye and
gave him a knowing look. “They didn’t make thirty-eight specials eightysix years ago, Wells.”
“You’ve got it wrong, Lieutenant! I purchased the weapon just this
afternoon so that I might defend Miss Robbins! I was going to apprehend
the foul miscreant, Stephenson! I was prepared to shoot him, if necessary!”
Mitchell laughed. “You’ll have to do better than that. A whole lot
better.”
H.G. closed his eyes and took a deep breath. Cold, nervous sweat
dripped down his flanks. He had to remain calm; he had to control himself.
He had to use his logical mind and think of a way out of this. Somehow he
had to convince them. “Please, Lieutenant,” he said softly. “The girl, Miss
Robbins—”
“I’ve got another theory, Wells.” Mitchell got out of the chair and
resumed pacing. “None of the women you murdered resisted. As a matter of
fact, all of them were engaged in sexual acts just prior to their deaths. Why?
How? Very simply, you had a gun at their heads. This gun.”
H.G.’s eyes widened; he could not immediately reply. He was filled
with terror, realizing that this clever, methodical police lieutenant already
had enough evidence to send him to prison! The man’s theories were solid;
his arguments were perfectly logical. But there wasn’t a shred of truth to
anything that he was saying! There must be a way to convince him
otherwise; there must be a way to save Amy’s life in the short time that
remained.
“Let’s see what else you were carrying around, Wells.” Mitchell ripped
open the manila envelope and dumped out its contents.
“Please, Lieutenant! Forget everything I’ve said, all right? Just forget it!
You must save Amy Robbins!” He shouted. “Why can’t you at least send
one of your men over to her flat to protect her? If you don’t she is going to
die at seven o’clock!”
But Mitchell wasn’t listening.
Instead, the lieutenant was looking at an edition of the San Francisco
Chronicle which he had removed from the manila envelope. He gazed at the
picture of a very pretty young woman named Amy Robbins and read a
headline about another murder.
“Jesus H. Christ,” he whispered to himself. He could not fathom what
he was seeing; he did not know what to make of it; never in his twentyseven years on the force had he ever encountered anything quite so bizarre.
The newspaper was dated November 10, 1979, tomorrow morning’s edition
—something which wouldn’t even be printed for another eight hours or so.
He rubbed his face furiously, then handed the newspaper to Sergeant Ray.
“What do you make of this, Sergeant?”
“Yes, that’s right!” the little Englishman shouted. “Take a look at it!” He
turned toward Mitchell, a glint of hope in his eyes. “It proves my
innocence! It proves what I’ve been saying, you fools! Now do you
understand what I’ve been telling you?” He glanced up at the clock. “It’s
twenty to seven, Lieutenant! You’ve got exactly twenty minutes! Now will
you send someone over to protect Miss Amy Robbins? So that she does not
end up on the front page of that blasted newspaper?”
Mitchell ignored Wells. “What do you think, Sergeant?”
“Jesus, I don’t know.” His gnarled face was pale. “Maybe we should
send somebody over I mean, did you see this box up at the top?”
“What box?”
“One-hundred-to-one shot pays off big at Bay Meadows,” he quoted,
then glanced at Mitchell. “What if this thing is for real, Lieutenant?”
“Of course it’s real!” H.G. exclaimed.
Mitchell could see that his partner was shaken, for he kept glancing at
Wells as if the man really might have supernatural powers of some kind.
The lieutenant snorted derisively. “You’re not looking at a psychic, Sergeant
Ray! You’re looking at one of the sickest killers you’ve ever seen!”
“Yes, sir, but the date. What about the date?”
“For Christ’s sake, Sergeant, use your brain! Haven’t you ever heard of
novelty shops where they print fake newspapers?” He gestured at Wells.
“This guy is so twisted that he concocted a newspaper story about his next
victim!”
“Yeah.” Ray nodded sadly, still distracted. “Payoffs like that only
happen to people who are retired or unemployed, anyway.”
H.G. was astonished. “You mean… you mean you don’t even believe
that? An example of futurological history?” He waved at the newspaper.
“My God, man, what more could you possibly want?”
“The truth.”
Mitchell saw his prisoner rise up in his chair, his entire body coiling for
an explosion. He tensed himself.
Then, suddenly, Wells sagged and went limp. Tears streamed down his
face and his lips quivered. “I’ll make a deal with you, Lieutenant!” he cried.
“You’re in no position to make a deal.”
“If you’ll send someone over to the flat of Miss Robbins, I will confess
to anything that you like.”
“I’m not interested in copping a plea, Wells. I want the truth.”
“What the hell, Lieutenant,” Sergeant Ray interrupted. “What can it
hurt? I mean, if that’s all he wants. Why don’t we send a car over?”
Mitchell sighed. “Yeah. You’re right. Then maybe he’ll cooperate.
Right, Wells?”
H.G. nodded.
Mitchell glanced at the sergeant. “Go ahead.” Ray left the room, and
then Mitchell swung back to H.G., an expectant expression on his face.
“I’m listening.”
“I killed them all,” H.G. croaked, his voice choked with relief. “Every
last one of them.”
Amy had looked in her desk, she had looked in the kitchen, she had looked
in the bedroom and the bathroom. Everywhere. She had gone through her
coat pockets a dozen times. The car keys were nowhere to be found. She
went to the desk one last time. Still no keys. Desperate, she emptied all of
the desk drawers on the table and sorted through the contents. Nothing. She
ran back into the bedroom and did the same with her dresser drawers. The
grandfather clock bonged once more.
Six forty-five.
She had fifteen minutes left. That was all. The hell with the car. She
would run. Right now. She hurried to the front door, then froze.
The doorknob was slowly turning and the lock was moving right along
with it.
She lurched back, her eyes wide, her head shaking “no” over and over
again. She heard the lock snap free. She spun around, and slipped inside the
foyer closet with just moments to spare.
Her breath hissed out. She reached behind her and grabbed the clotheshanging bar so that she would not faint and fall. When the blood returned to
her head, she carefully worked her way behind the unused coats and
dresses. She squatted on the floor. She began shaking; her breath came in
gasps; she felt cold all over; and her heart pounded so hard that she was
sure that the sound could be heard in the living room. She bit her lower lip
to stop from shaking.
Then she heard him out there—moving around slowly, quietly, catlike,
professional. He was early! She screamed inside. Early! In the newspaper
story, the coroner had reported that the murder had occurred between seven
and seven-thirty. Well, the coroner was wrong!
She screwed up her face, preventing a sudden rush of tears.
The fear was awful—worse than the actual event, she was certain. Her
skin crawled, anticipating a madman’s chortle, a strong hand in her hair, a
sudden jerk as she was upraised, and then a searing pain as a knife slashed
through her throat and cut open her abdomen. She twitched spasmodically.
She moaned low. She feared that she would snap and burst out of the closet
and throw herself at his feet, begging for release, to control herself.
Somehow, she found the inner strength to close her eyes and pray with
dignity to a supernatural being that she had accepted only casually before.
He pushed the door closed with his gloved hand, then carefully slipped the
surgical knife that he had used to unlock her front door back into its sheath
inside his polished half boot. He moved quickly across the foyer into the
living room, his lithe, powerful body crouched low, ready for the
unexpected. He paused, his eyes darting around the flat. He saw nothing,
straightened up and relaxed a little. Then he checked out the dining room,
kitchen, and bathroom. Finally, he crept into the bedroom, halfway hoping
that he would find Wells and the girl coupled passionately, unable to stop
even though they both recognized the chilling incarnation of death. No such
luck. Instead, the room gave him the impression that a thief had been here
before him. He frowned with puzzlement, then grinned. He rather liked the
look of chaos about the room—the sense of disorder and turbulence.
He turned and walked back down the hallway and into the kitchen, a
small, satisfied smile on his face. He was alone.
This time, he would wait, although he did not think it would be long.
The girl had left the lights on, which told him that she was only out for a
short while. Maybe dinner, perhaps, since he saw no dirty dishes in the
scullery. He rummaged in the cabinets and found the bottle of Bombay gin.
He grinned again. So Wells had been here! Then there would be no
problem. Certainly the girl would know where he was. Maybe they would
return together. Wouldn’t that be a pleasant windfall?
He poured himself a glassful of gin, then returned to the living room
and seated himself in the stuffed chair. He sipped the drink and sighed.
He removed the exotic Spanish knife, his latest purchase, from its
sheath tied to his left leg. He admired the glint and curve of the blade. It
was fifteen inches long and fashioned from Toledo steel. Granted, it would
be no more or less effective than his surgical knives, but it looked worse.
And that was important given the significance of the evening. After all, he
would not be bargaining with an idiot, though if Wells already had strong
feelings for the girl, he would be more likely to make a fool of himself.
That would be absolutely marvelous.
Perhaps the matters of his freedom, his reign as the human prince of
darkness would not be so difficult. If he won tonight, no longer would he
have to worry about being doggedly pursued by a determined, nasty little
harbinger of positivism. He could commit atrocities at will, and the time
machine would be to him as fire was to the venerable God of War. Satan
would rule. Leslie John Stephenson would become the eternal angel of the
apocalypse—riding the fourth dimension—dispensing death and sorrow on
a whim, a notion, an impulsive passing fancy.
He drained his glass and sighed with appreciation. He rose from the
chair and silently crossed the room into the foyer. He turned off the light,
then let his eyes adjust to the blackness. Gradually, forms and shapes once
again took on definition and size.
He heard a noise from the street and grinned. No doubt that was Amy
Robbins. He absently fingered the blade of his Spanish knife, his breath
coming quicker now.
A small, muffled thud.
He whirled around. Had that noise come from the front door or
elsewhere? Had his senses deceived him? No. There had been another
noise. Someone was Inside the bloody flat. He turned in a crouch, his knife
at the ready, his heart pounding, his body tense. A tremor of fear passed
over him. He began to perspire. He strained to see the slightest movement;
his ears listened for the slightest noise; his skin was aware of the vibrations
in the air. Slowly—very slowly—he continued to turn.
Suddenly, he focused on the foyer closet. He hadn’t looked inside that
cupboard when he had first come in, had he?
He took a deep breath and raised his knife. He crept closer and closer to
the closet, his breath coming in a low hiss. He reached for the door handle.
“I killed them all!”
After that, the pretense had dissolved, and H.G. had fallen forward on
the table and had begun to cry with relief. If Amy was still in her apartment,
the order that Mitchell had given might very well save her life. That was the
most important thing in the universe right now. For what was he without her
but a tragedian outside time?
Enough ethereal thoughts, he told himself; there was a postscript to the
matter. He had confessed. Very soon he would find himself in prison,
unable to be with Amy. Furthermore, he would not be able to use The
Utopia and escape this current world of contradictions and inequities. Yet,
he smiled optimistically. Had he not scored a telling victory against Fate?
Mitchell had left the room then, only to return moments later with a
steaming cup of coffee. He had seated himself, lit a cigarette and continued
his interrogation. “You killed them all, huh?”
“How many times do I have to say it?”
“Then how come you don’t know how much Jade Chang charged per
trick?”
“Money means nothing to me, my good man.”
“What kind of car did Dolores Clark drive?”
“A… a black one.”
“What kind?”
“I’m not interested in motorcars, either.”
“What color were the seats?”
“Red,” H.G. guessed, then smiled cleverly. “After I got through with
her.”
Mitchell scowled. “What did you have to drink at Marsha McGee’s
place?”
“I don’t recall.”
“You don’t recall.”
Exasperated, H.G. straightened up. “I’ve already confessed, Lieutenant!
What the devil do you want?”
“The truth.”
Before he could resume questioning, the door opened. The inevitable
Sergeant Ray slipped into the room as if pursued. His thick face was chalk
white, full of fear and worry.
“There’s a phone call for you, sir,” he announced in sorrowful tones.
“Take a message.”
“I think you should answer this one, sir.” His voice was almost a
whisper. He gave H.G. a sheepish, sidelong glance, half sympathetic, half in
awe.
H.G. stood. “Is she all right?” he asked, trembling. “Please tell me! Is
she all right?”
Mitchell gestured to the recorder and he left the room. Then the
lieutenant went out, closing the door quietly, refusing to look H.G. in the
eye. No answer was forthcoming.
H.G. knew then that his beloved Amy was dead.
OceanofPDF.com
13
Lieutenant Mitchell leaned on dining-room-table chair for support and
stared out the window at the lace trees, their delicate leaves intermittently lit
by the flashing red and blue lights of the squad cars on the street below. He
had been sick only once before during a homicide investigation. That had
been seventeen years ago when he had witnessed what a cuckolded husband
could do to his wife with a .357 Magnum at close range.
This one was worse. Now that he was beyond nausea and the fetid smell
of coagulating blood, he wondered. What kind of human being was capable
of this?
“Lieutenant,” whispered a uniformed officer. “Are you all right?”
“Don’t ask stupid questions,” he replied quietly. He forced himself to go
back into the living room where his old and reliable team was going
through the motions. They, too, were horrified; their faces were frozen in
expressions of shock. The entire room had been sprayed and splashed with
blood—as if the murderer had used parts of the victim’s body as paint
brushes. There was not one item which had not been stained red;
conversely, there was not one part of the deceased’s form which had not
been defiled and mutilated.
The photographers finished and looked to Mitchell for instructions. He
waved them out. The technicians completed their taking of blood samples,
their swift yet methodical sweep of the apartment for evidence. And finally
—thank God—the coroner’s deputies, who normally were the first to be
done, finished placing in plastic bags the parts of the corpse. It had been an
exploration of the macabre for them, a devil’s treasure hunt. They had had
to refer to an anatomical chart to make sure that they had not left anything
behind.
Mitchell remained in the apartment. He wanted to sear the violent
tableau into his brain, for he had been dead wrong about the murder suspect
in this case. He had to rectify that. He remembered the other victims—the
Chinese whore, the salesgirl and Dolores Clark. Each one of those murders
had been stylized, almost staged; a sense of joyous evil had pervaded them.
But, here, there was a difference. The killer had been frenzied, angry and
frustrated. There had been no control to the mutilation. Preliminary reports
indicated that there had been no sexual contact prior to the murder. The
killer, then, must have been surprised in some way, Mitchell concluded.
Something must have gone wrong.
He started down the stairs. So what? Maybe a dog barked. Maybe a
neighbor dropped by unexpectedly. That still didn’t change the fact that he
was no closer to a suspect now than he had been days ago. He realized
morosely that his theory about Wells and the murders was completely
logical, yet totally wrong. By the same token, he didn’t buy any of that
garbage about time-traveling. The only possible conclusion was the one
held by Sergeant Ray. Wells was a psychic. There was no other way he
could’ve had foreknowledge of at least two of the murders.
He came out onto the sidewalk and saw the crowd of news reporters
surge against the cordon of police.
“Was there another murder in this building, Lieutenant?”
“Yes, there was.”
“Was it anything like the Dolores Clark killing?”
“It was similar.”
“Do you have any suspects yet?”
“No comment, gentlemen.”
“Was the victim a prostitute?”
“No, she was not a prostitute. If you want more information, you’ll have
to wait until next of kin are notified. Now, if you’ll excuse me, gentlemen?”
“The neighbors say somebody named Amy Robbins lived up there! Is
that who it was, Lieutenant?”
“I am not sure, gentlemen!” He turned and glared at them. His voice
began to quaver. “There was no way for me or anyone else to identify the
corpse! It was beyond recognition, you understand, gentlemen?”
H.G. was huddled in the corner of the small room staring at tomorrow’s
newspaper still on the table. The headline was true; the prophecy had been
fulfilled. He had his coat wrapped tightly around him and shivered though
the temperature hadn’t changed. He had lost. Amy was gone. He was alone.
Eighty-six years from home, and no particular desire to return. It did not
matter that he had not beaten destiny. It did not matter why their carefully
laid plans had gone awry. It did not matter why the police had so stupidly
intervened and then failed to act quickly enough. Amy was dead. He would
never hear her speak again or feel her touch or sense her warmth or see her
eyes. He could envision her face and her eyes as he had gazed at them just
that morning, dreaming of sharing Elysium with her. Her beautiful eyes
would haunt him forever; she had been his responsibility; her death would
lie heavy on his soul. And that mattered. And so did the fact that
Stephenson was still running loose in the city of San Francisco. H.G. vowed
that he would stay in 1979 until he found the doctor and extracted revenge.
Yes, vengeance, by God. The devil with justice.
That philosophy of remedying social ills was neither consistent nor
quick nor brutal enough. He would never stand idly by and watch
Stephenson get sentenced to life in prison or even the gallows. He wanted
to kill the villain with his own hands.
Suddenly, H.G. doubled over and sobbed. Why hadn’t he insisted that
they leave when they first knew? He had unlocked the passageways of the
fourth dimension. Perhaps there always had been a hidden irony to his
discoveries and subsequent invention: that the past and the future had been
preordained and could not be altered no matter what. Hence, a person who
traveled forward in time and returned to his present would be swollen with
the knowledge of the future (whether good or bad), yet no one would
believe him. Helplessly, he would watch the human condition plod toward
absurdity.
Moreover, that was why he could not go back along the fourth
dimension and resurrect Amy Robbins. To relive three days with her over
and over—or to leapfrog over her death would be more than tantamount to
running away and avoiding reality; it would be begging the existential
question. True, she would be alive, and they would have each other, but
how long would their love last if she knew that he was ultimately
responsible for her terrible death? If she knew that she could never choose
to return to her home hour and live out her natural life? And how could he
love her when all the cosmos knew that he had failed to save her life?
Foreknowledge, then, was trifling at best, poisonous at worst. Long ago,
the die had been cast, the Fates had been sealed. And what did that say for a
paradise on earth? How did that speak to a Utopia? All of those lightheaded, naïve notions were worthless. They might as well be a fine layer of
dust on the futurological scrap heap of human civilization, for they meant
nothing.
The devil with optimism, then. It is going to end up as it was first
conceived. With all of the universe laughing at the butt of the cosmos—the
human animal—who has just enough sense to realize with horror what is
happening to him and not enough intelligence to do anything about it.
God help us all.
He wiped his face dry with his handkerchief, cleared his throat and
looked up through red-rimmed eyes.
Lieutenant Mitchell had come into the room and was just standing there,
staring at him. “You’re free to go.”
H.G. slowly nodded.
“I want you to know that I’m sorry. I’m truly very sorry.”
H.G. rose from the chair and collected his things—all except for the
pistol, which had been confiscated. He dropped the newspaper from the
future into a wastebasket, then walked out the door.
“Can I offer you a lift somewhere?” Mitchell called after him.
“You don’t have a conveyance that could take me far enough away from
this place, Lieutenant.”
H.G. walked away from police headquarters and was swallowed up in a
light fog. His posture had imperceptibly changed. No longer did he stand
perfectly straight with the look of an Anglican choir boy. He was slightly
crouched, instinctively ready to turn, his slitted eyes matching his profound
shift in mood and conviction.
A small gust of wind picked up some debris (Styrofoam cups and
plastic sandwich wrappers) from beneath parked cars and blew the stuff
away. H.G. nodded as if nature had affirmed his new stance. The litter
would no doubt be blown down to a slum. The meek shall not inherit the
earth, he mused. Only its garbage.
He hailed a cab at Mission and Sixth, although he did not know where
he was going. He shrugged helplessly. Who was he to think that he could
outsmart Leslie John Stephenson? Let alone find him. What did it matter,
anyway? Amy was gone, and he had no stomach left for the late twentieth
century and its potpourri of imperfections.
He told the cab driver to take him to the science museum in Golden
Gate Park. Yes, the devil with it all. He would admit defeat, climb aboard
his time machine and return home to a more genteel time. Upon arrival, he
would remove THE UTOPIA from above his cabin door. He would
obliterate the words (and hopefully the concept they stood for) by melting
down the brass plate and tossing the slag into the Thames. Then he would
pick up the pieces of his life and get on with the banalities of existence.
Suddenly H.G. felt a twinge of emotion. He decided that he wanted to
return to Russian Hill for a remembrance of what seemed like a distant past.
True, all that would be there was a building, but it had been her building.
Yes, she was dead now, but the very least he could do was say good-bye.
The least he could do was pay his respects.
He told the driver to turn right on Van Ness and let him off at the corner
of Green Street. Once there, he paid the cabby, then trudged up the street
toward Russian Hill. He moved like an automaton, his shoes scuffing the
sidewalk. His mind was sealed from speculation concerning free will,
predestination and knowledge of the future. His face had taken on an
embittered cast, his muscles hard against the cold night air.
Leslie John Stephenson stood in the shadow of a massive hedgerow
between two large houses just up the hill from the cul-de-sac. His spot was
safely secluded, yet he had a view of Green Street below. He also had Amy
Robbins and she was alive. One of his hands held her by the hair while the
other held the Spanish knife against her throat. She had become passive and
silent.
He did not speak to her for there was no need. Rather, he was lost in his
own thoughts. The evening had not gone as he had anticipated. He had
found Amy Robbins in the cupboard in the foyer and she had given in
without resistance once she had seen his knife. But then the other girl had
come into the flat without knocking, announcing brightly that she was sorry
that she was a little bit late. The girl had seen the knife at Amy’s throat and
had become petrified with fear. It was that split second of inertia that had
saved him. He had clubbed Amy Robbins unconscious, grabbed the other
girl and slashed her throat without ceremony. Then he had gone into a
frenzy.
He frowned and cursed himself. There had been so much blood this
time. If only he had not lost control. If only he had not given in to his fury.
He could simply have slain the girl and let it go at that. Then he still could
have stayed in the flat and proceeded as he had originally planned. But after
he had finished with the girl’s corpse, Amy Robbins had regained
consciousness and had begun screaming. He had silenced her, but the
damage had been done. Someone had undoubtedly heard the shrieks; hence,
he had been forced to flee with her.
Once safely away from the building, he had threatened Amy Robbins
with death and learned that she had indeed been expecting Wells. Therefore,
Stephenson had returned to Russian Hill after the police had departed and
taken up his vigil. He just hoped that the bargaining with Wells would not
be difficult. Whatever happened, he must control himself. Any more selfindulgent, indiscreet behavior and he might find himself in serious trouble.
He inadvertently tightened his grip on her hair. She moaned with pain. He
grinned, full of hatred for females of the species.
And then he saw the little scientist shuffling along Green Street. The
man stopped across the street from the girl’s building and stared up at the
darkened windows of her flat. Then he put his face in his hands and
slumped against a boxed lace tree on the sidewalk.
Stephenson prodded the girl with his knife. They went down the hill
alongside a Victorian mansion on the cul-de-sac. He stopped. He thought
for a moment, then took his hand out of the girl’s hair, removed his watch
from its pocket and snapped open the lid.
The light French lullaby began playing, its flights of melody softened
by the mist, but audible nonetheless.
Stephenson saw Wells raise his head, listen, then approach with a quick
and curious, yet cautious stride.
At first, H.G. thought that the music was coming from inside someone’s
house, then wondered if it was a radio in a motorcar. He peered into the
open window of a squat vehicle with a canvas top that resembled a beetle.
“H.G.!”
He whirled around.
“H.G., I’m over here!”
Amy was alive! With a hoarse cry, he rushed toward the side of a house,
anticipating the feel of her winsome frame against him.
“Amy, oh my God, Amy! Are you all right?” And then suddenly he
stopped short. They had stepped out of the shadows. Stephenson had a knife
to her throat, a hand in her hair.
“Amy! My God.” He stared, unable to believe his eyes. “But who…?”
“He murdered Carole,” she croaked. “Carole Thomas, my friend from
work. I’d invited her for dinner.” Her voice faded, but she managed to
continue. “You were right. The newspaper was wrong.”
“A mistaken identity!”
She nodded and began to sob quietly.
H.G. rose to his full height and glared up at Stephenson. “What the
devil do you want?”
Stephenson chuckled. “Surely you must know. The special key that
overrides the Rotation Reversal Lock circuitry. It’s what I’ve wanted all
along. Give it to me and we’ll call it quits.”
“How did you find out about that?”
“How else? From the diagrams in your rather spartan MorningtonCrescent laboratory. Given the close proximity of Scotland Yard’s finest,
however, I did not have the time to ask you for it then.”
“I can’t give you that!”
“Would you like to watch Miss Robbins die?”
“She isn’t part of this! This is between you and me!”
“The heroic doesn’t suit you, Wells,” Stephenson replied
contemptuously. “Your voice lacks timbre and your stature significance.”
“My God, man, be reasonable!”
“I’m being perfectly reasonable. It’s just that I can’t have you following
me through eternity like the Flying Dutchman now, can I?”
H.G. did not respond, for he was looking at Amy. His eyes found hers
and recognized the utter terror in them, the dismay, the longing to be free.
“Yes, lovely creature, isn’t she?” Stephenson slowly drew the flat of the
blade across her neck as if caressing her.
H.G. looked at Stephenson with hollow eyes. Nothing came to him.
“But we’re wasting time,” Stephenson placed the tip of the knife to her
temple. “Give me the key or I’ll kill her.”
H.G. slumped. He really had no other choice. When it came down to
deciding whether he wanted carte blanche to the cosmos or to be with the
one he loved, it was no contest.
“You’ll release her, then?”
Stephenson exploded with laughter. “Of course, Wells! Hasn’t that been
the drift of my remarks? I’m proposing a simple, businesslike trade that I
believe will be mutually beneficial for both of us.”
“You promise?” he asked in stentorian tones.
“You have my word as a gentleman.”
“All right. I’m agreeable.” He sighed with relief. “Let her go and then
I’ll throw you the key.”
Stephenson chuckled. “No, no. My mother was rather an atrocious
woman, but her many failings did not include raising a mentally deficient
son.” He paused. “Throw me the key. Then I’ll release the girl.”
“On your honor?”
“As a gentleman.”
H.G. dug into his pocket and pulled out the small key that overrode the
RRL. For a moment, he inspected it wistfully, remembered making it. At
the time he had not realized what colossal, immortal powers he was
infusing into such a small piece of metal. C’est la vie. A human being was
more important than a bloody machine any day, no matter how spectacular
the technology was. And he wasn’t quoting Huxley, he was quoting himself.
Then he tossed Stephenson the key. It clinked on the concrete in front of
Amy. Stephenson quickly scooped it up with the knife hand, pocketed it,
then tightened his grip on Amy’s hair and once again placed the knife to her
throat. He backed across the sidewalk toward the street.
“There’s just one thing, my dear fellow. Candidly, I’d have expected
you to notice by now that I am not a gentleman.”
H.G. gasped and staggered back.
“Please, let her go! She is not part of this!”
Stephenson chuckled. “Oh, but she is, my good man, she most certainly
is. Forgive me for being so slow in diagnosing the condition, but you are in
love with her, are you not?”
“So what if I am?”
“Then she should be denied the gift of life so that you may grieve for
her.”
“No, wait!”
The doctor laughed. “Relax, old chap. I’m not going to murder her
before your very eyes. True, I may not be a gentleman, but I do have taste.
So do not trouble yourself. Really. Suffice it to say that she will meet her
maker somewhere along the fourth dimension after we have both had a
chance to relax and enjoy each other’s company.”
Enraged, H.G. shouted at him. “You won’t get far! I’ll telephone the
police!”
“Do what you like, you little fool.” Stephenson laughed, then opened
the door to the beetle-shaped motorcar with the canvas top.
“H.G.!” Amy cried with despair. “He took her keys, too! He’s got
Carole’s car!”
Then Stephenson forced her into the driver’s seat and made her start the
engine.
H.G. ran for the vehicle, screaming, but it was already pulling away
from the curb. He grabbed onto the rear bumper. The acceleration jerked
him off his feet and he sprawled on the pavement. He looked up in time to
see the red taillights of the little motorcar turn at the intersection, then
disappear from view.
With a groan, H.G. got to his feet and ran to her apartment building vaulted
up the stairs to her flat intending to call the police.
The door was locked.
He sank down onto the stairs and put his face in his hands. God, what
had possessed him to trust, to accept Stephenson as a gentleman? He had
been tricked, beguiled like a simpleton, humiliated. He was angry, too. How
could he possibly have given up the key?
Suddenly, he straightened up. Key? He fished in his pocket and
extracted the ring with keys for Amy’s Accord. His mind raced. He could
follow them! It did not matter that he had never driven a motorcar before.
He understood the principles, he had seen them driven, he had had their
operation explained to him more than once. Moreover, if millions of
average twentieth-century human beings could do it, then there was no
reason why one logical and rational nineteenth-century human being
couldn’t do it too.
H.G. hurried from the building and jumped into the Accord parked out
front. He quickly scanned the controls, inserted the key, turned it, and the
engine sprang to life. He grinned and turned the steering wheel back and
forth just to test the feel. He touched the accelerator, then put the motorcar
into gear. It leaped forward and smashed into the rear of the vehicle in front.
Glass tinkled. He remembered and placed the shift on the “R.” The Accord
zoomed backward and slammed into the car behind. More glass tinkled.
“Blast,” he uttered.
Windows opened and lights went on. Irate people began screaming
about their cars. Finally, H.G. pulled hard on the steering wheel while
simultaneously manipulating the gearshift. The car lurched out of the
parking space into the street. He turned it in a wide circle and grazed three
parked vehicles on the other side of the street. He turned the wheel back and
forth, then pressed down on the accelerator, assuming that like the Helm
Lever in the time machine one had to be definitive. The Accord rocketed
toward the intersection and flew across Jones Street.
Fortunately, the hour was late and there was no traffic, for by the time
H.G. had reached Van Ness Avenue he had driven through six stop signs
and sideswiped a dozen more parked machines while weaving from one
side of the street to the other. Amy’s car it looked like it had been through a
meteorite shower.
When he reached the Geary Expressway, he managed an awkward right
turn, but overcompensated and flattened a “Yield” sign. The engine began
to tick, and he feared that he had damaged it in some way. He was also
afraid that if he didn’t hurry, he would be too late. He increased speed. His
steering became jerky again, and the battered Accord once again swayed
back and forth, listing like an abused ship in a typhoon. Since the road was
straight, H.G. was all right until he found himself descending into a tunnel.
He became apprehensive and stiffened his grip on the wheel. The vehicle
veered into the wall, bounced and scraped against the concrete time after
time.
He pulled it to the left and did the same thing against the other wall.
“Great Scott,” he exclaimed and inadvertently pressed down on the
accelerator. The motorcar responded and shot out of the other end of the
tunnel. H.G. hung on for dear life. The Accord, its suspension system
ruined, angled hard toward the right. H.G. used all of his strength to bring it
back to the left. He steered farther left to avoid a telephone pole, bounced
over the sidewalk and flattened some trash cans before finally getting back
onto the roadway. He cursed the machine for having a mind of its own,
realizing that, as Huxley had once said, somewhere and sometime, mankind
must draw a line in the sand and make his stand against technology.
Somehow H.G. made it to Park Presidio Boulevard. He turned left, not
seeing that, unlike other streets this one had a swath of green in the middle.
“What the devil!” he ejaculated.
The Accord leaped the curb, blasted through a hedgerow and tore up the
lawn. H.G. frantically pulled on the steering wheel and maneuvered the
machine back onto the pavement. He was, however, going the wrong way
on a one-way street, but did not realize it until he was inside Golden Gate
Park. A car was coming the other way, horn blasting. H.G. jerked hard to
the left. The Accord narrowly missed the oncoming car. It jumped the curb,
spun around twice, then rolled down a slight hill and finally—mercifully so
—came to rest in the middle of a pond in the Japanese Tea Gardens.
Dazed, but unhurt, H.G. scrambled out of the ruined vehicle and did not
understand the implications of its resting place. He brushed off his clothes,
then sloshed to shore. Once he got his bearings, he saw the faint outlines of
the science museum. He began running for the building.
He got inside via the same basement fire door through which he had so
innocently entered the twentieth century five days before. He hurried up to
the main floor and raced toward the display room. He was sickened by the
dead security guards he encountered: one had been slain in the great hall,
the other, surprised and stabbed in the rotunda.
Finally, he was inside the display room just in time to see Stephenson
prod Amy into the cabin of The Utopia with his knife. He turned, waved at
H.G., then climbed in after her. H.G. rushed after them, but Stephenson
slammed the cabin door and locked it. H.G. pounded on it. He tried to dig
his hands under the door, a plate, anything, but the smooth, metallic surface
had been so carefully planned, so painstakingly built that he could not even
manage to slide a fingernail under a rivet.
Once locked inside, Stephenson released Amy and turned away to
familiarize himself with the controls. She threw herself at the door, reaching
frantically for the handle. He smashed her in the head.
Dazed, she tried for the door again. He hit her in the belly then again in
the head. She collapsed, unconscious.
When she awakened, she felt cold. She heard him breathing and moving
about the cabin clicking switches on and off and moving levers. Gradually,
her head cleared. She was doubled up on the floor, now half-naked. He had
used her blouse to tie her hands behind her. She moaned softly.
Grinning, he kneeled beside her, inspected her face, then used his
surgical hands to probe and test her intimate parts. Face it, she told herself,
she would die soon. He would use her first; no doubt, in a variety of ways.
If only he would not prolong his bizarre ritual. That was all she could hope
for.
He twisted her face into the light, and she found herself staring into his
narrow, deep-set eyes. They were the devil’s eyes, she thought. Small and
wicked. Mad.
“Your hair is not black like hers,” he commented. “And your skin is not
creamy enough.” Then he smiled and nodded. “But you’re closer than any
of the others. By far.”
He picked her up without effort and placed her astraddle him in the
chair. She felt the harness being strapped over them both, and she began
trembling. The switches were on. The Time-Sphere-Destination-Indicator
was set for the year 2000. She heard his interminable breathing in her ear.
His arms came around her and his hands grasped the Accelerator Helm
Lever. With a joyful shout, he shoved the bar forward until it locked in the
flank position.
Nothing happened.
Suddenly, H.G. lifted his head. He frowned and cocked his ear toward the
time machine. Strange, he thought, the engine wasn’t making noise.
Therefore, Stephenson hadn’t left yet. He quickly scrambled to his feet,
then gasped. Of course Stephenson hadn’t left yet!
When he and Amy had returned from their journey to Saturday, he had
replaced the small lock on the central gearing wheel, preventing the pulse
generator from transmitting power to the engine.
He was not sure why he had done it—other than that he had placed the
lock there originally, so he must have had a good reason. Perhaps his
deductions had been concerned with the sanctity of the universe. Whatever,
he had no doubt feared that someone else would place their irresponsible
hands on the Accelerator Helm Lever.
He remembered when they had returned from Saturday. Then, he had
worried about the fact that before the trip he had cut through the bar of the
lock. He had shrugged off the concern and replaced the little device
anyway. Since it would be hanging in the path of a gearing system, the
engine would not work, regardless. He grinned. In this case, then, the mere
physical presence of an unsophisticated foreign object near the heart of his
machine meant that both he and history would have a second chance.
He heard the cabin door unlock and open. Stephenson pushed Amy
through the hatch, the knife to her throat.
“As you can see,” Stephenson stated coldly, “she is in one piece.
Presently.”
H.G. was filled with relief and gratitude, but did not dare to show his
feelings. A plan was beginning to form in his mind as he realized that he,
too, might use deceit to his advantage.
“The only question is, Wells, how long will she remain in that
condition?”
Wells did not respond.
“Either you fix this infernal contraption or I’ll kill her right now.”
“If I repair the machine, you’ll kill her anyway,” H.G. replied flatly. His
voice betrayed neither his pounding heart nor his dry throat.
“Maybe I will and maybe I won’t.” He leaned against the side of the
time machine. “There are two ways to look at it, my dear fellow, depending
upon how one views the human condition. You can repair the device
thinking that your good deed will be rewarded in kind. Or, you can perform
the good service fearful that the worst will happen anyway. Would you
agree with my assessment?”
H.G. nodded slowly.
“Regardless, then, you really have no choice, do you? Unless, of course,
you’re more callous that I thought.”
“You’re right.”
“Don’t do it!” Amy screamed.
Stephenson laughed. “He has to repair it, my dear girl, for he is
hopelessly in love with you. Isn’t it marvelous how weak the human heart
is?” He turned to H.G. “Go on! Fix the blasted thing!”
H.G. shrugged helplessly. “But I have no tools.”
Stephenson reached down, removed the surgical knife from his half
boot and tossed it. The instrument clattered across the floor to H.G. “That’s
the best I can do.”
“H.G., please!” she cried. “I’d rather die!”
H.G. picked up the knife and went to the engine. He lifted the hatch
cover, then went into the engine compartment. He did not need the knife—
or any tools, for that matter—to remove the small lock from the central gear
wheel. All he had to do was insert his arm into the reversal housing, twist
his wrist the wrong way, bend his fingers back in the other direction and,
presto, the lock was in his hand. The engine was free to function. Then he
took a deep breath and studied the complex wiring. His eyes narrowed. Yes,
the time machine would work all right, but not in the way that Stephenson
suspected. H.G. raised the knife.
“Just what the devil is taking you so long?” Stephenson demanded.
H.G. slid out of the engine compartment, got to his feet and closed the
hatch cover.
“Well?”
“It is done.”
The doctor grinned. “Thank you, Wells, you’re a jolly good sport.” He
took a guinea out of his pocket and flipped it to H.G. “Keep the change, old
boy.”
He turned and Amy into the cabin.
“Why did you fix it, H.G.?” she screamed. “Why?”
“Because he’s a simpering, callow fool who believes in the golden
rule!”
Stephenson shoved her halfway into the cabin. Despite the prod of his
knife, she continued to resist. Finally, he got her all the way inside, but in so
doing he lost his momentum and his watch chain became tangled around
the door handle. He automatically turned to extricate himself and
inadvertently let go of her.
Amy bolted free of the time machine.
H.G. rushed the cabin. Stephenson saw him coming, emitted an oath,
slammed the door and locked it. Caught outside, his pocket watch swung
from the handle; the lid had popped open and the French lullaby played.
H.G. banged on the door, then realized—once again—that his attempts
were futile. There was nothing he could do. A low hum emanated from The
Utopia. H.G. cursed, then looked down at the absurd little pocket watch
playing music. Suddenly, he saw the ring handle for the declinometer. He
grabbed it and pulled the prism-shaped component out of the machine. He
dropped it, then backed away, afraid to contemplate what he had done. He
saw Amy, still in a state of shock. He quickly untied her and they embraced
tightly. Her supple body shuddered as the tension left her. She began to sob,
her cries. He becoming joyful imagined that he was hearing a celestial
symphony, a celebration of everything that was good, a song of life.
He was crying, too, for Amy was finally safe. There were no more
deceptions. The moment was real and true.
They stood back from the time machine, silhouetted by the intense blue
energy field that surrounded The Utopia as the engine gradually warmed.
He held her tighter and caressed her face and hair. She had stopped sobbing,
her attention drawn to the time machine much like the enthrallment one
could see in the eyes of a lower primate held spellbound by the lights of an
automobile. He, too, stared at the spectacle in awe. He heard the hum of the
engine reach its familiar pitch and level off, indicating that speed had been
achieved. A faint, red glow blinked intermittently from behind the small,
opaque cabin windows, and H.G. knew that very soon now Stephenson
would make his cosmic leap into the fourth dimension. H.G. held his breath
with anticipation. Would The Utopia explode? He truly did not know.
Suddenly, the engine growled as if straining against itself. There was a
clunk, then another hum, more high-pitched than before. An explosion of
light. A whiteout.
A long, agonized scream emanated from the cabin. A terrible, elongated
wail that echoed through the universe, gradually dying out like a comet
falling forever beyond endless horizons.
A long silence.
From the top of the cabin rose a wisp of smoke, then it slowly dissipated
along with the bluish cast that surrounded The Utopia.
After leaving the museum, they retreated to the smoky haze of a warm and
intimate bar that had no windows which might serve as portholes for the
imagination. They had both seen enough to last a lifetime. Or so H.G. told
himself at that particular moment.
And in time, the inevitable questions were asked and answered.
First, Amy had wanted to know what H.G. had done after she had
finally gotten away from Stephenson. H.G. explained that once she was
safe, he could jerk the declinometer out of his machine. Inside the cabin
nothing at all was affected; hence, there was no way Stephenson could
fathom that he was about to embark on a journey which would never end.
“Oh,” Amy exclaimed. “Then you sent him to Eternity.”
“Exactly.” He smiled and nodded.
“Does that mean that he’s dead?”
“I don’t really know, my dear.” He sipped a gin and bitters. “And I’m
not really sure that I want to speculate, other than to say that Dr. Leslie John
Stephenson is no doubt permanently stuck outside of time.”
“Permanently?”
“Of course. You remember. Once you arrive at Infinity, you cannot
return, for there is nothing to get back from. Ever.”
“But what about your time machine? It’s still in 1979.”
He smiled. “Quite true. When Stephenson asked me to fix The Utopia, I
realized that all was not lost.”
“I don’t understand.”
“I really didn’t have to fix anything. All I had to do was remove the lock
which I had placed on the engine earlier. But while I was under the
machine, I cut part of the RRL circuitry with the villain’s knife.”
She gasped, her eyes wide. “You were planning to follow me!”
“Fortunately, I was spared that ordeal due to the man’s ultimate
carelessness.”
She laughed joyfully. “Go on.”
“When I pulled the declinometer, he went to Eternity without the
machine. If part of the RRL circuitry had not been already cut, The Utopia
would have gone with him. I was lucky.”
She shook her head, her eyes full of astonishment. “You are amazing.”
“Thanks to this.” With a magical grin, he reached into his pocket and
took out the small lock that he had removed from the engine’s central
gearing wheel. He chuckled and reminisced. The tour guide who had first
encountered him in 1979 had been correct: the time machine had never
been known to work, although the poor man never would have guessed in a
million years that the reason why not was an infinitely simple, drop-forged
bicycle lock.
H.G. released a long, luxuriant sigh. He hefted the lock in his hand and
speculated about how the principle of matter rejuvenation actually
functioned when one was traveling into history. (The bar of the lock was cut
now: it would be whole then—eighty-six years in the past; but if only it
were placed, say, on the control panel, hence being left inside time and
exposed to the swirling vortex of high-energy rotation.) Suddenly, he
grinned broadly.
He finally knew that he, H. G. Wells, had actually been the one who had
originally placed the lock on the machine when he got back to the
nineteenth century. And he knew why, too. After the cosmic ordeal that they
had both been through, he realized—profoundly so—that no one must ever
use his time machine again.
“So then what do we say about Dr. Stephenson?” she asked, her eyes
wide.
He shifted in his chair. “According to history, no one ever really knew
what happened to Jack the Ripper.” He raised both his eyes and his glass
and toasted the skies. “And they will never find out, either, my dear.”
“You know what,” she said, her voice full of awe. “I just realized
something.”
“What?”
“I’m in love with an older man.”
OceanofPDF.com
Epilogue
Unlike Leslie John Stephenson, the fate of H. G. Wells and Amy Robbins
became common knowledge. Far more common, perhaps, than either of
them desired, although neither was ever known to complain in public about
the questionable virtues of fame and fortune. What happened—briefly—
was this.
When H.G. returned to 1893, he took a consenting Amy with him. Since
they arrived within minutes of his original departure, Mrs. Nelson was not
surprised that he had come home so soon. As a matter of fact, she never
really was sure whether or not he had left. Especially since she hadn’t had a
chance to find the envelope containing the fifty pounds and his letter of
explanation in the basement. She was not particularly amazed by the digital
watch he wore; she assumed that he had created it in his laboratory. She
was, however, shocked by the presence of Ms. Amy Robbins and
flabbergasted that such a pretty young lady would dress in such a bizarre
fashion. But, like most good and true English gentlewomen, she stoically
accepted the news from H.G. that his female companion, most recently
arrived from America, would be moving in for the duration. Besides, Mrs.
Nelson and Amy quickly became fast friends and, on rare occasions when
alone, they would share mild outrage at the inconsiderate nature of the adult
male of the species.
Needless to say, London society was utterly scandalized that H. G.
Wells and a woman from the notorious city of San Francisco were living
together under the same roof. As a result, the articles that he was obligated
to pen for the Pall Mall Gazette became even more popular. His readership
avidly looked for erotic tidbits from the radical who was living in sin and
enjoying it. Demands on his time became heavy, for he had begun his first
novel. But he never forsook his daily bicycle ride through the city, now
accompanied by Amy. And if the weather was good, they spent Sunday
afternoons boating on the lake in Regent’s Park. If not, the two of them
invariably could be found in the library of 7 Mornington Place by the fire,
sipping wine and reading to each other.
H.G. had returned from his sojourn a wiser man. His vision of the future
was more skeptical, and hence realistic. No longer did he blindly trust the
proponents of science and technology, for he realized that they could be
morally bankrupt. Moreover, he understood that during his eighty-six year
hiatus many of their dazzling creations had been employed to devastate
societies and annihilate human beings, sometimes for no reason at all.
Furthermore, he had seen that an advanced technology could effectively
crush people if they themselves allowed it to happen. He had seen that man
was dangerously close to becoming a slave to the artificial, automatic world
that, ironically, he had created for his own power and convenience.
Therefore, if Techno-Utopia ever did become a reality, the possibility
existed that it would ultimately serve only itself.
H.G. had no answers, failing a return to organized religion. He could
only dedicate his life and work to making frequent eloquent pleas for
rationality. What was it that Huxley had once said? It is a fact that men
must control science and check the inevitable advance of technology. What
is even more important, however, is that they must control themselves
according to the designs of reason if they are to avoid a final solution of no
quarter.
Amen, H.G. had finally added.
With unfailing devotion, Amy helped him finish his book, and shortly
thereafter The Time Machine was published. It created a sensation in
literary circles, although not entirely a favorable one, and instantly became
a best seller. One critic was prompted to report that the work deserved
serious attention because of its “fantasized, yet penetrating insights into the
future of mankind.”
And what of H.G.’s cosmic battle with destiny? He never did claim
superiority or even victory. He preferred to let the matter rest alongside the
notes on his desk and other philosophical riddles. Suffice it to say that
Herbert George Wells and Amy Catherine Robbins were married in 1895
and lived happily together in a state of mutual tenderness for a good, long
time.
OceanofPDF.com
London
CIRCA 1893
OceanofPDF.com
Time Travel
“It’s against reason, Wells!”
“Perhaps. But so is defying gravity. You do know that more than one
man has risen over five thousand feet above the Earth’s surface in a balloon,
don’t you?”
Stephenson started to speak, then sagged and thought furiously. Ten
years ago, who would have thought of an electric light blub? Or a talking
machine? One hundred years ago, who would have thought of a camera? Or
a gramophone? Technology did appear to be developing faster and faster.
Maybe Wells was right about a Utopian future with a contented population.
His theories seemed sound.
Smythe had the floor, and as he spoke he gestured triumphantly.
“Doesn’t this all sound suspiciously familiar? Much like a collection of
absurdities Wells published in the Journal five years ago?” He turned and
addressed H.G. “What did you title that piece?”
“‘The Chronic Argonauts.’”
“Oh yes.” Smythe continued. “Wasn’t it about a young man who
traveled through time encountering great civilizations in the future? What a
lot of simplistic rubbish that is! Give up this thinking about a time machine,
Wells. It’s a waste of time, and it doesn’t suit you.”
H.G. cleared his throat and smiled smugly. “I haven’t just thought about
a time machine, gentleman, I have constructed one.”
“A nifty, fresh and clever combination of romance, horro, suspense and a
touch of science fiction.”
—Santa Barbara News-Press
OceanofPDF.com
